{"post-88455": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1547069982000", "message": "Long is the road and hard is the journey for a Drow and Elf who choose to search for the Crimson Ascent. It had been ordained that both the light and the dark would have to combine in order to obtain it. A missive left by the original drow who had bestowed the gift. He believed it to be a gift from the gods but she knew it had been a gift from her people. A sign of the friendship once shared between them before their differences had split them apart.- Continued from\u00a0A Wilderness Road", "link_list": ["https://flic.kr/p/23vAdZD", "https://flic.kr/p/23vAdZD", "https://www.flickr.com/photos/137813549@N06/", "http://thefantasysandbox.boards.net/thread/3331/wilderness-road?page=8"], "image_list": ["https://farm5.staticflickr.com/4888/39716261983_958ed10bd5_o.png"], "html": "<div style=\"text-align:center;\"><span style=\"font-size:large;\">Long is the road and hard is the journey for a Drow and Elf who choose to search for the Crimson Ascent. It had been ordained that both the light and the dark would have to combine in order to obtain it. A missive left by the original drow who had bestowed the gift. He believed it to be a gift from the gods but she knew it had been a gift from her people. A sign of the friendship once shared between them before their differences had split them apart.</span></div>"}, "post-88456": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1547070169000", "message": "Frustrating was the man who she had broken bone and tore tissue, aggravating was the mayor who was now deciding that the time had come to establish this town as more than it had ever been, and finally when Vithkun took to parading about wearing the other cloak and teasing her all in one go she would laugh. The sort of bright merry laughter they had not had much reason to share but one that broke the tension and turmoil that rested in her features at the words of the others. Certainly it had been a long hard road but for now there was some amusement to be found in the smallest things and she was agreeing with him any semblance of seriousness gone from her, \"As I was called demon by the gate guard I do believe it might be suitable.\" Placing her mace back into her belt she bent down and picked up the dagger on the floor. Glancing to the one refusing to aid them she would ask politely, \"Do you know what this is?\"She'd knocked unconscious its true owner but his words had not seemed untrue ringing with just a semblance of sincerity to them that made her believe it was much more dangerous than it appeared. She avoided touching the blade even if she brought it close to observe it, \"I do believe there is more than meets the eye but without knowledge of the blade itself testing it might be the only option.\" Her test subject would be the one refusing to answer questions, as horrible as it was his resistance made him a target. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Frustrating was the man who she had broken bone and tore tissue, aggravating was the mayor who was now deciding that the time had come to establish this town as more than it had ever been, and finally when Vithkun took to parading about wearing the other cloak and teasing her all in one go she would laugh. The sort of bright merry laughter they had not had much reason to share but one that broke the tension and turmoil that rested in her features at the words of the others. Certainly it had been a long hard road but for now there was some amusement to be found in the smallest things and she was agreeing with him any semblance of seriousness gone from her, \"As I was called demon by the gate guard I do believe it might be suitable.\" "}, "post-88488": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1547153997000", "message": "Vithkun would return a lighthearted smile helping to break the atmosphere a bit. \"Believe me, you're a prime demon!\" Vithkun said and winked in jest to Myra. The guy on the floor however didn't quite participate in the act of lighthearted banter and as Myra turned to him with the dagger and a question, he would instinctively try to push himself further back although the wall did not allow for that. \"Wh-what kind of question is that?\" he asked and started feeling the panic at not being able to get away from her increasingly threatening behavior. \"T-testing it! You've got to be kidding! I'm not even worth killing..!\" he cried out getting the hint it was him she meant. \"Please don't stab me with that atrocity! They say that when the blade strikes blood it releases itself from the hilt and writhes its way into the wound crawling towards the heart and eventually...\" he said as sweat started to run down his forehead. \"And eventually killing the subject...\" he said a little more muted believing that such a horrid weapon would not be received kindly by the elves as the man had already starting protecting himself with the arm that was still not broken in anticipation of retribution.And sure Vithkun narrowed his eyes taking a step forwards reaching for his sword.\"You little fiend..! You have seen this being done, haven't you! Your words tells me that you've seen it done... Who did you kill you maggot?!?\" he asked threateningly angered by the foul weapon before turning to Myra. \"Such a monstrous weapon needs to be destroyed somehow, you must not use it and risk being cursed. One thing is to kill a man who deserves it, another thing is to take such evil power in your hands to enact the deed!\" Vithkun warned Myra despising the look of the dagger. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Vithkun would return a lighthearted smile helping to break the atmosphere a bit. "}, "post-88494": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1547164705000", "message": "\u201cTruly terrifying then?\u201d Continuing the banter in return it was the sort of ease that had accompanied on the road after they had met Anonnai. Vithkun had seen what she was capable of through him and her restraint and his restraint had been withholding from a battle for a peaceable solution. A thing that made her respect him well enough to believe finally that he might make a suitable King. One who knew how to wave that big stick but also to attend to the idea of mercy when it was possible and knew that second chances and retribution were not beyond most. As the dagger, which she was learning was truly demonic, rested within her hands she felt apprehension then at being merciful towards this man. Vith had jumped on his back stamping him down verbally before she could speak on the matter. Holding it up there was a look of consideration, one that others might take as one that meant she was prepared to use it, it was a fine line between curiosity and want within the look she gave it, but there was little she could falsify in her speech without thorough thought and working around her own curses, \u201cAnd they believed me to be demonic, you\u2019re right it has to be destroyed.\u201dMelted perhaps in the pits, \u201cOr made where it cannot be found again, I doubt there is a way to easily destroy it.\u201d Lowering it carefully keeping the blade away from her side it would have to be wrapped in leather later and she intended on seeking aid from the mayor in finding something suitable. After all he could offer at least that.\u201cBut, we need to find out where they are,\u201d it was an odd act to be able to force yourself to mean something else than what you were saying and it was possible when one forced it, she was only allowing the mans imagination to run away with him as her hand wavered her fingers curling and readjusting around the handle. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\u201cTruly terrifying then?\u201d Continuing the banter in return it was the sort of ease that had accompanied on the road after they had met Anonnai. Vithkun had seen what she was capable of through him and her restraint and his restraint had been withholding from a battle for a peaceable solution. A thing that made her respect him well enough to believe finally that he might make a suitable King. One who knew how to wave that big stick but also to attend to the idea of mercy when it was possible and knew that second chances and retribution were not beyond most. As the dagger, which she was learning was truly demonic, rested within her hands she felt apprehension then at being merciful towards this man. Vith had jumped on his back stamping him down verbally before she could speak on the matter. "}, "post-88528": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1547329473000", "message": "Vithkun casually pointed at the dagger.\"You can't... you know... drain its life away?\" he asked and gave Myra a sidelong glance. Indeed it did seem like the dagger had been given some kind of life - or unlife no matter how pathetic. If she couldn't the pits might be a suitable end to the abomination and the elven cloth that made it out for Vithkun's tent would be able to wrap around the dagger and to some extend negate its magic too although wrapping it in leather too would be a good way of making sure. Also perhaps the cloaked man had possessed a sheath for it? Vithkun would remind himself to check. The man answered Vithkun as he clenched his teeth.\"I might...\" he said reluctantly although a stern gaze from Vithkun caused him to spill the rest. \"Alright, alright! I've seen the dagger in action, but it wasn't me. He wanted to try it out on some traveler and I had no say it in. It was horrible the way it worked, so if you destroy it I'm totally fine with it..!\" he said and seemed to fear the dagger more than the elves although when Myra would not put the dagger away he started speaking. \"Sure, whatever..! You don't need to threaten me, you can go there although you'll probably regret it bitterly! They are holed up in the old ruins near the mountain range - you know that old fort that hasn't been put to use in a long time.\" He explained. \"Lord Volypdaktos may not be there though as he resides in the One Realm of Arbor and only rarely graces this world with his presence.\" the man told the two elves unsure if it had been enough. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Vithkun casually pointed at the dagger."}, "post-88529": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1547330322000", "message": "Barely enough, the second little worm of a man was spilling much of what lay in store for them but she wasn't done and she was brandishing the dagger about lightly in her hands while observing it. Really she was carefully slipping it back and forth but she had a way of handling it that made her appear inexperienced. It was a wonder that Vithkun did not attempt to take it from her because the action really was strange, \"I could attempt,\" she told the elf with only a sideways glance. Unable to say it would be a waste, which she might have normally in a real threat she crouched down to be on the same level as the man. \"They are all holed up?\" Raising a brow she would say not unkindly but the threat in her eyes seemed very real, \"I need numbers, how many can fight, how many would fight, what defenses there are.\" Strained in part she hated the deception of her body movements and she felt the ache upon her skin as it tugged on her. It was difficult to portray herself in such a manner for her spoken word could not be truly manipulated but to pretend in such a way was tiring. It took power of her own accord and there was a slight tremble now to her legs the muscles wanting to spasm but she held herself quite well in the meantime attempting not to let her weakness show. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Barely enough, the second little worm of a man was spilling much of what lay in store for them but she wasn't done and she was brandishing the dagger about lightly in her hands while observing it. Really she was carefully slipping it back and forth but she had a way of handling it that made her appear inexperienced. It was a wonder that Vithkun did not attempt to take it from her because the action really was strange, \"I could attempt,\" she told the elf with only a sideways glance. Unable to say it would be a waste, which she might have normally in a real threat she crouched down to be on the same level as the man. "}, "post-88569": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1547415488000", "message": "Vith observed the rather odd behavior Myra showed with the dagger and wanted more than anything to tell her to put it away and not to play around with it - but belittling Myra had never really worked and he figured she was playing a role trying to convince the man on the ground to tell the truth first time out. The man was taken aback by apparently not being specific enough and pressed even further up the wall. \"W-well... I don't know how many but... they are a lot.\" he said and tried to wrestle his brain into a more concise answer although he had only been there once before. \"The place has demons crawling around the place although the initiates - like us - can enter freely. I don't think it has any specific defenses but the demons sure can defend themselves.\" he said as Vith decided to join Myra in adding pressure to the initiate seeing that Myra had difficulty keeping her role in character. \"You'll have to do better than that - tell us what is so special about that place that they may take up residence there!\" Vithkun commanded pressing his blade towards the initiate's throat having drawn it in a split second. \"I-I...\" he said surprised to see the quick reaction from the elf. \"There is an inner chamber where my colleague entered and that is where they say the gate to The One Realm of Arbor is. I don't know if it can be destroyed or anything, but only someone considered worthy can enter and speak with Lord Volypdaktos!\" he said finally spilling a few usable beans. \"I think... they may be a few hundred inside the fortress.\" he added answering Myra's query. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Vith observed the rather odd behavior Myra showed with the dagger and wanted more than anything to tell her to put it away and not to play around with it - but belittling Myra had never really worked and he figured she was playing a role trying to convince the man on the ground to tell the truth first time out. "}, "post-88572": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1547424615000", "message": "A layout of the compound itself would be useful, but how truthful the man was being would remain to be seen. \u201cA few hundred,\u201d her voice echoed poorly enough his words her confident outer shell slipping for a moment with her effort as she straightened and stopped playing with the knife. Even if they could pass as initiates, and wear the robes, there was no telling if they could find their way well enough to avoid suspicion. \u201cThen I will make you a deal, you will tell us the layout of the compound to the best of your abilities and I will not use the dagger on you.\u201d She wasn\u2019t going to use the dagger on him anyways but she said nothing about if he did not cooperate he would be pricked by the nasty little thing. In fact with Vith so close she\u2019d taken a step back allowing him full access his threatening more viable than hers at the moment. It gave her a second to feel the dagger within her hand mentally, reach for it, attempt to draw on whatever had been placed inside of it. Whether the idea was sound or not she would at least think on the matter until she had more time to consider it, Knowing if it was possible was only one step of the matter. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "A layout of the compound itself would be useful, but how truthful the man was being would remain to be seen. \u201cA few hundred,\u201d her voice echoed poorly enough his words her confident outer shell slipping for a moment with her effort as she straightened and stopped playing with the knife. Even if they could pass as initiates, and wear the robes, there was no telling if they could find their way well enough to avoid suspicion. \u201cThen I will make you a deal, you will tell us the layout of the compound to the best of your abilities and I will not use the dagger on you.\u201d "}, "post-88650": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1547625344000", "message": "The deal wasn't getting any better for the unlucky man as the price for not being poked with the dagger kept rising.\"I... I've only been there once I swear I couldn't tell you in detail!\" he said and glanced around. \"All I know is that there is an outer wall with a gate that's open and if you don't arise suspicion you could probably just walk right into the courtyard. Inside the citadel are many rooms, but it's in the middle where the audience chamber to Lord Volypdaktos is, although I don't know exactly how it looks as I haven't been inside it.\" he answered Myra.Vithkun looked at Myra and raised a brow still holding his blade close to the captive.\"Seems like that's the best we'll get, do you agree?\" he asked Myra.As Myra tried to mentally reach the dagger she would conjure the image of a tormented soul within it. One that had been deprived of love and happiness for so long that it was but an empty spectre devoid of positive feelings and only containing the passions and insatiable and violent hunger for the love it will never have in this form. Such a being was a demon in itself and thus not impossible to kill although the dagger contained a magical barrier that would at least take a concentrated effort to break. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The deal wasn't getting any better for the unlucky man as the price for not being poked with the dagger kept rising."}, "post-88651": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1547626266000", "message": "The exhaustion of holding the act even if in a form not spoken was beginning to play on her, muscles ached and cried for release as they fought the very composure she\u2019d been holding. Reaching backwards she found a chair around the outside of the hall. Allowing some weakness to be seen in the gesture was quite a bit more acceptable than her legs failing her while standing. Plopping down not lightly for the feeling that if she remained upright she would give out on her own she spoke with a tremor, \u201cYes I believe so.\u201d The dagger was not held lightly anymore. It\u2019s anguish reached her calling like a siren impressing upon her the importance of its task, no one felt such desire for love unrequited quite yet but its hunger was relatable. So much so that she wavered on the knifes edge unwilling to undertake the very task. Plunging down into the depths of the ire of the blade involved time set aside for such a task. Demanding as it were she was unwilling to simply do it, if she were not prepared it might overwhelm her. The singular touch provided all she needed to know of it to know that as of this moment she had not faced her own demons well enough to confront this one. Tempted to drop it to the floor for now knowing what she held she felt it more dangerous than before she could not. Too many idle hands were devils playthings, or Volypdaktos playthings. Surely a demon in his own right he was on the cusp of the lands so haunted by those without souls. Clawing his way back into the mortal realms through bloodshed and violence he was seeking a place here, power beyond imagination. If they had not set foot in this village how much farther might he have gone? What might he have gained from these poor souls? \u201cGo get your guards,\u201d she told the mayor, her very expression of unkept frustration enough to say she was not in the mood for argument, \u201cHave them lock these three away and then we can discuss what shall happen from here.\u201d", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The exhaustion of holding the act even if in a form not spoken was beginning to play on her, muscles ached and cried for release as they fought the very composure she\u2019d been holding. Reaching backwards she found a chair around the outside of the hall. Allowing some weakness to be seen in the gesture was quite a bit more acceptable than her legs failing her while standing. Plopping down not lightly for the feeling that if she remained upright she would give out on her own she spoke with a tremor, \u201cYes I believe so.\u201d "}, "post-88687": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1547848450000", "message": "Vithkun looked back on Myra and then gave the cultist a stern frown.\"Stay here.\" he commanded with a calm and cool voice as the man nodded quickly. Giving him a final frown Vithkun sheathed his sword and calmly walked over to Myra seeing her apparent exhaustion his eyes flipping from Myra herself and to the dagger. Vithkun wasn't sure what exactly that dagger was, but he knew it was something that would be considered 'an enemy of the elves' by casting but a single gaze on it. In a swift - almost unexpected move - Vithkun would seek to swipe the dagger out of Myra's hand and if successful he would speak. \"Nobody demands that you help every damned soul in this world - sometimes destruction is the only path some creatures walk.\" Vithkun reminded her sternly although the tone was soft and even soothing. \"This thing is vile and was created by some deep spite of all things benevolent and although I can't see into it's dark heart and soul I know at least this...\" he said and leaned close to Myra with a teasing smile. \"You're too tired to do that..!\" he said and grinned.\"Hopefully my magic can keep it at bay for a while.\" Vithkun said and moved his index finger over its hilt and continuing over the blade careful not to touch it directly. Vithkun was making the inscription of 'Rest' in it and observed as the blade drew what sounded like a sigh and its evil aura calmed down to a minimum. \"There... have a long nap.\" he said to Myra as he wrapped it in a piece of leather. \"My inscription magic works on the mental plane too as well as the physical.\" he said and shrugged, although he was planning on having Myra find out on herself if she had refused to let him have the jewel all the way to the end. Now that it was out in the open he was unsure if it was a genuine trump card anymore. The most dangerous enemies were those who understood how to use your own weapons against yourself - and she seemed like one who had that ability but for some reason Vithkun couldn't but smile to himself. The mayor would nod from Myra's command as he strode outside with determined steps ringing the bell right outside the door calling people together and soon after a handful of men would follow him inside and started tying up the cultists, the main guy still unconscious and the one Vithkun had taken down still cumbered by his iron suit. The guards were quite surprised that he was not reacting to their commands of getting up and even more surprised as they couldn't lift him up themselves before Vithkun - although rather amused - eventually wrote words on his coat that reverted the magic. The guards, who were obviously no professional guards and normally worked as farmers, smiths and the like looked almost taken aback by the sight of the two elves. \"What would you have us do now, Miss elf?\" the mayor then asked Myra almost submissively waiting for new orders.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Vithkun looked back on Myra and then gave the cultist a stern frown."}, "post-88688": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1547849556000", "message": "Nobody demands that you help every soul. His words and his kindness reached depths farther than she imagined even the ocean could in that moment. He was shifting the mantle of responsibility off of her shoulders if even just for a second in order to inform her that it need not rest there at all times. It was a weight as he deftly took the dagger from her sealing it if only for a short moment and entrusting her with more and more of his own world where as she had not been so forthcoming. Annonnai had shown him her capabilities but the discussion of her power was one put at bay for a while now, and one that perhaps might never come but needed to be had. His talk of destruction only served as a powerful reminder of what she was capable of, of what she could do, and should she have chosen to she could destroy the cult with their own lives, use them to destroy them but it was heinous magic and the things it would do to her own soul were akin to the weeping of the blade so disregarded by both. The mayor leaving they were practically alone other than the men from the so called Lord. Ignoring them was simple enough and she spoke low to her companion even going so far as to switch to elvish because she did not fancy being overheard, \u201cIt is difficult to pretend in such a manner, I cannot outright say an untruth and even to make pretense at it is exhausting. It is as if my whole body is against me and the longer I carry it the worse it becomes. I will be alright shortly as my strength does not fade but momentarily.\u201d She reached up taking his forearm in her hand gently when he went to turn away in order to gather his attention, \u201cYou have been nothing short of remarkable, someone I might call friend, I see much in the coming days that will challenge what has been gained between us. I want to let you know before-,\u201d she never got to finish as the mayor returned then insisting on placing her in charge of the bandwagon that she had created. It was poor timing that this came at the end of their journey and yet with the harrowing nature of its call she felt relief. If put off the inevitable. Rising to her feet still weak but the appearance of it no longer acceptable as many had filed within the small room she would look to the major, \u201cWe find out exactly what we are facing,\u201d it was a blanket statement, not one meant to be totally fulfilling in its nature but she had not leaped forth without a plan, \u201cI can be certain that this village is not the only one effected. You should send runners to your neighbors, speak of a willingness to fight now, to rebel. Those who speak well and can influence men, perhaps boosted by something more.\u201d Glancing to Vithkun he might be able to give them more courage. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Nobody demands that you help every soul. His words and his kindness reached depths farther than she imagined even the ocean could in that moment. He was shifting the mantle of responsibility off of her shoulders if even just for a second in order to inform her that it need not rest there at all times. It was a weight as he deftly took the dagger from her sealing it if only for a short moment and entrusting her with more and more of his own world where as she had not been so forthcoming. Annonnai had shown him her capabilities but the discussion of her power was one put at bay for a while now, and one that perhaps might never come but needed to be had. His talk of destruction only served as a powerful reminder of what she was capable of, of what she could do, and should she have chosen to she could destroy the cult with their own lives, use them to destroy them but it was heinous magic and the things it would do to her own soul were akin to the weeping of the blade so disregarded by both. "}, "post-88806": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1548103692000", "message": "Vithkun chuckled and put his hand on Myra's shoulder answering her in elvish too.\"If only this was the case of half my political adversaries in High Haven, I would never have left..!\" he joked with a grin. But these words had a profound and unexpected taste to them. 'The bitter truth' it was called and made the elf almost cringe thinking of how easily he had left when been given the opportunity to search for the Crimson Ascend when it was proposed. Maybe this was all one great escape from the rigorous evaluation that one were always undergoing in High Haven. Such an excruciatingly beautiful place - with fitting and almost unreasonable high standards for perfection. His line of thought however were abruptly torn as she opened her heart to him. Briefly and momentarily, but she definitely did. Vithkun was taken aback by the sudden declaration of friendship but a soft smile was not late to return it although before she could say much more they were being interrupted. What was it she wanted to say before they left? A word of warning?Myra spoke and as she did a single eyebrow raised turned to a frown and Vithkun gave her a sidelong glance as she had spoken and addressed her in the kind of polite elvish that to anyone not familiar with the language would sound like pure praise.\"Surely you don't mean to have these weak men sent themselves into death by instigating them with false hope? They are much better off migrating to the southern plains until all this is over or even complying with the demons.\" Vithkun spoke voicing his disagreement in no unclear phrases. \"Mayor. Tell your people to pack their things and travel south and lay low for a while and hopefully you may return soon.\" Vithkun commanded the mayor and his folk although they humans looked torn between which elf they should listen to most of them glancing at Myra. What was her decision in this?", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Vithkun chuckled and put his hand on Myra's shoulder answering her in elvish too."}, "post-88811": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1548132601000", "message": "The frank openness was regretted in an instant. The moment that he took opposition to her plan pointing out the flaw of these very people. They had been cowards, they were cowards, and they would run like sheep away from the wolf in this instance because they were being informed that it was all they would be. Surely he did not believe them capable of handling this alone. Of changing the fate of so many with only their hands. Entering the convent itself would not be difficult but to keep up a falsehood, to pretend for a long period of time would threaten her. Defending those who were willing to take the first steps on their own was plausible, feeding them a line of running was best but was something she could not rightfully do. She did not believe it and anger welled up within her for a lie she couldn\u2019t utter that needed so badly to be said. Vithkun spoke with such forceful initiative in his pretty words. Bile flared up floating in her throat and filling her mouth with the taste, she swallowed it. \u201cYou would have them run like a dog with its tail between its legs,\u201d she spoke in elvish for disheartening these people was not her intention but she had no strength left to pretend that the acrid tone was anything but what it was, \u201cI have forced them into this position and I would have them see it through. They have every right to rise to their own defense for this Lord intended on taking the very little they have possibly even their lives.\u201d Right hand raised to the opposite shoulder she swung it downward in a dismissive motion. Turning away from him and from the people that expected an answer the very same hand was at her forehead brushing back the palest locks that her people could possess. It shook with the slight she believed he offered and she spoke then in common, \u201cIt\u2019s not safe for you here. Traveling south would give you your best chance until we can handle this.\u201d It was not a lie but an admission she was unwilling to follow through on and she had shut her eyes for a moment to avoid looking at Vith should he try and appear before her, his speed unmatched even by her own the elf light on his feet but his tongue much lighter. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The frank openness was regretted in an instant. The moment that he took opposition to her plan pointing out the flaw of these very people. They had been cowards, they were cowards, and they would run like sheep away from the wolf in this instance because they were being informed that it was all they would be. Surely he did not believe them capable of handling this alone. Of changing the fate of so many with only their hands. Entering the convent itself would not be difficult but to keep up a falsehood, to pretend for a long period of time would threaten her. Defending those who were willing to take the first steps on their own was plausible, feeding them a line of running was best but was something she could not rightfully do. She did not believe it and anger welled up within her for a lie she couldn\u2019t utter that needed so badly to be said. "}, "post-88853": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1548355602000", "message": "Vithkun knew that his taking control of the situation would not have been viewed in such a favorable light, but still he was sure the citizens around these parts were hardly a match for the demonic inhabitants that were able to make such dreadfulness as the dagger one of the cultist had worn. Could they themselves change fate for this land? Vithkun wagered they could if they were able to strike at the heart of their organization - but if not it was probably best these people weren't there to receive the wrath of the demons. Perhaps the dwarves would even stand and protect them. \"I would, for they are clearly nothing but dogs. Are they not wagging their tail to your every word right now? How easily would their spirit not crumble when stable boys with torches and pitchforks met demons with swords sharpened for war? You saw the gate guard, these people care about surviving.\" Vithkun argued trying to stay on the polite side of 'discussion'. \"It is not up to your to make a resistance of people who aren't like that. Drows are a lot more resilient but these are humans.\" Vithkun said his eyes quickly glancing at the mayor and back as he continued in elvish. \"And not the kind of humans that the great kings were made of.\" he added and with a quick smirk returning to a neutral expression afterwards. Vithkun's shoulders relaxed when she asked them to pack and go south and he sighed. The mayor nodded and seemed somewhat disappointed.\"I understand... we aren't warriors anyway that's true.\" he said and glanced at Myra. \"But will you two be okay..? You are going into the demons' lair aren't you?\" he asked rather concerned. Vithkun would not answer the mayor nor would he try to comfort Myra in taking a decision that was her own - although she might regret it.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Vithkun knew that his taking control of the situation would not have been viewed in such a favorable light, but still he was sure the citizens around these parts were hardly a match for the demonic inhabitants that were able to make such dreadfulness as the dagger one of the cultist had worn. Could they themselves change fate for this land? Vithkun wagered they could if they were able to strike at the heart of their organization - but if not it was probably best these people weren't there to receive the wrath of the demons. Perhaps the dwarves would even stand and protect them. "}, "post-88855": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1548357724000", "message": "Vithkun taking control was what would save these people. Myra was brash, unrealistic at times, she carried within her a strong sense of justice that was put into play through bare hands. Generally hers, expecting others to also do the same was folly. The prince pointed this out putting his own opinion into play rather quickly attempting to correct her. His frankness matched her own for once. Turning about her reaction under control and her expression blank enough catching the final smirk that was given at his words. Dogs he referred to them as, loyal little underlings that would react to her every word. Dogs were capable of defending their own rather viciously but most had a bark that never matched their bite. A poor grip when biting would allow someone to fling them right off. \u201cYou\u2019re right,\u201d she spoke in common because continuing to speak in Elvish would alienate the mayor and his people. She approached the mayor gripping his shoulders lightly, \u201cOne day you should learn to fight, gather your own courage, but for now we shall be it for you. Leave a few who are brave enough to bring you news and I shall send them when it is safe for you to return. I cannot rightly give you a time but what we have done today will be noticed. It is best you leave, and quickly, find shelter with someone you trust. Do not take more than you can carry.\u201d Releasing him she looked to Vith, \u201cI would speak to you privately as well.\u201d", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Vithkun taking control was what would save these people. Myra was brash, unrealistic at times, she carried within her a strong sense of justice that was put into play through bare hands. Generally hers, expecting others to also do the same was folly. The prince pointed this out putting his own opinion into play rather quickly attempting to correct her. His frankness matched her own for once. Turning about her reaction under control and her expression blank enough catching the final smirk that was given at his words. Dogs he referred to them as, loyal little underlings that would react to her every word. Dogs were capable of defending their own rather viciously but most had a bark that never matched their bite. A poor grip when biting would allow someone to fling them right off. "}, "post-88857": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1548359822000", "message": "The mayor would nod and scratch his head.\"I hope that days come my elf friend - but most of all I hope we'll have something to return to when we do arrive back...\" the mayor said thinking 'if we arrive back' although not prepared to voice his fear in front of his men and the brave elves. Well chances were that they weren't going to make it, so it some point him and his people had to step up and do something about it. But right now fear was too prevalent and he would follow Myra's advice and have scouts up here to warn him but also send words to the other nearby villages.Vithkun lifted a brow as Myra spoke. Was he right? He didn't expect her to comply that easily although her asking him for a private conversation had Vithkun smirking expecting this to be a clash rather than a discussion. Well she really learned how to hold back and Vithkun was almost proud of her as he turned to her. \"Of course, what would you like to discuss?\" he asked with a faint smile and crossed his arms expecting it to begin.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The mayor would nod and scratch his head."}, "post-88858": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1548360455000", "message": "\u201cThey will,\u201d she assured the mayor. She reserved true smiles for very rare occasions but this felt necessary, even if grim, before she took to leaving the small room expecting Vithkun to follow when she issued a very short, \u201cOutside,\u201d which was clearly an order. Whatever discussion she intended to have it would not be in common for everyone to overhear and they would step far enough away from the fanfare to discuss things privately. Speaking in elven only reassured that it would be even more so. Rounding upon him once he got close enough her teeth were gritted as she spoke, \u201cIt is only your right to believe that you should step in. Soon enough you\u2019ll find yourself in a position where your decisions will be the very word which many follow. I am not against your advice nor the reasoning that you offered but the way you say it. Your highness should remember that he is not in High Haven anymore. You speak so sweetly and yet so wrong in the same moment. You tell them to run but I get the feeling that this journey of your own was your own way of running. Of tucking your tail beneath your legs as you escaped the reality that responsibility was setting in. You claim that my speech is easier to understand than the high borne who you are so accustomed to and yet you treat me as if I am one of them. You speak in riddles and with a tone which I cannot mimic. I will admit that neither of us have been frank with one another but after all we have been through I feel as if I have to be now.\u201d Every word rushed out tumbling and falling over one another as she attempted to get them out. Her elvish was spot on, no accent lingering to betray her origins as if she had learned from a proper noble which made it understandable. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\u201cThey will,\u201d she assured the mayor. She reserved true smiles for very rare occasions but this felt necessary, even if grim, before she took to leaving the small room expecting Vithkun to follow when she issued a very short, \u201cOutside,\u201d which was clearly an order. "}, "post-88860": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1548364109000", "message": "\"Outside..?\" Vithkun answered and frowned. Now he was Myra's dog too it seemed and although she was being immensely rude to Vithkun he followed leisurely a few paces behind her. She was wanting to put quite a bit of distance between them and the townspeople it seemed and as they stopped Vithkun observed believing himself ready for what might come. \"Well what is it that is so important that it cannot be spoken inside the mayors office?\" he said and gave her a casual - some would say arrogant gaze - observing what seemed to be a considerable amount of anger ready to be pulled out. \"I will soon be king you say..?\" Vithkun interjected surprised as this meant Myra was being willing to give up the jewel for him - or at least he knew that this way of speaking was a sign that she was soon prepared to consciously admit it although right not it was probably still not acknowledged by her. \"The way I say it... is wrong?\" Vithkun asked in disbelief chuckling slightly although he kept listening to what Myra had to say although it was with some impatience his foot tapping on the ground and eyes wanting to roll at the accusations that kept coming.\"I am... running?!?\" Vithkun asked and pointed his finger towards his own chest. \"And how is it that you're not running all of the sudden?\" Vithkun said although as he did he realized he did not downright refute what she had said. Had he been running? But from what? He was perfectly content with High Haven and looked to bring back the jewel at all costs so he could become king and rule High Haven with his wife. Sure that was the plan and had he ever strayed from it? Well... maybe a little. A couple of times. The otherwise rude and baseless accusation became a lump Vithkun had to chew on if he was to speak more of the subject and motioning his jaw in an discontent fashion he turned to the next accusation Myra put forward. \"You do not appreciate my tone is that what you're saying?\" Vithkun said and gave her a rather stern look but a smile broke the stone face. \"I forget sometimes that it is you, Myra.\" Vithkun said with a far softer voice. \"In High Haven a blunt speech is the way we communicate with those we deem 'lower' than ourselves, while anything but expressing yourself as eloquently as possible would be an insult to those who you'd consider your peers and elders.\" Vithkun said trying to calm her and scratched his head his voice more lighthearted than before. He did understand why Myra would take offense if she wasn't able to follow - and still he didn't consider her below himself as such. Not anymore at least.\"I guess while we're not in High Haven I should try to communicate on your premises - but if you ever plan on visiting you should really practice the art.\" Vithkun said and chuckled although his joke had a hint of reality to it. Anyone in High Haven hearing her speak like it was now would probably consider her a slave or prisoner, but with her talent in speaking elvish with no apparent accent Vithkun wagered she absolutely could if she would.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Outside..?\" Vithkun answered and frowned. Now he was Myra's dog too it seemed and although she was being immensely rude to Vithkun he followed leisurely a few paces behind her. She was wanting to put quite a bit of distance between them and the townspeople it seemed and as they stopped Vithkun observed believing himself ready for what might come. \"Well what is it that is so important that it cannot be spoken inside the mayors office?\" he said and gave her a casual - some would say arrogant gaze - observing what seemed to be a considerable amount of anger ready to be pulled out. "}, "post-88861": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1548367294000", "message": "\u201cThe art of deception,\u201d even now as he laughed at her misunderstanding she felt the fool. Foolish was what she had been believing that they were friends. Had he forgotten not but two days ago he had kissed her, an effort had went into forgetting the way it felt, the way her heart almost beat out of her chest. Even now it ached because she felt the admonitions of his guilt in denying it were a slight falsehood. Had he found her indecent he would have never leaned forward and per his explanation he had grown to respect her, \u201cThat is all it is,\u201d she spoke softer now unable to be angered at his upbringing, \u201cThey speak that way in order to clearly deny what they might have meant later. Implications and misunderstandings is all it garners and yet you find it beautiful.\u201dThere was no changing his mind, no appealing to his better nature, because she was beginning to see that what she believed to be beneath the surface may have been just a breeze upon the otherwise sunny day of his life. He did not deny that he ran and she did not outright tell him he could have the jewel. After all she had never been informed that he had to prove himself to have the throne or that he was second in line, she was so far departed from the news of the world she did not know. Elves did not spread their gossip in human territories either. \u201cI did not run,\u201d rather frankly she was disappointed in the way he accused her of it. It was obvious in the way she withdrew her anger from earlier and now her voice trembled, \u201cI told you what occurred, that I was cast from my home. You willingly left and even here I am not running from these people. I do not deny them help, I do not see their own injustice and ignore it. I see just how the world seeks to destroy them.\u201dStumbling in her words she finally spoke with her heart on her sleeve, \u201cDo you think I wish to be here?\u201d Biting her lower lip she had gone to far. Bringing up far gone memories of her homeland and of the night she had received her banishment and curse. It was to deny her everything she once held dear. Now what she held dear was very different and it spoke to her in a way she could only see as condescending and yet she would not leave. Both had changed, mostly for the better but some for the worst. He had only confirmed her fears that time would not change everything. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\u201cThe art of deception,\u201d even now as he laughed at her misunderstanding she felt the fool. Foolish was what she had been believing that they were friends. Had he forgotten not but two days ago he had kissed her, an effort had went into forgetting the way it felt, the way her heart almost beat out of her chest. Even now it ached because she felt the admonitions of his guilt in denying it were a slight falsehood. Had he found her indecent he would have never leaned forward and per his explanation he had grown to respect her, \u201cThat is all it is,\u201d she spoke softer now unable to be angered at his upbringing, \u201cThey speak that way in order to clearly deny what they might have meant later. Implications and misunderstandings is all it garners and yet you find it beautiful.\u201d"}, "post-88930": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1548607478000", "message": "Vithkun had tried to wash away what had happened two days ago and now again he tried to laugh it off - convincing himself they were just friends. But again he knew it was only to a degree as they would soon be competing for the jewel - but his respect towards her he could not easily be discarded. \"You have learned much about High Haven without setting a foot there - am I that much of an open book?\" Vithkun asked with a smirk but quickly became sincere again. Myra's words were like a loop around his neck and he couldn't escape it for did he try to speak 'the art of deception' it would just tighten the loop. Instead he tightened his lips and listened to the rest. It was with a lump in his throat that Vithkun spoke again.\"So the elders... did not leave you with any choice then?\" he asked carefully. \"If you say I willingly left well... I believe you have not heard the full story.\" Vithkun said and grasped his hands behind his back. However before he could speak Myra started trembling and he wanted so to embrace her and comfort her, but these feelings would probably not be well received and instead he wondered why she was even here.\"Then why are you here? What have you been promised to make up for all of this? And why you specifically? The elders must have grand heroes at their disposal that could seek out such a thing.\" Vithkun argued and listened but couldn't help but wanting to disclose a little more about his own situation.\"Myra I am not exactly here because this adventure speaks to me.\" he said and took a deep breath. \"My fiancee is currently... not exactly my betrothed. She is my brother's fiancee and it will stay that way since she will only marry the king to be.\" he said and paused with a strained smile. \"Which happens to be my older brother.\" he sighed. \"But finding that jewel could change that and great deeds towards the society of High Haven will tip the scales.\" Vithkun explained and started pacing around restlessly as if he had a heavy burden to bear. \"I'm not even sure why I should be king any longer. Is there any virtue to it? Can I lead High Haven better than him?\" he asked and shrugged. \"I must admit that I went to find the Crimson Ascend because it is tradition for the princes to do everything in their power to get the throne or they might even loose their status in other poeple's eyes if they don't.\" Vithkun said and finally sat down on the ground in legged position. \"What a mess we've gotten into huh?\" he said with almost a relieved smile motioning her to sit down with him too. \"I'm kinda glad I'm not in this alone though.\" Vithkun spoke although his words left his tongue so quickly he didn't have a chance to revise them before they were spoken. But yes, he was happy Myra was here. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Vithkun had tried to wash away what had happened two days ago and now again he tried to laugh it off - convincing himself they were "}, "post-88931": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1548608796000", "message": "The gods of all the worlds around them were about cursed to the point that they might bring down their wrath upon her even if she did not truly believe in them. The stars were her only guiding light now that rested far above both their heads and somehow within both their eyes. Dim now for neither had found the true guidance that they sought for they needed one another and both were too proud to admit the fact. Too tired and uncertain of the path that lay before them and arguing against one another to the point that it was ridiculous. Hiding like a scared child from the truth when all she could do was utter it and while he could avoid it all he wished in spoken word and in thought where as she was denying it in thought only. When he smirked her right hand itched like the day they met, the instinct to smack him overwhelmingly strong for his facade was thrown up again and the frustration that existed in that persona was clear across her face, but he wavered. Enough to make her see him again, truly him, who he was beneath the gilded exterior. It was the man that kissed her before withdrawing as if disgusted within himself. The only words she had trouble comprehending was \u2018not exactly my betrothed\u2019 for it was the main reason that the carefully crafted wall had been erected so high. It crumbled at the center a crack making a large seam that ran straight down as he spoke further about him leading. He paced and she remained still, as if frozen in place other than her chin moving slightly to follow him with eyes like starlight. When he took a seat he motioned to her but no reaction came right away, no true one at least for the tentative nature she rarely expressed was suddenly in the forefront. Taking a seat beside him would have been the position of a friend, one who meant to comfort through words instead of actions. Her earlier words would be betrayed if she reached to far but like him she had no chance to revise the instincts that took hold. \u201cVith,\u201d his name was uttered like a lifeline her lower lip with a slight quake to it as she took the opportunity to go to her knees before him. There was no bowing or gesture of submission, no sign that she was going to bolster him through reverence. No she reached straight forward and leaned in taking him within her arms. Tears dotted her eyelashes but did not yet fall as she held him for as long as he might let her for though she could not admit it she needed this comfort as well. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The gods of all the worlds around them were about cursed to the point that they might bring down their wrath upon her even if she did not truly believe in them. The stars were her only guiding light now that rested far above both their heads and somehow within both their eyes. Dim now for neither had found the true guidance that they sought for they needed one another and both were too proud to admit the fact. Too tired and uncertain of the path that lay before them and arguing against one another to the point that it was ridiculous. Hiding like a scared child from the truth when all she could do was utter it and while he could avoid it all he wished in spoken word and in thought where as she was denying it in thought only. "}, "post-88954": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1548686737000", "message": "Having Myra sit down beside him was the only thing he had planned on happening so as she promptly and with little warning - and frankly a hold he couldn't easily just wriggle out of - he was genuinely taken aback. Not even the mentioning of Vith's name could have earned him of what she did but it was clearly not planned by her either. He felt her closeness and comfort again and it was as if his shoulders and stifled breath was allowed to relax again as a faint smile crept up his cheeks and embraced Myra back. Not a strained and polite one, but just placing his hands on her back letting the warmth transmit to her. This was exactly as enjoyable as it had been last time - had nothing really changed? Vithkun pondered but as he was about to speak something lit up the night sky. This wasn't a shooting star, but it moved like one only reddish in its hue and much closer than any shooting start.Vith stopped his embrace and looked at the thing shooting through the sky its light pulsating and at the most powerful even had the ground take up a slight red color. It surely wouldn't be missed by Myra either as it continued above the city and after a good half a minute it disappeared behind the black cliffs in the distance as the mountain sides glowed dimly red before the shades pulled back over the place like a rug again.\"It... it surely must have been him! Volypdaktos has arrived..!\" Vithkun heard one from the city cry out among a lot of speaking and mumbling while the mayor tried his best to keep the citizen focused on packing. \"If it is... we must leave now.\" Vithkun said and was relieved for having shared this moment with Myra although not all had been spoken that needed to be spoken. It would give him light and hope in his heart if he was to face such a dreadful opponent as it seemed he might.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Having Myra sit down beside him was the only thing he had planned on happening so as she promptly and with little warning - and frankly a hold he couldn't easily just wriggle out of - he was genuinely taken aback. Not even the mentioning of Vith's name could have earned him of what she did but it was clearly not planned by her either. He felt her closeness and comfort again and it was as if his shoulders and stifled breath was allowed to relax again as a faint smile crept up his cheeks and embraced Myra back. Not a strained and polite one, but just placing his hands on her back letting the warmth transmit to her. "}, "post-88964": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1548729269000", "message": "The embrace returned they made a rather odd pair settled there upon the ground, her on her knees leaned over to him and him halfway leaned forward. It was not a proper way for her to do so but as her head rested over his shoulder her arms encompassing them he took her in return and their warmth spread between one another. It encompassed them but for only a short moment spreading thoughts that were not quite impure but not realistic in her mind. Her eyes were not closed and she stiffened as she spotted the light drawing back immediately. Raising to her feet there was no awe but concern at the sight in the sky. Unnatural in color, following it in sight and by turning to keep pace with it as it disappeared she heard the cry in the city. Spreading panic would result in others being trampled in an attempt to escape and calming the people would be first on her mind. \u201cThe mayor needs to get them under control first,\u201d she expressed this with only a slight exasperation at the behavior of the townspeople. Dogs they were called and they would be reduced to that in her mind shortly if they kept up this behavior. Seeking after the comet soon enough they needed to collect the robes that would disguise them. Drawing them over normal clothing with uncertainty on if they would meet others upon the road. Vith was light colored and was given the longer hood. With the towns people assuming she\u2019d been demon like she left hers down for the moment before collection their belongings. Uma had been faithful even through the dark tunnels of the dwarves and even now she would have remained with Myra. Her last passage through this place she had not taken the steed through the darker lands. The horse was admirable in nature and courageous but it was a mistake to allow her into such territory and thus she entrusted her to a family without one, they could make use of her to help transport their children and promised to take care of her in the meantime. Rejoining Vith with her pack across her shoulders and her black cloak slipped beneath the robes she looked no worse for wear than before but a solemn silence followed her until she confirmed their readiness. \u201cI do believe that your steed would be much faster than my own.\u201d", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The embrace returned they made a rather odd pair settled there upon the ground, her on her knees leaned over to him and him halfway leaned forward. It was not a proper way for her to do so but as her head rested over his shoulder her arms encompassing them he took her in return and their warmth spread between one another. It encompassed them but for only a short moment spreading thoughts that were not quite impure but not realistic in her mind. Her eyes were not closed and she stiffened as she spotted the light drawing back immediately. Raising to her feet there was no awe but concern at the sight in the sky. Unnatural in color, following it in sight and by turning to keep pace with it as it disappeared she heard the cry in the city. Spreading panic would result in others being trampled in an attempt to escape and calming the people would be first on her mind. "}, "post-88978": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1548774618000", "message": "It was true the towns people seemed to have been spooked by the development and Vithkun got up standing as he looked to the horizon.\"Who wouldn't be spooked to have something like that happening right next to their home?\" Vithkun asked rhetorically and strut over in the direction of the central plaza of the town where the mayor was trying to calm people. Vithkun cleared his throat and laid a hand on the mayor's shoulder.\"Let me handle this.\" Vithkun said casually and but his expression firm as he raised his right arm to gain the attention of the spooked mob. \"Good citizens!\" he exclaimed with a clear voice seemingly drawing attention quite quickly the murmuring dying down as they seemed to wonder what he was doing. Was this new command based on the recent developments?\"Behold!\" Vithkun said and threw his arms out his cape and hair fluttering about as if a gale had silently caught hold of it and making it dance in the wind. \"My Wondrous Aura!\" Vithkun announced as suddenly white light and then a multitude of other prismatic colors radiated from his being. Indeed elves were magical creatures more in tune with the energies of the stars than the humans who were much more earth bound and this technique was designed to show their magnificence in all its brilliance. The Wondrous Aura would likely awake a multitude of feelings and emotions in the human seeing it ranging from calmness, determination, willpower and love depending on the viewer, although all of them were decidedly positive feelings designed to wash away bleakness and negativity of the moment awakening people to what was important right now. Well it could be used for manipulative ways too but as a pure elf this was a narrow path to walk and one would see your own starlight fade quickly if used against the will of truth and pureness. However still this was a technique that was unique to the pure elves and would not at all have the same effect on drows - quite the contrary for most parts. Drows would likely see it as the peak of pretentiousness from the pure elves and an act of arrogance towards the beautiful starlight to take it upon themselves to shine like that almost pretending to be a star in the process. Definitely a culturally sickening display for most drows but although Vithkun wasn't quite sure Myra would like this display he was unaware that it would have almost counter intuitive effects on Myra depending on how understanding she would be of Vithkun and his methods.However there was no mistaking the effects and there was an almost audible sigh of relief as people seemed to have regained their strength, will and vigor from the display. \"Go and do what you must and leave this to us!\" Vithkun said as his aura shrank and the cape and hair settled down again as he turned to Myra. \"Yes I'll better dress up and we'll be off.\" he said and went to dress in the cloak that fitted him best returning afterwards with a smirk. \"Uma have been a good horse but you're right we should continue on Wind Strider he said and gestured to Myra to stand behind him. If she did Vithkun would snap his fingers twice and as the wind started to lift them both up and Myra would feel the slight breeze that would encompass them there. Vihtkun would quickly wave the mayor over.\"Make sure these people get as far down south as possible and don't worry about us.\" he said as the mayor nodded and got back to his words. \"I guess we're off then, Myra.\" Vith said and turned towards her with a soft smile if only for a brief moment before he focused on the road in front of him as suddenly Wind Stalker flew ahead as no horse outside the divine ones could hope to do making a startling progress. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "It was true the towns people seemed to have been spooked by the development and Vithkun got up standing as he looked to the horizon."}, "post-88980": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1548775493000", "message": "While Myra had been working on handing off Uma it appeared that Vithkun had other plans on how to help the townspeople. Grand sort of plans that he needed no approval for because he did not seek it. He simply did. When he paced off with a demanding presence she had almost been proud of him, before remembering how he\u2019d been when they\u2019d first met. He could be quite insistent on some things but gathering attention was perhaps the one thing he really did not need assistance with. Nor did she inquire as to if he did rather meekly backing away from the fanfare. She wasn\u2019t meant for the light like he was. Speaking of lights she felt it long before she knew what was happening as his \u2018wonderous aura\u2019 spread throughout. In elvish it would have translated to something to do with the stars but in common it was perhaps the best he could do on short notice. Standing towards the back it mattered not her distance because she felt the damned light pulse through her. It did not feel her with reassurance, though she knew that it might should she have opened her heart to it, and it hurt her eyes to stare upwards at the brightness that was him in and by itself. He was a Prince, after all, of the purest elves and in that instant she saw the main difference between them. He was destined for the light while she... she was destined towards the shadows. Making herself open her eyes to the blinding insistence of it his pretentious self while it physically hurt mentally it was destructive. Not because of the wave of termperance he cast but because of her knowing that whatever fate her heart longed for, one she had yet to admit even to herself, it would never be. Their people had split because of the differences afforded to them by fate even if there was so much they had in common. Breaking away once he was finished in order to reflect when he did join her donning darker robes than perhaps he had ever worn in his life she did not speak immediately. Her jaw clenched she did as asked but when the horse rose there was no remaining slightly behind him for with no saddle to clearly separate she went forward her hips aligning with his. Wind Strider would be impossible to remain upon without a grip so she settled her hands around him, this time not so carefully as the last allowing them to rest comfortably. \u201cWe should hurry,\u201d was all she said in response to him saying they should leave, and with haste in her eyes. Once they were free of onlookers she would say to him her forehead resting on the edge of his neck to keep the wind from her eyes, \u201cI can see why they call you pure now.\u201dIt was with a sadness the words left her lips. For instead of bolstering her all his magic did was dissuade her from seeing herself as worthy of much.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "While Myra had been working on handing off Uma it appeared that Vithkun had other plans on how to help the townspeople. Grand sort of plans that he needed no approval for because he did not seek it. He simply did. When he paced off with a demanding presence she had almost been proud of him, before remembering how he\u2019d been when they\u2019d first met. He could be quite insistent on some things but gathering attention was perhaps the one thing he really did not need assistance with. Nor did she inquire as to if he did rather meekly backing away from the fanfare. She wasn\u2019t meant for the light like he was. "}, "post-89023": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1549026579000", "message": "The two elves raced ahead but still the features of the tempest made it so that only little wind turbulence would hit them and as such Vith heard what Myra said loudly and clearly - and it hit him like a punch in the chest. He knew that she might not fancy what he had done too much but the way she rested on her shoulder and the tone of voice told him that she had been struggling just staying within the presence of his aura. Could it be that it had affected her very differently? That the elves and drows were in some ways opposites to each other? It filled Vithkun's heart with sorrow knowing that the darkness the drow possesses could hurt the pure elves just as much as the light the pure elves possessed could be painful to the drow kin. What a joke, what a mighty spiteful joke that had been played upon their races if someone so alike were still inherently harmful to each other when expressing their true selves and for a short while he doubted the benevolence of the stars themselves. Vithkun let the statement hang for a bit before bringing Windstrider to a sudden stop as he turned his head back towards Myra as he spoke. \"It is not our differences that shall keep us apart but our consuming by them. Drow might dictate darkness and pure elves radiate the light, but darkness is comfort and protection too and light also guides and does not only hurt your eyes.\" Vithkun said determined, but his words spoken on a whim - a feeling that right now was a time where they should keep together more than ever before. He let Windstrider race towards the mountains again making quick progress and many miles were covered before they arrived at what looked like a control post - a single spear wielding green skinned demon in a brown coat. The urge was to relief the thing of its head but Vithkun relaxed himself and spoke. \"We left as soon as we saw the calling.\" Vithkun said and looked straight at the demon who returned a skeptical gaze. \"Indeed...\" he said and rubbed his chin inspecting the two. \"And who is the lady?\" the demon spoke with his grim voice.\"One of Lord Volypdaktos' Chosen Ones. She carries his boon - a tormented dagger.\" Vithkun said and blurted out the best lie he could and used the knowledge he had learned about demons - they always had special elite warriors that were respected beyond others. \"So we need to go see him as he expects us. You decide if we are late and must explain why...\" Vithkun said with a cold stare as the demon cowered slightly and looked at Myra. \"Is he right..? Are you the one carrying the dagger?\" he asked Myra, Vithkun relieved that he seemed to have taken the bait and that the dagger was indeed not something ordinary.  ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The two elves raced ahead but still the features of the tempest made it so that only little wind turbulence would hit them and as such Vith heard what Myra said loudly and clearly - and it hit him like a punch in the chest. He knew that she might not fancy what he had done too much but the way she rested on her shoulder and the tone of voice told him that she had been struggling just staying within the presence of his aura. Could it be that it had affected her very differently? That the elves and drows were in some ways opposites to each other? "}, "post-89029": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1549058996000", "message": "The halt in progress caused her to look to him in confusion until he spoke his words clarifying his own thoughts and though they were spoken in aloofness she took him at face value. Maybe it was because she wished to or because she felt she had no choice but it did not assuage her feelings. Her power caused destruction. It tore away life from the seams by covering every inch of the body on the outside and then seeping into the pores and nostrils and mouth until the lungs. It settled there. Taking over the very sacs in which air was drawn in and out of and oxygen was easily available. It would take more than a few simple words to convince her that she was not lesser than him now for in her eyes he was a bringer of compassion and light and righteousness and she had been banished because of the shadows that lived within her very soul. Nodding once the action was forced but necessary as they continued their trek coming upon a small green demon. Hobgoblin like in appearance it radiated a different power. As did Myra. Sensing their passage would be difficult without such she had drawn the dagger from its protection. She left it sheathed within its own shell but his protection would need to be dropped in order to be convincing. Glancing about Vithkun with a rather stern voice, one she usually reserved for admonishing insults upon her companion, she would tell the creature, \"I do but I do not enjoy your questions or your jeering.\" The dagger laid across her outer thigh lightly held by her as if it were nothing, \"A tormented thing,\" she added as if for effect sighing heavily, \"I truly do not need it.\" I do not want it either, she thought, but for the sake of pretending it was the best she could do. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The halt in progress caused her to look to him in confusion until he spoke his words clarifying his own thoughts and though they were spoken in aloofness she took him at face value. Maybe it was because she wished to or because she felt she had no choice but it did not assuage her feelings. Her power caused destruction. It tore away life from the seams by covering every inch of the body on the outside and then seeping into the pores and nostrils and mouth until the lungs. It settled there. Taking over the very sacs in which air was drawn in and out of and oxygen was easily available. It would take more than a few simple words to convince her that she was not lesser than him now for in her eyes he was a bringer of compassion and light and righteousness and she had been banished because of the shadows that lived within her very soul. "}, "post-89054": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1549209288000", "message": "The small creature didn't exactly expect such a harsh tone, but it was one that the superior demons often laid upon the lower ranked ones. The demon took half a step back although it wondered why she would say she didn't need it - that was highly odd. \"W-what did you say? A gift from Lord Volypdaktos not appreciated?!?\" he said taken aback although Vithkun quickly turned to the green thing his sword raised towards its throat.\"A word spoken against one of his chosen ones..?\" Vithkun echoed the hobgoblin raising a single brow. \"Do not think yourself higher than your shoulders...\" Vithkun added and had the edge of his sword slightly pressing towards the demon's throat. \"G-go then. Just go..!\" he said with a trembling voice as Vithkun sheathed his sword immediately. \"Of course. She does not want to waste anymore time on someone like you...\" Vithkun said and rode on, this tone of voice coming quite naturally from the pure elves towards creatures, and even humanoids, they considered below them. However the time he had spent with Myra had forced him to accept it was not always the right voice to use, but right now it had worked splendidly. \"So what is our plan? If we are to sneak into the inner chamber, do we just cross through their main gate or... take a slightly more perilous route?\" Vithkun asked as they traveled along the road that seemed to lead towards the castle after ascending up a hill to the plateau of the cliff where the castle stood. The castle was build black and bitterly on a tall cliff which fall was almost vertical down into the rocky marshland - and these where the only two obvious ways to get there if you had no wings. \"Are we better off trying to scale the cliff and get into the castle or trick our way inside with cunning?\" Vith said and started wondering. \"I feel as if even though we might have tricked that fellow there may be those inside that aren't so easily swayed by harsh words.\" he mentioned and scratched his head. \"I have scaled such a cliff before and my ability allows me to change the rocky wall into clay as to better being able to climb it - unless you have other ideas? We can't know if there is a backdoor into the cliff going up into the castle either before we've checked it out.\" Vithkun mentioned. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The small creature didn't exactly expect such a harsh tone, but it was one that the superior demons often laid upon the lower ranked ones. The demon took half a step back although it wondered why she would say she didn't need it - that was highly odd. "}, "post-89056": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1549217228000", "message": "Caring not to gaze at the creature any longer than necessary she'd raised up slightly in her seat, if only by straightening her posture and ignoring the little creature. It would do well with Vithkun threatening him not so kindly in her stead. Once they were clear of him she would say softly, \"I am sorry you had to think on your feet. I was hoping he might take it as I did not need such a trinket but perhaps it was the wrong play.\" Perhaps or for sure was she wasn't going to bring it up again for it had been spur of the moment as had his rather well spoken reply. He was rambling on what he believed to be the best option. It was unwise to believe they could trick everyone within the castle for she could not speak an untruth and while he was quite skilled in manipulating his tongue in ways that were unbelievably deceptive it was unlikely that he could continue in such a manner once his true aura was revealed. \"I could pass, perhaps but I do not believe that you would for long unless I shielded you and to do so would mean...\" Trailing off she had considered the atrocity if only for a moment. Horrid as it were his safety mattered to her more than her conscience and in that second she decided something he would not appreciate, \"You cannot go in.\"No path was safe for him. Allowing him to enter was asking of him to sacrifice everything for the effect of their dark powers upon his light may have weakened him just as his blinding effect had done to her. Physically she had been quite alright but mentally it was a burden she now carried. The Prince would in his time face many demons, many shadows that seemed all consuming, but with her now he need not face such. Her entering alone if anyone questioned her right she could draw their power from them. Yank the rug from beneath their cries by making them to weak to cry any longer and by doing so prove her righteousness. A dangerous game to manipulate power for power and a roll of the dice as to whether it would drag her under. Her promise to the townspeople weighed heavily on her conscience but perhaps not on his just yet. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Caring not to gaze at the creature any longer than necessary she'd raised up slightly in her seat, if only by straightening her posture and ignoring the little creature. It would do well with Vithkun threatening him not so kindly in her stead. Once they were clear of him she would say softly, \"I am sorry you had to think on your feet. I was hoping he might take it as I did not need such a trinket but perhaps it was the wrong play.\" "}, "post-89112": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1549664994000", "message": "Vithkun smiled rather softly back at Myra. \"Don't worry about it, we need to back up each other now more than ever or it won't succeed.\" Vithkun reassured her deliberately without commenting on her tactic. She might be quite demonic looking but her heart was often soft to the point that her threats weren't too convincing. Vithkun immediately stopped Wind Strider and turned to face Myra.\"I absolutely cannot have you going in there by yourself.\" Vithkun stated with determination in his words but sighed and released the tension in his fists. He knew he couldn't keep her from doing it if she really wanted and shouldn't think so little about her to try it. \"What... did you have in mind then?\" he said trying to turn a frown into a smile. But even if they did agree on this, Vithkun would probably have a hard time not trying to gain entry through other means and paths. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Vithkun smiled rather softly back at Myra. "}, "post-89113": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1549668654000", "message": "\"You are a bright soul, dampening it would be harmful if we did so to where you could go undetected. Drow are an unusual sight here, if I go alone I believe I can convince them of my sincerity. The man in the village attempted to gain my favor to start as well. Besides if anyone questions me I can show them what might be seen as superiority in their eyes.\"Meaning her own talents would be on full blasts, a sight she did not want Vithkun to see but had to express in order to convince him. Settled on the back of the horse it was not an uncomfortable position. His turning was allowed by the horse and though he strained she did not and it allowed her to hide her hands so he could not see them clenched behind her as well. \"By taking the dagger I do not believe there will be many questions, especially if I wield it openly.\" His entry, if at all, would be more complicated and realistically she wished to prevent it to start. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"You are a bright soul, dampening it would be harmful if we did so to where you could go undetected. Drow are an unusual sight here, if I go alone I believe I can convince them of my sincerity. The man in the village attempted to gain my favor to start as well. Besides if anyone questions me I can show them what might be seen as superiority in their eyes.\""}, "post-89145": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1549804093000", "message": "Vithkun rubbed his chin and gave it a thought for a while. It was true that as a pure elf he might be able to be convincing with the lone demon but in the midst of many he might fall short and feel as if his light is dragged from his body the more he has to convince the demons that he was one of them. \"Myra, surely your soul is also in danger of having its light replaced by darkness - just as mine. Don't forget that it is only in skin that you resemble these rabid beasts of the underworld.\" Vithkun argued although he was soon leaning towards letting her have her way. Either she had a plan or the stubbornness would likely be too much to penetrate either way.\"I wouldn't rely too much on the dagger - some inside the fortress might know whom the dagger have originally been handed to and tie the loose ends together.\" Vithkun warned Myra and sighed. \"But I reckon you may both be a more convincing actor and better infiltrator than me, so although I'm reluctant I will have to let you have it your way won't I?\" Vith said with a wry smile. \"I will assist in other ways then.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Vithkun rubbed his chin and gave it a thought for a while. It was true that as a pure elf he might be able to be convincing with the lone demon but in the midst of many he might fall short and feel as if his light is dragged from his body the more he has to convince the demons that he was one of them. "}, "post-89150": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1549812976000", "message": "His argument did not fall on deaf ears for in that moment the decisions that would come later were eased. The stone might fall in his hands after all because of the changes that he had enacted in his beliefs and the fact he showed the ability to change. A talent most elves did not possess. Neither did Drows. In the presence of each other both had shown the capability and it was only through true understanding and balance it could be achieved. Traits that neither possessed before were brought to light shining like stars as two encircled one another. Gravity might eventually crash them together but for now both resisted, heavily, and were straining against all odds. Mouth parting her lips were just barely apart shallow breaths reaching her chest. All she wished for was the gentleness of a touch, a reassurance that he wasn't about to offer. Never before had she craved comfort and this was for a reasoning she could not fathom for his words had been bolstering. Hands dropped down from his chest to her legs as they were paused she could only lower her eyes, \"Probably.\"The single word was not as expressive as her face in that second, \"I need to think,\" she expressed sliding down off of the tempest so she could pace off slightly the dagger still within her hand. Freeing the spirit was necessary but to do so before destroying the order itself was folly. It screamed at her from her hand, overwhelmingly loud in her mind. Letting it fall to the ground and covering her face with her hands she raised them fingers trailing through her hair pulling it loose in the process. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "His argument did not fall on deaf ears for in that moment the decisions that would come later were eased. The stone might fall in his hands after all because of the changes that he had enacted in his beliefs and the fact he showed the ability to change. A talent most elves did not possess. Neither did Drows. In the presence of each other both had shown the capability and it was only through true understanding and balance it could be achieved. Traits that neither possessed before were brought to light shining like stars as two encircled one another. Gravity might eventually crash them together but for now both resisted, heavily, and were straining against all odds. "}, "post-89156": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1549840383000", "message": "There was not much reassurance Vithkun could give right now as he wasn't very sure about this going their way at all. After all some - supposedly ancient - demon deity resided in there and it had fallen upon two quite different elves to stop him. What were the odds of that? Vithkun needed to keep those thoughts in check and he did that best by not initiating emotional communication at present.Vithkun frowned surprised about Myra's reaction. True it was good to think one's plan through before enacting it but it seemed like her thoughts were quite different from those. As Vithkun saw what Myra did he quickly dismounted Wind Strider and paced over to Myra picking the dagger up again. He felt the anguish quite clearly and it seemed to be gaining strength as they neared the fortress of Lord Volypdaktos. \"So one barrier is not even enough...\" Vithkun said and scratched his head concerned. He could make one more, but as they neared the source of power again it would likely not be enough either. He gazed at Myra who seemed in pain and in the spur of the moment he grabbed both her hands and held them before him. \"You are of elven blood and that will protect you..!\" Vithkun said assertively and bit his lip worrying slightly. This was a powerful thing to do and given her descent it could be risky, but Vithkun decided that Myra as an elf damn well had to have the same starlight in her, and he took now only her right hand in his own placing his index finger upon it. This was something that could only be given from one elf to another and only to that one elf ever - but there was no hesitation in Vithkun. \"I will now inscribe the attributes of the starlight above directly into your palm - a ritual normally only for pure elves, but I deem you as pure or more pure than most of my kin!\" he said as his finger started moving in pleasant shapes and bright silvery elven letters came to show for a brief moment before vanishing from sight. 'Protection' it was perhaps the most sacred and powerful word in elvish and with this inscribed in her hand her ability to handle the dagger would be leagues better and last until the stars were once again eclipsing the same place next evening. \"The starlight grants you power directly through your blood now. You feel it right? The rush of feeling at one with the powers of life and creation - however it will wane a bit in a moment.\" he said and looked into her eyes as a grin widened. \"The stars do shine brightly through you, they have accepted your light as their own.\" Vithkun said feeling gratitude that it did and gently closed her hand into a fist. \"The light will protect you but depending on the elf it will manifest itself as unique powers needed when one most needs it. Believe me, Myra, there is nothing impure about you!\" Vithkun said amazed at how easily and gently the starlight was absorbed into her body. \"But don't worry, those fell beasts couldn't see such pure light if they stared for hours!\" Vithkun laughed. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "There was not much reassurance Vithkun could give right now as he wasn't very sure about this going their way at all. After all some - supposedly ancient - demon deity resided in there and it had fallen upon two quite different elves to stop him. What were the odds of that? Vithkun needed to keep those thoughts in check and he did that best by not initiating emotional communication at present."}, "post-89158": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1549842575000", "message": "Myra was not aware that the gift that she was about to receive was one of the most imaginative and kindest one she might ever see in her lifetime. One given only to one other the lifetime that he might spend wishing that he had saved this one blessing was lost to her. His words, however, were felt throughout her soul. Her lower lip trembled when he took her hands within his own gently and agreeably holding them and she almost drew back but his worry kept her still if only for a moment longer. Looking up to him with eyes of brightest blue and meeting his own he kept her in place. More pure, the idea was laughable but her traits had been admirable. She had been proud, selfish, prone to anger, and quick to judgement but she had also been kind, compassionate, selfless, methodical, and shown restraint in situations that even most elders might have never been capable of. She was a woman first and foremost who allowed her emotions to sway her decisions while attempting to bring logic into the equation as well. It was with the sensation of uncertainty and the want to be seen as worthy that she stood there. It was with the understanding that she found his opinion now valuable. That she found herself wanting for the gentle look that he gave her when he believed she wasn't looking. It was with that she accepted his words. The inscription was like a feather at first the gentle motion of his hand upon her skin drawing at it as he wrote the word there. It sunk through with pure light. What had been so light at first was now heavy, it came upon her like a tidal wave sweeping over every cell in her body drawing her upward with its ease and blessing her with more calm and steadiness than the surface of a lake on a cool clear day. One sharp breath broke after his initial inscription. He spoke of the stars, and their beauty shone on her. It made her hair appear like silk, her eyes brighten and shimmer as if they were alight with them, and she flushed beautifully her skin almost glowing. For a moment she was more beautiful than any pure elf could ever wish to be and than any Drow had ever known. For she was filled with that which was most sacred to them and it had been done by a Star that matched her own. No power could be greater than a true bonding and gift given of selflessness that had been granted to the one true equal in this life. Station or no station neither would ever find another where their gifts would never be harmful ever again. \"Just as I could not see you before, but I can now,\" he spoke with such bravado and she with such a tempered manner. He curled her fist and she uncurled it. No hesitation came to her this time as there had not been before. Reaching around him she slipped between his arms. Her comfort earlier had been for him but now this was for her, \"I had thought I might regret my choice of company for this journey and now I know I could find none finer. I will preserver because of you so I might return and see everything we set out to accomplish together completed.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Myra was not aware that the gift that she was about to receive was one of the most imaginative and kindest one she might ever see in her lifetime. One given only to one other the lifetime that he might spend wishing that he had saved this one blessing was lost to her. His words, however, were felt throughout her soul. Her lower lip trembled when he took her hands within his own gently and agreeably holding them and she almost drew back but his worry kept her still if only for a moment longer. Looking up to him with eyes of brightest blue and meeting his own he kept her in place. "}, "post-89184": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1550007254000", "message": "Vithkun looked taken aback by her words about how she couldn't see him before but could now but replaced the look of surprise with a gentle smile. He was quite satisfied with how well she took the gift although it seemed like there was no truly convincing her about being as pure as the pure elves, although Vithkun was quite sure that something like that would be acknowledged later. Well, perhaps if she ever met his kin in person she did not even want to strive for such purity. And to be honest her 'impurity' was becoming a daily delight to Vithkun as he started to enjoy the way she spoke her mind so directly and never assumed an outward appearance that wasn't genuine. He was even starting to understand what she meant by him wearing 'a mask'.As Vithkun was about to suggest that they leave Myra reached towards him and put her arms around him as they stood every bit as close as they had at the dwarves. After a short pause of surprise Vithkun grinned and returned the gesture gently but sincerely putting his own arms around Myra and locking her in tightly. The feeling of warmth and comfort revisited Vithkun although he was surprised that none of the earlier feelings had changed much and it was as if he could stand here for an eternity with Myra. However they didn't have such luxury right now.Myra spoke words of deep kindness and comfort and relaxing the tension in his body he spoke back.\"I'm not always easy, I know this.\" Vithkun said and gently released the hug drawing back if Myra let him. \"I will carry those words with me, for they mean a lot. And I had not foreseen that the words of 'a mere drow' would carry weight that none other could.\" Vithkun joked and chuckled. \"The future holds many unknowns, for now let's focus on getting this task right. I would much regret it if anything happened to you.\" Vithkun said, his words genuine although he tried also to avoid the subject of the jewel that still stood as a parting wall that they inevitably had to face. Together. But not necessarily both climbing it. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Vithkun looked taken aback by her words about how she couldn't see him before but could now but replaced the look of surprise with a gentle smile. He was quite satisfied with how well she took the gift although it seemed like there was no truly convincing her about being as pure as the pure elves, although Vithkun was quite sure that something like that would be acknowledged later. Well, perhaps if she ever met his kin in person she did not even want to strive for such purity. And to be honest her 'impurity' was becoming a daily delight to Vithkun as he started to enjoy the way she spoke her mind so directly and never assumed an outward appearance that wasn't genuine. He was even starting to understand what she meant by him wearing 'a mask'."}, "post-89186": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1550009494000", "message": "He enveloped her with warmth and kindness and for once she was not concerned that his words might be false. She believed them in that instant knowing he was for once not wearing the mask he never realized he had before his traveling with her. Now they both knew of the differences between them and how small they were in number and how little they counted. When she knocked him off his stool with a solid right hook this day looked so far away that either could bring down barriers that had existed for hundreds of years but somehow on the edge of facing demons and heretics they had found friendship. More lingered beneath the surface that neither would draw from it but the more they were around each other, the few slight contacts were warm and true but fleeting. \u201cNot always easy might be an understatement,\u201d she was joking and it was an easy thing to say because of the way she said it. The humor in her voice was rare because it was difficult to be funny when you could not be flippant in a way that wasn\u2019t necessicarly true, \u201cBut worth it none the less.\u201d Taking the dagger she would keep it upon her only if absolutely necessary. Its power had waned due to his protection and she felt the flood gates held back. Relieved she took a deep breath and tucked it back within the leather. Having collected the sheath earlier they had double wrapped it for safety but now she placed it on her belt without the added distraction. \u201cI should go on foot from here, perhaps you will be able to find a way around by the time I reach it.\u201d The description was too vague and without seeing it in person neither would truly be able to judge entry from another point. It would take another half day of travel to reach it meaning she would stop overnight before getting there in the morning but stopping would be dangerous with Vithkun in tow. He could skirt their watchful eye where as she wanted to be seen approaching.  ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "He enveloped her with warmth and kindness and for once she was not concerned that his words might be false. She believed them in that instant knowing he was for once not wearing the mask he never realized he had before his traveling with her. Now they both knew of the differences between them and how small they were in number and how little they counted. When she knocked him off his stool with a solid right hook this day looked so far away that either could bring down barriers that had existed for hundreds of years but somehow on the edge of facing demons and heretics they had found friendship. More lingered beneath the surface that neither would draw from it but the more they were around each other, the few slight contacts were warm and true but fleeting. "}, "post-89238": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1550420225000", "message": "Vithkun gave a content smile as she uttered the words 'worth it', it was nevertheless hard to believe. Not because she had given him a tough time whenever he stepped out of line but because it was inherently new for Vithkun to have his attitude not met with a similar one from the opposing party. \"Yes on foot might be best, then I'll scout around the area.\" Vithkun said and gave har a soft smile although it quickly waned and turned into a determined one. \"Good luck!\" Vithkun said and fastened his hands on her shoulders grinning tightening them in a supportive way before turning around and leaving the area on wind strider. The path for Myra to the castle was rather clear and not too hard to traverse with a plain terrain that had been traveled before. Cloaked and disfigured beings and creatures traveled this road too, but minding their own businesses they did not engage in conversation nor seem suspicious to Myra. The terrain was plain but rocky and the few trees that were still alive stood far from each other and howling winds swept the open land. It was neither hospitable nor welcoming, but had likely been like this from far before Volypdaktos came to power.  ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Vithkun gave a content smile as she uttered the words 'worth it', it was nevertheless hard to believe. Not because she had given him a tough time whenever he stepped out of line but because it was inherently new for Vithkun to have his attitude not met with a similar one from the opposing party. "}, "post-89262": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1550547084000", "message": "\"You as well.\" Separating she took only her belongings, her pack lightened of tack that remained with her horse, and her dark cloak that had been drawn around her shoulders. It was not the warmest but the appearance might add to her appearance and no demon experienced a chill which might drive them to warm clothing. Therefore slight suffering in order to put on a part that was necessary would provide her with one bit of protection. Keeping a steady pace through the terrain as it rose and fell the pathway not always quite obvious but she was able to follow. Ignoring those she passed an air of superiority learned from Vithkun. His earlier behavior was now her model on pretending to be well above her station. A raised nose and eyes that barely batted an eyelash unless it was to casually make someone move with a glance she would arrive with no pomp or circumstance that required recognition but she would make sure that questions would not be asked.  ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"You as well.\" "}, "post-89282": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1550786076000", "message": "The keep of Lord Volypdaktos stood high, mighty and blighted by evil. A wide drawbridge connected the land with the courtyard behind the forty feet tall stone walls that stood above the twenty feet wide moat that had only jagged cliffs to offer the poor demon or cultist that slipped down into it. The stones on the wall were humid although the air was cool and dry - almost as if the very foundation of the castle cried remembering what noble people had once lived here in contrast to the corruption that presently took place. Demons and cultists went in and out of the courtyard and only a few spoke to each other - and did so in a short and concise way, often in commanding voices. On each side of the entrance to the courtyard there stood gargoyles carved in stone their long and gnarly tongues a grim reminder of the nature of the inhabitants and Myra would see that one guy clad and sword, chain mail armor and a grey cloak had stopped half way over the draw bridge seemingly staring right at the gargoyle to the right as it was actively blocking his way. The demons and cultist presently on the bridge started taking notice of the odd behavior as the rest of the fiends here were always in a busy mood and almost never stopped their endeavor unprovoked. Meanwhile Vithkun had rode down beneath the huge cliff where the back of the keep was built despite the razor sharp rocks that would have mauled most travelers and horses after only a few hundred meters. However Wind Strider was from a different cut than normal horses and would trot these places quite easily. Vithkun stared up at the keep eyeing the ghastly looking statues all the way up there. It was at least two hundred feet of palm slicing vertical climbing on those rocks before reaching a small ledge and then... the slick vertical wall of the keep for another forty feet. Vithkun considered himself crafty when needed but he was no monkey and rubbed his chin trying to figure out how to go about it. Scrying showed him no secret doors in the cliffs around the place and he considered what he had to do to reach that place. It might not be very comfortable...", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The keep of Lord Volypdaktos stood high, mighty and blighted by evil. A wide drawbridge connected the land with the courtyard behind the forty feet tall stone walls that stood above the twenty feet wide moat that had only jagged cliffs to offer the poor demon or cultist that slipped down into it. The stones on the wall were humid although the air was cool and dry - almost as if the very foundation of the castle cried remembering what noble people had once lived here in contrast to the corruption that presently took place. Demons and cultists went in and out of the courtyard and only a few spoke to each other - and did so in a short and concise way, often in commanding voices. "}, "post-89283": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1550787230000", "message": "Soaring in height and in expanse the structure once belonged to a wealthy noble. No expenses spared on the design before it had been corrupted the surrounding walls were certainly done on the backs of once slaves. The labor poured into a work of love was not a work of hate that was a seedy as the local pub and certainly seemed cleansed a lot less for at least there someone wiped out the glasses. Approaching it from the front it had been their plan all along to come this way. To bluff their way in. The nature of demons to not speak unless spoken to or necessary would be helpful in gaining entry. From afar she spotted many problems in other approaches but had little time to give them thought for her own problems were about to be faced head on. The drawbridge was wide enough to allow safe passage without pause for the onlooker but conclusions were drawn quickly as to his reason for pause. Everyone found it unusual and he was not wearing the same robes as she. Were the gargoyles magicked to make the entry impossible for non-believers? Stretching out her power to draw on those around her so blatantly would alert many to the presence of the star within it. They were more attuned to realize when one touched their mind. Singling out the gargoyles would require a power of concentration unavailable to her at the moment and therefore not an option to start. One deep breath and she clung to the dagger on her side with all her might. Protection flowed through her, a light shared that glowed from within but only to a certain few who might discern it. The dagger resisted her touch now, hated it, but she needed its influence to pass and therefore she kept it in her thoughts first and foremost. Never pausing along her path she came to the bridge and moved across it ready to face the question of magic and watching all the while for changes in the only one who seemed to not yet be quite ready to enter. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Soaring in height and in expanse the structure once belonged to a wealthy noble. No expenses spared on the design before it had been corrupted the surrounding walls were certainly done on the backs of once slaves. The labor poured into a work of love was not a work of hate that was a seedy as the local pub and certainly seemed cleansed a lot less for at least there someone wiped out the glasses. Approaching it from the front it had been their plan all along to come this way. To bluff their way in. The nature of demons to not speak unless spoken to or necessary would be helpful in gaining entry. From afar she spotted many problems in other approaches but had little time to give them thought for her own problems were about to be faced head on. "}, "post-89309": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1551195009000", "message": "As Myra clenched the dagger she would notice that there was nothing blocking her entrance - neither physically or mentally. The demons had probably thought it pure folly to walk directly into their keep something that wasn't quite far off. The guy in the chain mail armor started walking again as suspicious demons approached him but he waved them away dismissively and continued into the courtyard. The courtyard was a busy place where some demons seemed to be discussing the ongoing events. Their voices were hoarse and jagged in nature, very far from any elven og even human tongue. \"Akrak jarhz tes nof blokkok!\" one demon commanded another demon pulling a small trolley with crates that contained large vials of a kind of liquid. 'Be careful with the fire liquid!' Myra would understand as clinging to the dagger would grant her an odd kind of understanding of their rugged language. The demon pointed to a side entrance into the keep and the other one nodded and dragged the small cart over there. \"Kazzam bek dom blokkok banar...\" the demon said to himself it meaning 'I won't ignite it by chance you fool...' and stopped carefully carrying one crate after the other into the keep and using about a minute before coming out back for the next. The main entrance to the keep was however manned with demons and full plate armor and spears - apparently asking anyone they didn't recognize of what their business was inside the keep. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "As Myra clenched the dagger she would notice that there was nothing blocking her entrance - neither physically or mentally. The demons had probably thought it pure folly to walk directly into their keep something that wasn't quite far off. The guy in the chain mail armor started walking again as suspicious demons approached him but he waved them away dismissively and continued into the courtyard. "}, "post-89311": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1551196847000", "message": "The struggle to pass the barrier might have effected the knight for his appeareance. Taking the same route was going to be challenging but his gaze had risen to the gargoyles. So must hers, following suit there must be some sort of trick, some understanding that had to be passed by those they either found suspicious or that had not been here before. Listening to those beyond the gate she quickly averted her gaze. Following his pointing her luck might just hold out and her pause had been minimal so she diverted hoping that it would only be seen as a momentary errant thought. Heading changed her pace did not, leisurely and unhurried there was no reason to cause alarm. A sense of security in her confidence should she lose the very insistence that this was the right path she\u2019d falter in that which needed to be accomplished. This haven of the damned needed to be dispelled but it required entrance first. She could in theory destroy them through her own magic, by taking their will and suffocating most through the power of the greatest of them. It could destroy her. Previously taking from the kindness of the forest, from small animals, from those who gave willingly as she asked for she spoke to them in the sweetest tongue she knew but these would not be willing subjects. They would claw and crave and seek out her mind as she insisted on destroying them. Mentally she might be a pile of mush but it would save those people. It would save the world from further deprivation. If she was allowed entrance through the side door she did so. Anyone who attempted to catch a glance was met with a slight condescending look but not directed to them specifically as she kept her head raised. She had to find the Lord himself and she had no doubt it would the the gaudiest building within the keep, and the main home. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The struggle to pass the barrier might have effected the knight for his appeareance. Taking the same route was going to be challenging but his gaze had risen to the gargoyles. So must hers, following suit there must be some sort of trick, some understanding that had to be passed by those they either found suspicious or that had not been here before. Listening to those beyond the gate she quickly averted her gaze. Following his pointing her luck might just hold out and her pause had been minimal so she diverted hoping that it would only be seen as a momentary errant thought. "}, "post-89316": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1551201113000", "message": "Few other people or demons stood around the entrance to the keep and as such Myra was able to slip in - and down. The side entrance would take her down completely dark stairs into the basement and using light footsteps she would not be exposed easily. In the basement the demon was unloading the crates onto a few others and it seemed like this place was being used for storage of large amounts of these vials with 'fire liquid'. \"Urak Iee Yakh Dok Banaam Yarch Boon!\" the demon cursed trying to get the crate to fit on top of another. 'Damn it that they are so flammable we can't have torches down here!' the demon said and finally managed to push it into place tip toeing a few meters in front of Myra. At the end of the room it seemed like an iron gate was barring the way to another set of stairs going upwards again. At the same time Vithkun had given up on finding an easy way in - apparently they weren't as stupid as to put obvious secret doors down here for anyone to enter. Instead Vithkun looked up and knew he had to take a risk here and the torrents of air hitting the cliffs and keep wall wouldn't make this much easier. He pointed a finger at his own chest and with an aura of deep concentration he spelled out the word. \"Wind\" as he felt his body become lighter. The wind would move as the wind wanted to, but it would take all his concentration just getting up there without his body being blown off course - mentally adjusting to a quite different form of movement was hard but soon he felt his feet losing contact with the rocky ground starting his slow ascend.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Few other people or demons stood around the entrance to the keep and as such Myra was able to slip in - and down. The side entrance would take her down completely dark stairs into the basement and using light footsteps she would not be exposed easily. In the basement the demon was unloading the crates onto a few others and it seemed like this place was being used for storage of large amounts of these vials with 'fire liquid'. "}, "post-89317": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1551201805000", "message": "Ducking behind one of the crates when she heard them entering it was unswise to remain in sight down here. What other reason could she have to be down here other than sneaking in. No one would want to be around the vials without good reason. Hearing them speak she began hatching a plan. This was what she knew to be Greek fire but the term was not one used in this world, it was dragon fire here. A fire that would burn even stone scorching every but of the world that it could. When they retreated upstairs to bring down more shipments she began looking to see if there were other pathways beneath the palace itself. Generally they would have servant corridors where they could be unseen and reach almost all places within the home. Hoping that the original Lord had insisted on such an expense if it were she had the beginnings of a plan. Perhaps it would not be necessary to alert the lord to her presence to start. If she could spread this throughout, just enough where each one would light the next she could destroy everything almost instantaneously. On her way out she might toss one though the entrance and wait for stragglers but that\u2019s if she even had the opportunity to put her plan into place. Seeking retribution was high on her list for those who had been oppressed but she had the wisdom to know that a full on confrontation would be dangerous. This would be equally so but it would solve the greater problem and no matter how she wished to face the Lord himself she could not reasonably choose that path. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Ducking behind one of the crates when she heard them entering it was unswise to remain in sight down here. What other reason could she have to be down here other than sneaking in. No one would want to be around the vials without good reason. Hearing them speak she began hatching a plan. This was what she knew to be Greek fire but the term was not one used in this world, it was dragon fire here. A fire that would burn even stone scorching every but of the world that it could. When they retreated upstairs to bring down more shipments she began looking to see if there were other pathways beneath the palace itself. Generally they would have servant corridors where they could be unseen and reach almost all places within the home. Hoping that the original Lord had insisted on such an expense if it were she had the beginnings of a plan. Perhaps it would not be necessary to alert the lord to her presence to start. If she could spread this throughout, just enough where each one would light the next she could destroy everything almost instantaneously. "}, "post-89318": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1551205784000", "message": "It was difficult to have anything but an assumption of exactly how flammable these vials were since there were no labels of origin revealing anything further, but the care the demons took was definitely a hint to what kind of mayhem these vials might produce. Assuming they were a part of the offensive towards the southern lands from Lord Volypdaktos and not just lamp oil was a pretty sensible thought - if not foregone conclusion - too. The demon having finished his cursing did not immediately notice Myra his eyesight in the dark only slightly better than that of a normal human being and not comparable to that of the drow. Aside from small vents in an arms breadth leading upwards there were no other connecting alleys to the rest of the keep aside from the one being barred by the steel door - which was of course locked but looked as if it had seen better days. However there was also a serving chute that seemed to not have been put to use in a great many years but would surely lead up and into some kind of kitchen facility whether in use still or not. Myra might fit inside this if agile enough although one would expect a fair deal of dirt hiding in there and perhaps even rats and spiders. At the feet of the cliff Vithkun continued his deep concentration hovering further and further upwards the winds trying to catch him and destabilize his upwards trajectory although at this point only a third of the way up he was able to manage. Now it just had to last and even sudden loud noises might break his concentration and he just begged that he would not be exposed and demons started unleashing arrows - or worse - towards him in his current state. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "It was difficult to have anything but an assumption of exactly how flammable these vials were since there were no labels of origin revealing anything further, but the care the demons took was definitely a hint to what kind of mayhem these vials might produce. Assuming they were a part of the offensive towards the southern lands from Lord Volypdaktos and not just lamp oil was a pretty sensible thought - if not foregone conclusion - too. The demon having finished his cursing did not immediately notice Myra his eyesight in the dark only slightly better than that of a normal human being and not comparable to that of the drow. "}, "post-89319": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1551206343000", "message": "Weighing options the vent shaft was less likely to get her noticed but her plan to bring up the vials was impossible through that method. Piling them beneath the shaft she could drop something into it depending on where it led. That also had to determine how she escaped and how she blocked the entrance as well. It seemed simplicity was not in the cards for her and the hand she had been dealt was going to be much more difficult to align with a true win. Waiting on the demon to turn his back or leave she could only hope that he would do so soon. Keeping herself as quiet as possible she lifted the grate on the wall placing it to the floor. Unafraid of rats and spiders she could scare off one and squash the other. Taking the chute she used one foot on a crate to push herself upward and then used her legs and arms to secure her position to crawl upward. A difficult path and one that might have been noisy had she not been crawling at the pace of a turtle. Shooing away anything that came her way with a quick swipe of her hand she whispered at one spider, \u201cOther way,\u201d in elvish. Whether it cared or not it scuttled off after she blowed at it. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Weighing options the vent shaft was less likely to get her noticed but her plan to bring up the vials was impossible through that method. Piling them beneath the shaft she could drop something into it depending on where it led. That also had to determine how she escaped and how she blocked the entrance as well. It seemed simplicity was not in the cards for her and the hand she had been dealt was going to be much more difficult to align with a true win. Waiting on the demon to turn his back or leave she could only hope that he would do so soon. Keeping herself as quiet as possible she lifted the grate on the wall placing it to the floor. "}, "post-89320": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1551207343000", "message": "The few spiders inside the chute were surprisingly friendly towards her sensing that she was no threat. Being usually aligned with the darker powers of the world truth was that spiders were often neutral stragglers and when used for evil they were commanded by the demons and evil doers to do their bidding and because of their low willpower could often not resist. It was of this reason the spider and its kin had sought refuge in this chute to avoid being commanded or used as play things by the demons. It quickly moved away hearing the elven words spoken by the drow - with whom spiders had normally no qualms with - and let Myra climb further up and even letting her break its web with no fighting back. Somehow it knew that she was here to make things difficult for the demons. If Myra were to lift the lid from the exit she would enter into an old abandoned kitchen section with old wooden chairs thrown about and a few rats cowering a in the corners. As demons didn't cook this had been deemed useless and apparently they hadn't found better use for it. The kitchen had two doors - one unassuming small one in the end and another one that seemed to be the main door leading into the keep that stood quite close to Myra. Scuffling behind Myra the eight legged palm sized ally sensed that the drow sought the 'great disturbance' as the spiders had came to know Lord Volypdaktos and sped over the floor placing itself on the small door in the end of the room. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The few spiders inside the chute were surprisingly friendly towards her sensing that she was no threat. Being usually aligned with the darker powers of the world truth was that spiders were often neutral stragglers and when used for evil they were commanded by the demons and evil doers to do their bidding and because of their low willpower could often not resist. It was of this reason the spider and its kin had sought refuge in this chute to avoid being commanded or used as play things by the demons. It quickly moved away hearing the elven words spoken by the drow - with whom spiders had normally no qualms with - and let Myra climb further up and even letting her break its web with no fighting back. Somehow it knew that she was here to make things difficult for the demons. "}, "post-89321": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1551219878000", "message": "The odd little spiders moving out of her way made her smile. Of all the darkness in this area, in all the oppression in this area, there was some light and it came from the smallest of creatures. It was quite amusing to watch it scramble about but she knew his understanding was greater than most thought. Every woodland creature, the ones in the oceans, and even those in the shadows were more intuitive than humans might ever believe. Elves knew this but they ignored those who were not particularly beautiful. Drow understood it but did not learn from it. Myra was simply the on in between that treated everything with respect no matter how small and she knew it was the reason that it was coming up behind her. Lowering the grate to the ground she did so gently to lessen the noise of the impact. Bringing her cloak about she began to wipe the dirt from it flinging it once before she caught the scurrying of her eight legged friend. Brows raising at it going directly to the door she whispered in elven, \u201cAre you showing me the way little one?\u201d Redonning the cloak she adjusted the clasp before going to the small door. Reaching out her hand to the spider she used her left to gently collect it, if it were amiable, and then the right to open it. \u201cThen guide me,\u201d she asked of it.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The odd little spiders moving out of her way made her smile. Of all the darkness in this area, in all the oppression in this area, there was some light and it came from the smallest of creatures. It was quite amusing to watch it scramble about but she knew his understanding was greater than most thought. Every woodland creature, the ones in the oceans, and even those in the shadows were more intuitive than humans might ever believe. Elves knew this but they ignored those who were not particularly beautiful. Drow understood it but did not learn from it. Myra was simply the on in between that treated everything with respect no matter how small and she knew it was the reason that it was coming up behind her. "}, "post-89326": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1551302673000", "message": "The spider quickly crawled into Myra's hand but jumped out of it again as she opened the door that lead out to a narrow hallway seemingly connecting a food chamber with the rest of the keep. The spider crawled along the floor knowing that the elf desired to meet the Great Disturbance - or at least it assumed as much. The hallway in this section of the keep was seemingly deserted and thus the spider and Myra were able to move quite far into the heart of the keep but passing a few doors the spider let Myra to what appeared to be a dead end - an old armory that contained only rusty swords and dust now. The spider then circled around a spot on the old carpet and if checking beneath the carpet Myra would find a stone trap door that could be lifted and removed by using the ring fastened to it and an iron rod, spear or perhaps even a sword. Vithkun continued his deep concentration and in this he was forced to dig even deeper than he had before as halfway up the gusts of wind threatened to throw his now airy body into the wall potentially shattering him if the spell came to an end. This was the danger of using inscription on one's own body but nevertheless he persisted knowing that he could not do anything but that as Myra probably faced many perils right now. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The spider quickly crawled into Myra's hand but jumped out of it again as she opened the door that lead out to a narrow hallway seemingly connecting a food chamber with the rest of the keep. The spider crawled along the floor knowing that the elf desired to meet the Great Disturbance - or at least it assumed as much. The hallway in this section of the keep was seemingly deserted and thus the spider and Myra were able to move quite far into the heart of the keep but passing a few doors the spider let Myra to what appeared to be a dead end - an old armory that contained only rusty swords and dust now. The spider then circled around a spot on the old carpet and if checking beneath the carpet Myra would find a stone trap door that could be lifted and removed by using the ring fastened to it and an iron rod, spear or perhaps even a sword. "}, "post-89328": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1551304084000", "message": "Wherever the little fiend was leading her it was rather insistent, it hopped down quickly and laid out a trail through the back corridors. So her assumption had been correct that there were servant hallways but they were not beneath the halls but alongside of them. She was sure if she strained she might be able to hear the words spoken beyond these very walls but it was reassuring that they were not loud and perhaps it was meant to keep the servants from uttering something a visiting lord might not need to hear. Being led into the armory the dead end was not amusing but the follow the leader game she\u2019d been playing with legsy, as she had already nicknamed him, had seemed deliberate. Following him but a few steps forward his circling was peculiar and with nothing above the floor coverings she had to assume there might be something below. Peeling back the carpet to reveal the clasp she would attempt her regular strength at first but it seemed not quite able to budge. Glancing around she took the length of a spear sliding it though. Using a leverage system and some wiggling she got the edges up and gettin her hands beneath them she pried it upward. Laying it back gently in place she looked to the littles companion figuring his journey would not end so abruptly. Wondering after Vith his path was certainly more complicated. Her still seemed only beginning as she was contemplating bringing up the vials if possible and spreading them throughout if these halls were spread throughout the palace itself. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Wherever the little fiend was leading her it was rather insistent, it hopped down quickly and laid out a trail through the back corridors. So her assumption had been correct that there were servant hallways but they were not beneath the halls but alongside of them. She was sure if she strained she might be able to hear the words spoken beyond these very walls but it was reassuring that they were not loud and perhaps it was meant to keep the servants from uttering something a visiting lord might not need to hear. "}, "post-89329": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1551306219000", "message": "The spider would no longer continue along with Myra and stayed on this side of the tunnel. It knew that getting any closer to the demons it risked being manipulated by their dark powers and also it knew that the tunnel would lead the elf directly to the place of the disturbance. As Myra would continue through the tunnel, having to crouch through the passage and navigate carefully in the darkness, a hundred feet further down she would feel a dead end. A wooden panel that was able to be pushed in and she would see light from the little cracks and feel warmth coming from the other side. Putting her ear to the wooden panel she would even be able to hear a soft crackling of fire on the other side. All the while Vithkun was continuing upwards and now floated parallel to the keep's walls hoping soon to reach the top of the wall and make it inside from there. Up here he could undo the inscription and once again become a little less reliant on the torrents of wind. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The spider would no longer continue along with Myra and stayed on this side of the tunnel. It knew that getting any closer to the demons it risked being manipulated by their dark powers and also it knew that the tunnel would lead the elf directly to the place of the disturbance. As Myra would continue through the tunnel, having to crouch through the passage and navigate carefully in the darkness, a hundred feet further down she would feel a dead end. A wooden panel that was able to be pushed in and she would see light from the little cracks and feel warmth coming from the other side. Putting her ear to the wooden panel she would even be able to hear a soft crackling of fire on the other side. "}, "post-89330": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1551306908000", "message": "Guidance offered ended at the start of true danger, understanding his reluctance to go further she placed trust in his innocence, and in his neutrality. Only the latter could only go on so long. It would be foolish to think it might last longer than where he felt comfortable leading. Making her way downward she crouched when necessary using her hand to guide her passage above her. Ending at the wooden door she pressed her ear to it. A fire beyond it she heard no voices. Questioning whether her path was wise or not to enter without knowing of another\u2019s presence might be dangerous. Either way she was in a short hall with little options and less ability to swing her Morningstar. Knocking on the door lightly like a raven would should no one answer she would open it but a few inches to get a better glance. Should someone answer she could pretend it was the scuffling of a rat and back up a few paces the dagger already close at hand. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Guidance offered ended at the start of true danger, understanding his reluctance to go further she placed trust in his innocence, and in his neutrality. Only the latter could only go on so long. It would be foolish to think it might last longer than where he felt comfortable leading. Making her way downward she crouched when necessary using her hand to guide her passage above her. Ending at the wooden door she pressed her ear to it. A fire beyond it she heard no voices. Questioning whether her path was wise or not to enter without knowing of another\u2019s presence might be dangerous. Either way she was in a short hall with little options and less ability to swing her Morningstar. "}, "post-89332": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1551341531000", "message": "The knocking resonated slightly but there were no answer and the fireplace burning in the room in the other side was the only apparent noise that came from the other side. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The knocking resonated slightly but there were no answer and the fireplace burning in the room in the other side was the only apparent noise that came from the other side. "}, "post-89335": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1551367451000", "message": "Instinct told her that entering was against her normal better judgement. Need provoked her to slip the door open but a few inches to peer through it and if in that crack she saw nothing she would slip through standing to full height. Her hood still drawn up over her hair and only her eyes reflecting the light of the fire she glanced about. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Instinct told her that entering was against her normal better judgement. Need provoked her to slip the door open but a few inches to peer through it and if in that crack she saw nothing she would slip through standing to full height. Her hood still drawn up over her hair and only her eyes reflecting the light of the fire she glanced about. "}, "post-89339": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1551379428000", "message": "As Myra slowly removed the back panel the part of the room she would notice it had no one inside it. The hearth was burning as if just stoked and with comfy leather chairs in front of it. If opening it a bit more she would notice a desk with an empty chair behind it and several bookcases lining up along the walls. The room felt warm and cozy and behind the desk was a large window area allowing one to peer out of the keep. Little seemed to be indicating this to be the room where an arch demon would take to living. But to check out the room further she would have to dare to step into the room completely. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "As Myra slowly removed the back panel the part of the room she would notice it had no one inside it. The hearth was burning as if just stoked and with comfy leather chairs in front of it. If opening it a bit more she would notice a desk with an empty chair behind it and several bookcases lining up along the walls. The room felt warm and cozy and behind the desk was a large window area allowing one to peer out of the keep. Little seemed to be indicating this to be the room where an arch demon would take to living. But to check out the room further she would have to dare to step into the room completely. "}, "post-89340": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1551379703000", "message": "Creature comforts is what described the room. Comfortable and warm and surprisingly human in appearance. Had the spider misjudged her intentions? Had she not seen a seam or a door she might have otherwise taken. Curiosity got the best of her and she slid the panel aside completely. Entering her placed it back only lightly not covering her escape but with only faint firelight it would not be noticeable. Lowering her hood she glanced about walking towards the fire the chill in her bones dispelled from it. At any moment she might be caught and she needed to quickly take stock of what the small details could tell her. The desk was her next target.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Creature comforts is what described the room. Comfortable and warm and surprisingly human in appearance. Had the spider misjudged her intentions? Had she not seen a seam or a door she might have otherwise taken. Curiosity got the best of her and she slid the panel aside completely. Entering her placed it back only lightly not covering her escape but with only faint firelight it would not be noticeable. Lowering her hood she glanced about walking towards the fire the chill in her bones dispelled from it. At any moment she might be caught and she needed to quickly take stock of what the small details could tell her. The desk was her next target."}, "post-89343": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1551392237000", "message": "It was quite human in looks and in fact here was little to suggest demonic activity here. On the desk Myra would find a large map spread out and the different villages singled out with markers as one would with a battle plan. A list lay on the desk too and with well shaped human letters it outlined the different steps they would take. For example the scare tactics with the cults and recruiting in towns but also how a line of force would be used with demon soldiers and the explosive vials in the basement. However behind the desk and the chair was a great arching panoramic window that gave a great view over the area behind the keep from the cliff the castle was built upon. But at this point a very strange pointy eared 'bird' seemed to block the view slightly hovering upwards with its back towards the great window and head downwards. Like a small snowflake working towards gravity.\u00a0Outside a gust of wind had suddenly taken hold of Vithkun and only by concentrating hard - and flapping his arms a little - did he manage to keep on track although his back was now turned towards the keep and head mostly hung downwards. Cursing in elven it helped little and now all he was able to do was to somewhat sustain that upwards trajectory a short while yet before reaching the top of the wall and he was currently unable to notice Myra on the other side of the glass facade. Right after Vithkun had hovered past the window a noise came from the single door in the room and a creaking sound came from it telling Myra it was about to be opened and people or creatures were to enter.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "It was quite human in looks and in fact here was little to suggest demonic activity here. On the desk Myra would find a large map spread out and the different villages singled out with markers as one would with a battle plan. A list lay on the desk too and with well shaped human letters it outlined the different steps they would take. For example the scare tactics with the cults and recruiting in towns but also how a line of force would be used with demon soldiers and the explosive vials in the basement. "}, "post-89344": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1551399060000", "message": "The map drew her attention like a fly to honey, pouring over the plans noting the steps that had been personally witnessed it appeared they had begun to interfere in the nick of time. Battle plans to destroy farmers and villagers who had only pitchforks to fight with. The depravity of those within these walls made her hands itch for vials down below. No matter how long it took she would take them through every shaft and follow every possibility in order to spread them throughout. It would burn all to the ground. Glancing upward only when her attention was caught by movement she saw a rather pale man floating in the air. Vith. Unable to knock on the glass for fear of breaking his concentration watching him flap like a chicken to regain his balance was rather amusing. Stifling a laugh her hand upon the desk she shifted one of the papers while she was leaned over it. He flew above it going to the walls above. Finding him was more dire now than before as there was no certain signal to alert him to her location, or the plan. The distraction of the floating elf had led her to ignore sounds outside of the door itself. Her luck had only held out for so long as she calculated the time necessary to get to the panel. It would have to be done silently, quickly, and she was at least ten feet away from the thing itself. Cursing her ineptitude in that moment she had very little choice in the matter and diving for her exit would alert everyone. Hoping that she could subdue whoever entered, believing that this was not the lords quarters after all, she would pull her hood above her face. Standing slightly off to the desk and hoped she might bluff her way out. Inform whoever entered she had been sent up here to deliver news. Hoping that the door had not been locked she heard no key so it was unlikely. Bluffing wasn\u2019t the smart choice but it was her only choice for if they were looking for one who came through a hidden door they would check for others. She might escape but Vith might not. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The map drew her attention like a fly to honey, pouring over the plans noting the steps that had been personally witnessed it appeared they had begun to interfere in the nick of time. Battle plans to destroy farmers and villagers who had only pitchforks to fight with. The depravity of those within these walls made her hands itch for vials down below. No matter how long it took she would take them through every shaft and follow every possibility in order to spread them throughout. It would burn all to the ground. "}, "post-89379": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1551647821000", "message": "In through the door stepped a cloaked humanoid and with a deep sigh he pulled the cloak back and walked tired towards the desk before suddenly noticing Myra standing there besides the desk. The guy looked like a middle aged guy with slightly grey hair and a few wrinkles in his face. \"Wh-what are you doing in here?!? This place is strictly off limits for both demons and you cultists!\" he said his voice as surprised as it was scolding as he quickly drew his hood over his head again and his voice suddenly changed to a low pitched and menacing one. \"You're a drow aren't you? I didn't think I had any drows among my loyalists... Are you new?\" he said and rubbed his chin looking at Myra skeptically. All the while Vithkun had managed to flail his arms and turn around and as he passed the top wall he managed to grab hold of the railing and pull himself down on the bulwark as he inscribed into himself the word 'Dispel' feeling his usually mass return to his body. As he regained balance he felt the presence of others and looked left and right. Two demons closed in on him spears raised - maybe he could take them out without too much screaming and pursue Myra. Knowing her she was quick to put herself in trouble. Mostly because she was skilled at getting there. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "In through the door stepped a cloaked humanoid and with a deep sigh he pulled the cloak back and walked tired towards the desk before suddenly noticing Myra standing there besides the desk. The guy looked like a middle aged guy with slightly grey hair and a few wrinkles in his face. "}, "post-89380": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1551648408000", "message": "Stoic in her position, the exhaustion in his face told her that this decision was perhaps not the best, he appeared human in appearance but could it be true? Certainly his guise was enough to make her believe that he was so. Lowering her hood when he raised his it was to show her as demure her features at best hardening to a look of irritation. Was this the great leader that she had been informed of? The leader of the demons and cultists that he had so hardily drawn together. Surely there was more than met the eye and while he met her eyes she forced a coy smile coaxing it from deep within, \"My lord, I did not mean to interrupt,\" the truth for being spotted was well below the general plan, \"I simply wished to speak to you privately.\" Twisting and forming things to her needs was problematic. Vithkun was entangled in his own mess the royal pain regaining his title by ruining what little she had done to go unnoticed. Hanging outside the window with his arms swinging about wildly had drawn her attention. Ignoring the steps up the stairs, which had not been silent in order to reaffirm he was not about to fall. Breaking the window would not have been the only thing she might have done to save him. As it were now she was scrambling for ideas and coming up with nothing that was pleasant. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Stoic in her position, the exhaustion in his face told her that this decision was perhaps not the best, he appeared human in appearance but could it be true? Certainly his guise was enough to make her believe that he was so. Lowering her hood when he raised his it was to show her as demure her features at best hardening to a look of irritation. Was this the great leader that she had been informed of? The leader of the demons and cultists that he had so hardily drawn together. Surely there was more than met the eye and while he met her eyes she forced a coy smile coaxing it from deep within, \"My lord, I did not mean to interrupt,\" the truth for being spotted was well below the general plan, \"I simply wished to speak to you privately.\" "}, "post-89381": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1551650061000", "message": "\"Speak with me... privately?\" he grumbled. \"It is pretty bold of you to step before me without getting direct permission.\" he said and put his hands behind his back slowly pacing back and forth observing Myra. A wry smile formed inside the cloak and jagged teeth shone in the light from the hearth. \"Well I've decided to reward your courage anyway, drow. Speak and let me know how I can... fulfill your ambitions.\" the cloaked man said and crossed his arms expectant although suddenly two shadows came racing down past the huge window with a speed where you could hardly see what or who it was and the man turned his head that way seeing it out of the corner of his eyes. \"Birds..?\" he said and shook his head. \"Now what did you want?\" he asked sounding slightly annoyed by the odd disturbance outside the window. Meanwhile on the bulwark Vithkun sighed and looked down over the ledge. \"At least going down that way they won't hinder my stealthy approach...\" he smirked and whispered to himself eyeing a door a little further ahead that would no doubt lead him down - but how did he locate Myra?", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Speak with me... privately?\" he grumbled. \"It is pretty bold of you to step before me without getting direct permission.\" he said and put his hands behind his back slowly pacing back and forth observing Myra. A wry smile formed inside the cloak and jagged teeth shone in the light from the hearth. \"Well I've decided to reward your courage anyway, drow. Speak and let me know how I can... fulfill your ambitions.\" the cloaked man said and crossed his arms expectant although suddenly two shadows came racing down past the huge window with a speed where you could hardly see what or who it was and the man turned his head that way seeing it out of the corner of his eyes. "}, "post-89386": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1551675586000", "message": "Bold as well to sneak into your compound and specifically find your quarters, if you even are the Lord of this man and not a farce set in place for the real one, also assuming he wasn't a mind reader as her thoughts ran rampant. Inhibitions raised instead of lowered it appeared he was susceptible to flattery and a smile even if he was unaware of her true loyalties. He was also distracted easily. Catching it out of the corner of her eye as well she certainly did not believe it was birds, well perhaps a bird but a rather large blonde one. Somehow the thought made her smile despite herself, the genuineness of it could be taken for pleasure at his agreement to listen to her even if it had not been intended for such. His facade cracking if only momentarily she needed to latch on, and alert Vith of her presence here if at all possible. Neither seemed particularly simple tasks. Reaching out for Vith's mind might alert this man of her intentions and the narrow focus would be uncomfortable. Taking the chance of it not alerting him was too dangerous. Besides the strain would appear on her own features. The two following him would also have an inkling should she do so as they were in the way and her tagging through them to reach him with her power would make them feel faint as she'd ravaged them for the strength to keep pushing without bringing out the darkness. Her cheeks flushed slightly in frustration her face reddening.\u00a0\u00a0\"I wished to see if the rumors were true,\" wished was a strong word for it and her mind was rebelling against the implication of it so she jogged her memory for a better way to present what was and wasn't a falsehood, \"Your keep is impressive, your followers powerful and frightening to lesser men, but you Lord, with all beneath your feet,\" the words were like bile in her mouth and it would not allow her to utter anything kinder than what she'd said so she decided to take physical action sitting back against the desk. Her hands spread her cloak revealing her slender figure beneath it. She wore her bracers on her forearms but no real armor. High boots, loose leggings tucked into them, and a coarse shirt that generally hung on her figure. The way she leaned back was to make it fall on her breasts outlining just how full of a figure she carried, \"you must be powerful.\" Or have someone powerful backing you. Basing her words off of assumptions there had to be more than the eye could see. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Bold as well to sneak into your compound and specifically find your quarters, if you even are the Lord of this man and not a farce set in place for the real one, also assuming he wasn't a mind reader as her thoughts ran rampant. Inhibitions raised instead of lowered it appeared he was susceptible to flattery and a smile even if he was unaware of her true loyalties. He was also distracted easily. Catching it out of the corner of her eye as well she certainly did not believe it was birds, well perhaps a bird but a rather large blonde one. Somehow the thought made her smile despite herself, the genuineness of it could be taken for pleasure at his agreement to listen to her even if it had not been intended for such. "}, "post-89408": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1551795264000", "message": "\"So... you're not one of my cultists I presume? It is quite a feat getting inside.\" the man said and listened to Myra - apparently not too concerned about the intruder that stood in front of him. The man nodded when she complimented his keep and his frightful army. \"They do what their master tells them to do. In this world those who exists to spread fear is only governed by someone even more fearsome.\" he said and smirked slightly in appreciation of the elf's deduction. The man seemed slightly surprised but now also wary of the elf - to show such a figure at a time like this was something of a manipulative move. Reminded him of a lure. \"I am indeed powerful - in the hierarchy of fear there is no one above me.\" he said self confidently and straightened his back in pride as he observed Myra. \"Are you here to join me or kill me I must ask?\" he said almost politely. \"If it is the latter I must insists that we speak before you act too rashly.\" he said as he paced towards the door picking up a key and locking it before returning to Myra. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"So... you're not one of my cultists I presume? It is quite a feat getting inside.\" the man said and listened to Myra - apparently not too concerned about the intruder that stood in front of him. The man nodded when she complimented his keep and his frightful army. \"They do what their master tells them to do. In this world those who exists to spread fear is only governed by someone even more fearsome.\" he said and smirked slightly in appreciation of the elf's deduction. "}, "post-89416": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1551885557000", "message": "Unable to outright lie the damned magic sealed beneath the bracers she wore it was the reason she kept her forearms covered so well. It was meant to be a constant reminder because anytime she looked down she was able to see them. Now they burned like fire tingling her skin as she opened her mouth attempting to tell a falsehood. Her voice failed her and the pain was punishment. The struggle inwardly was not displayed outwardly even if her legs felt weak from the pain. \"And what if I say it is the latter?\" Getting out this part it was not an admission of guilt because she was attempting to place curiosity into it. Her leaning back had seemed too far the way his mouth parted not one of appreciation but surprise as he regained control of himself in return. Lowering her chin to appear submissive might have been best before someone supposedly so powerful. Manipulating was not her strong suit. Vithkun would have been more well suited to attempting this sort of consort but unfortunately he was too fair of a creature for it to be believable. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Unable to outright lie the damned magic sealed beneath the bracers she wore it was the reason she kept her forearms covered so well. It was meant to be a constant reminder because anytime she looked down she was able to see them. Now they burned like fire tingling her skin as she opened her mouth attempting to tell a falsehood. Her voice failed her and the pain was punishment. The struggle inwardly was not displayed outwardly even if her legs felt weak from the pain. "}, "post-89417": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1551897607000", "message": "The man in the cloak narrowed his eyes studying the elf - her mouth opening but not telling him anything at first and only when she did it was not really a clear answer. But who would tell Lord Volypdaktos to his face that they intended to kill him? Especially in the middle of his keep with his allies crawling about in the halls and adjacent rooms only a call away. However he was not going to call them unless she proved a formidable foe that could threaten his own life. No, he needed to know although her eyes told him a great many things that he recognized. \"Then I would ask why and how you gathered the determination to do so. It is a dark path - yet to you it must seem honorable. You're sure you're not just here to join my ranks?\" he inquired as he moved over to the window sighing and looking out his back completely exposed to Myra. \"Even drows do not kill without a sound reason. Do you not have anything to lose?\" he asked Myra. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The man in the cloak narrowed his eyes studying the elf - her mouth opening but not telling him anything at first and only when she did it was not really a clear answer. But who would tell Lord Volypdaktos to his face that they intended to kill him? Especially in the middle of his keep with his allies crawling about in the halls and adjacent rooms only a call away. However he was not going to call them unless she proved a formidable foe that could threaten his own life. No, he needed to know although her eyes told him a great many things that he recognized. "}, "post-89418": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1551898792000", "message": "I have nothing left. The words were on her mind, on the tip of her tongue, but in that instant they would not be uttered. Could not. What had changed so I thoroughly that what was once truth was now not. Her mind certainly believed it it at first until it conjured an image she could not justify. That was not hers and the respect she once so wanted had been gained but not in the way she expected. Her mouth firmly shut as he spoke, as he walked up beside her and looked out the window, as he inquired about things in a way that was most certainly human. He knew the truth no matter how she disguised it and for once the fighting spirit that was once so prevelant was failing her, \u201cI would ask why a Lord such as yourself would care for one of your underlings in such a manner as to inquire. Do you truly give everyone that sort of attention? Surely you have guards you can summon to make sure that it did not occur and even if you believed I might join your ranks I see no reason you should attempt to be so persuasive on your own. You have no idea what I am or am not capable of or if I am even worthy. You have only the darkness of my skin to judge upon and it is not so forthcoming as you might believe.\u201d", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "I have nothing left. The words were on her mind, on the tip of her tongue, but in that instant they would not be uttered. Could not. What had changed so I thoroughly that what was once truth was now not. Her mind certainly believed it it at first until it conjured an image she could not justify. That was not hers and the respect she once so wanted had been gained but not in the way she expected. Her mouth firmly shut as he spoke, as he walked up beside her and looked out the window, as he inquired about things in a way that was most certainly human. "}, "post-89419": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1551900586000", "message": "His heart jumped to his throat clenched his fists and turned around facing Myra. Withdrawing his hood determinedly his facial features reverted to the ones Myra had seen first: The image of a middle aged man. He sighed again and sat down his head hanging slightly with eyes downcast. \"It's been so long and I think I'm ready to gamble.\" he said and gazed at Myra with a kind of expression that almost begged. \"You're the one who has no idea what I am and what I am capable of. Like you my skin is just a mask - a facade to save my own hide.\" he explained while pinching his arm. \"I trust that if you have really come to avenge some wrongdoing that you have the determination to fulfill it - at least that is the impression you leave me.\" he said his voice already quite different than before - more somber and quiet. He then removed his right glove and pulled off a ring from his index finger and placed it on the table before Myra. It had a lion's and a crows insignia on it. \"I am the former lord of the keep - and I am the new lord, somewhat against my will though. My name is Constantine Hermouth\" he said and awaited the drow's reaction. That surname was indeed the name of the duke that had ruled this northern area until ten years ago. Had Myra studied the dwarven annals they would surely have mentioned his name. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "His heart jumped to his throat clenched his fists and turned around facing Myra. Withdrawing his hood determinedly his facial features reverted to the ones Myra had seen first: The image of a middle aged man. He sighed again and sat down his head hanging slightly with eyes downcast. "}, "post-89420": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1551901442000", "message": "The shift made her uncertain and turning slightly where her right hip was settled upon the desk her arms crossed beneath her bosom watching them speak. Deciding whether to believe him or not he was not unbelievable but the inconsistencies with what she had heard were rather alarming. The ring laid down upon the desk was the correct sigil for the house that he claimed to be from,\"A lion and a crow is correct, but not truly a sign that your words are true but saying that I choose to believe you,\" she moved her right hand to push back a piece of hair behind her ear, \"If you are truly here against your will then do you truly wish to follow the plans you have made for your followers?\"Wrong or right, she had not lashed out immediately when he entered. Waiting and listening would not have been possible a few weeks prior. Listening to Vithkun on the road had taught her patience and the value of listening even if he did not say much worth hearing. It was as if he liked the sound of his own voice more than the importance of the words. Most elves were the same. Myra, while appreciating the ethereal beauty of elven and drow voices, was not terribly fond of blasting her own unless there was something needing to be said. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The shift made her uncertain and turning slightly where her right hip was settled upon the desk her arms crossed beneath her bosom watching them speak. Deciding whether to believe him or not he was not unbelievable but the inconsistencies with what she had heard were rather alarming. The ring laid down upon the desk was the correct sigil for the house that he claimed to be from,\"A lion and a crow is correct, but not truly a sign that your words are true but saying that I choose to believe you,\" she moved her right hand to push back a piece of hair behind her ear, \"If you are truly here against your will then do you truly wish to follow the plans you have made for your followers?\""}, "post-89452": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1552212482000", "message": "The one claiming to be Constantine Hermouth cast his eyes down and paused before answering.\"No of course not. I never meant something like this to happen... The demons came one day and because the only power I have is that of illusion I thought by making myself appear and act like on of their greatest horrors I could save my own life and allow my servants and staff to flee but... alas I did not manage to step down from this piedestal and now it has gotten a bit out of hand...\" he said and sat down his face in his hands. \"I cannot say that I do not regret it, but until now I have had to act as they expected to keep them believing I was the 'Lord Volypdaktos' that I had claimed firstly. I have been eagerly awaiting some slight opportunity to make things right, but the burden has just increased the more subordinates that have joined my cause.\" he said resignedly lifting his gaze towards Myra. \"What can even be done anymore?\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The one claiming to be Constantine Hermouth cast his eyes down and paused before answering."}, "post-89460": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1552253504000", "message": "Believing him was her first choice that she needed to make. What man could truly claim and turn down the power that he had been offered, still he seemed repentant and wished to make things right. Was it but illusion again that he so thoroughly claimed that he wished to do right by those around him? Uncertain of his willingness she still needed to find Vithkun as well. Her second train of thought involved the higher demons. Certainly they would not have been fooled by his illusions, or maybe they played along because he got the lesser of them in line in a way that was well arranged and his method of planning was quite astute. Glancing to the maps that lay by her side she knew what she had to do. \"Let's say that I believe you,\" it was gerrymandering to start but possible, \"If I had a way to destroy all that existed here. If I could topple that which you have built up but it would require your help would you do so?\" The first manner of business was finding Vithkun, once he was found and safely stored in his office here she could set about laying the charges. If she were not of suspect by the Lord then she could move freely. For he would have his highest officers know of her presence and tell them that she sought to make preparation for their final onslaught. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Believing him was her first choice that she needed to make. What man could truly claim and turn down the power that he had been offered, still he seemed repentant and wished to make things right. Was it but illusion again that he so thoroughly claimed that he wished to do right by those around him? Uncertain of his willingness she still needed to find Vithkun as well. Her second train of thought involved the higher demons. Certainly they would not have been fooled by his illusions, or maybe they played along because he got the lesser of them in line in a way that was well arranged and his method of planning was quite astute. Glancing to the maps that lay by her side she knew what she had to do. "}, "post-89461": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1552255137000", "message": "The man was rubbing his chin looking at Myra proposing his plan. \"Asking of me to destroy my home - my family's home through generations... that's a hard one to swallow.\" he said and got up from the chair supporting himself with his palms on the desk. \"But even if I wanted to - and I might even realize that it is the only way - there is no way you could do that is there?\" he asked. At the same time Vithkun navigated towards what felt like a distant remnant of Myra's aura which was severely clouded by the evil inside the place. The place was like a labyrinth and as he moved forwards with more haste than stealth it was inevitable that he alarmed a few demons although these ones were lesser and quickly dispatched from the realm the elf's magic still superior to that of the minions. Running around he opened doors and walked up and down hallways believing Myra to be right on the other side of every corner - sometimes feeling as if chasing a shadow, as if something or someone concealed her exact location. As Vithkun opened one of the doors he was met by a ghastly sight though - a literal pile of human bodies. Probably been dead for years but the stench was overwhelming and he closed the door to the room quite quickly the rummaging of his stomach almost getting the better of him. A brief pause later he composed himself and continued his relentless search for Myra hoping the demons would not start finding the dead demon bodies he had left behind and establish a more coordinated search for the culprit. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The man was rubbing his chin looking at Myra proposing his plan. "}, "post-89462": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1552255904000", "message": "Playing a dangerous game of I'll show you mine if you'll show me yours it was not a time for bluffing. Discerning that she could destroy him if necessary and if he betrayed her the hand that was settled on the desk itched to reach for her weapon. \"Your decisions have caused suffering that you cannot begin to imagine. The people beyond these walls have felt its darkness, seen no hope within their short lives. You have snuffed out what joy there once was. Selfishness now does not become what must be done. You have but little hope or choice yourself. I can do what I say or I can dispatch you and do it anyways,\" the threat was not unlikely fire in her eyes, \"But I would prefer you lead a path of retribution and penance with what little chance you have left.\"The concealment of her aura was unknown to her but the boundaries of the room certainly were. Attempting to reach outside of it now she felt a barrier. Perhaps one of illusion instead of true power but there none-the-less. Rising up she glanced out the window in which revealed only part of the world behind him. Vith was in danger the more she lingered and waited upon him here he faced a worsening of his current condition. Finding him was of utmost importance, and keeping him safe. She would need his assistance in porting up the vials of the liquid as it were. If she were to step outside of the office he might be able to find her then, his spell still lingering, but she needed to make sure he would not ring the bell for his own salvation the instant she did so.  ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Playing a dangerous game of I'll show you mine if you'll show me yours it was not a time for bluffing. Discerning that she could destroy him if necessary and if he betrayed her the hand that was settled on the desk itched to reach for her weapon. \"Your decisions have caused suffering that you cannot begin to imagine. The people beyond these walls have felt its darkness, seen no hope within their short lives. You have snuffed out what joy there once was. Selfishness now does not become what must be done. You have but little hope or choice yourself. I can do what I say or I can dispatch you and do it anyways,\" the threat was not unlikely fire in her eyes, \"But I would prefer you lead a path of retribution and penance with what little chance you have left.\""}, "post-89463": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1552257810000", "message": "The man sighed again listening to Myra - as if he relived the hardship she was talking about. \"I have felt the darkness on my own body - day after day for the last many years. Still could you really free me and this land from it?\" he asked his voice now blending with that of the one Myra had heard when he wore the hood. \"Could you free us all... from the darkness that lives inside me..?\" he asked keeping Myra locked with an intense gaze as if begging her to help while intensely wishing for her immediate and violent destruction. \"I'm not lying to you - only there was one demon that didn't buy my scam and saw right through it - Lord Volypdaktos!\" he said as his voice turned to the hoarse and chilly one that was far from human. \"And then I took this shell of a human along with his thought, memories and abilities for my own amusement but you know what, drow? I might want a body like yours instead - the skin color matches my soul a little better!\" he said as his face turned scaly green with red eyes and his now scaled hands grew sharp talons. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The man sighed again listening to Myra - as if he relived the hardship she was talking about. "}, "post-89464": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1552258245000", "message": "The instant that his voice had become darker her morning star had slipped from her side and was firmly implanted in her right hand. He wasn't even finished with his pretty little speech before she was rather forcefully swinging it like a baseball bat towards his face, \"Yeah well, you can't have it.\"Swinging for all she was worth this bastard had played on her heart strings attempting to get her to abandon good reason. No human could live without food, water, and the place was empty of it. His words had been hollow but rang true, his appearance had been mirrored and shifting. His room was guarded too well for it to simply be an illusion. If her mind could not penetrate the outer edges of it and push through what she knew to be false than it was real. Annonai had taught her one thing when she was within his presence about physical barriers at the very least. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The instant that his voice had become darker her morning star had slipped from her side and was firmly implanted in her right hand. He wasn't even finished with his pretty little speech before she was rather forcefully swinging it like a baseball bat towards his face, \"Yeah well, you can't have it.\""}, "post-89466": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1552288333000", "message": "As the mace came swinging towards the avatar of Lord Volypdaktos' heard he brought up his scaled palm and blocked it - catching it as if it was a ball. The scaled skin seemed to have properties that very much seemed like that of steel armor.\"Are you sure, that you want to kill the lord's physical body? I mean he was a perfectly innocent victim and he might still be able to be 'saved'.\" he said and chuckled. \"Although of course that would be nearly impossible for you since you need to bring his soul back into this body or destroy the phylactery I made for it - in which case of course he dies. \"But I'll tell you what, if you donate your own body I will make sure to bring the lord back to life unharmed and free to leave.\" Volypdaktos' bargained with Myra jagged teeth presenting her with less than comforting smile. At the same time Myra would feel the presence of the knife she carried that much more intensely the barrier feeling thinly veiled enough that she could once again hear its voice clearly in her heard. \"B-briiing meee baaack...!\" it insisted in a tortured voice. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "As the mace came swinging towards the avatar of Lord Volypdaktos' heard he brought up his scaled palm and blocked it - catching it as if it was a ball. The scaled skin seemed to have properties that very much seemed like that of steel armor."}, "post-89467": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1552289111000", "message": "The monster before her was just that, monsterous. His appearance may have been overlooked if his soul was not as blackened as the soot left from a fire. Heart surely full of ire and mirth at her weak attempt at maiming him was blocked without much left to it. Drawing out the soul from the knife would have been doable at a later time given enough concentration. Its cries now were ignored for the fate of the region overtook the wants and needs of one man. His life may be sacrificed in all that needed to occur. Should she not be able to save his original body she would settle for making sure he was exhumed from the knife. \u201cWhatever is left of his soul is surely as broken and bastardized as yours is,\u201d she spat this, keeping her right hand twisted around the base of the morning star her left brough forth the dagger. Raising it defensively she held it in an almost amauterish fashion not used to such weaponry. Since this demon had trapped the original soul within it it was doubtful it would even work. Myra\u2019s white hair gleamed her eyes flashing. Mistakes had been made in her approach but now with no choice left before her she tentatively reached out her power to the demon itself. Revealing her ability was a poor idea but he had settled on obtaining her as it were and if he did so he would quickly discover it. His power was a gleaming brightness as she dragged upon it and should he have hers it would mean the end of more than just the countryside here. A battle of wills would have to be won, she had to prevail. No matter the cost. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The monster before her was just that, monsterous. His appearance may have been overlooked if his soul was not as blackened as the soot left from a fire. Heart surely full of ire and mirth at her weak attempt at maiming him was blocked without much left to it. Drawing out the soul from the knife would have been doable at a later time given enough concentration. Its cries now were ignored for the fate of the region overtook the wants and needs of one man. His life may be sacrificed in all that needed to occur. Should she not be able to save his original body she would settle for making sure he was exhumed from the knife. "}, "post-89468": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1552291659000", "message": "The laughter of Lord Volypdaktos quickly turned to a frown when he saw the dagger. Having trapped the original Lord Hermouth inside the dagger he had been a plaything for the high demon - but seeing the soul and body of the lord this close was not something Volypdaktos felt comfortable about.\"H-how did you you get that?!?\" he hissed and spat and as he felt the reaching for his soul he knew that he might be in a situation that could prove difficult for him to handle. With a hoarse roar he turned around and had intended to escape through the door as he managed to release himself from Myra's grasp this time by acting quickly as soon as he felt the threat. However as he aimed for the door it suddenly burst open as silvery elven flames enveloped it and a a shadow stepped in - sword drawn and cloaked in the very same flames. \"So you're hiding in here... Myra..!\" Vithkun said and looked at Myra with a smile although he quickly reverted to being sincere as he looked at Lord Volypdaktos. \"You're an ugly fellow - were you scared by a girl?\" he joked as the demon once again hissed. It was clear to Vithkun that Myra had found the right guy and despite the humor in Vith's words he felt how serious a situation he had stepped into but knew he couldn't let that demon leave the room. Hopefully Myra knew how to get rid of him once and for all. \"If what it takes is me killing both of you and turning you to ash - the so be it!\" Volypdaktos said as his talons suddenly grew and shaped themselves into small swords. At this time Myra would feel a pull in her left hand as if the dagger had a will of itself and would notice that the barrier was all gone. \"S-stab him..! Bring me back - into h-his body!\" the dagger pleaded as the tortured voice started reminiscing that of Lord Volypdaktos when he was still acting as Lord Hermouth. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The laughter of Lord Volypdaktos quickly turned to a frown when he saw the dagger. Having trapped the original Lord Hermouth inside the dagger he had been a plaything for the high demon - but seeing the soul and body of the lord this close was not something Volypdaktos felt comfortable about."}, "post-89470": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1552315994000", "message": "Dagger held directly before her the first sign that vengeance was at hand for the displaced lord was the fear in the new Lord\u2019s face. Clearly uncomfortable at the sight of it even without knowing that the soul was of Hermouth it was obviously disconcerting to the demon. Therefore she dropped her mace, the blunt weapon heavy and unweildy towards him as he\u2019d already proved, and resorted to moving the dagger into her right hand which was dominant. \u201cYou shouldn\u2019t let your playthings go so easily Volypdaktos.\u201d Refusing to give him any true title it was with grit and determination of a hard won battle that she faced him. That was until Vithkun opened the door and like Voly earlier her heart leapt into her throat. He was safe, not for long considering the damned creature was growing out his talons into a weapon of means. His smile was returned but his distraction could not be missed as the dagger cried out for her assistance. Voly attempting to escape meant that his back was turned to her. She figured if the dagger normally could drain the soul of any creature by piercing flesh, even the smallest cut, that it would only take landing a solid hit. The creature taller than her she was leapt forward attempting to drive it in with a backhanded swing into the thigh. Like a tennis player she put oomph into the way her body twisted in the motion. Should she miss her back would be exposed. Therefore she could not miss for the thing she found she had to live for had arrived in that instant. His distraction might be their saving grace and she could not waste such a glimmer of hope by having spoke in return to cause him to look back. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Dagger held directly before her the first sign that vengeance was at hand for the displaced lord was the fear in the new Lord\u2019s face. Clearly uncomfortable at the sight of it even without knowing that the soul was of Hermouth it was obviously disconcerting to the demon. Therefore she dropped her mace, the blunt weapon heavy and unweildy towards him as he\u2019d already proved, and resorted to moving the dagger into her right hand which was dominant. \u201cYou shouldn\u2019t let your playthings go so easily Volypdaktos.\u201d "}, "post-89473": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1552330979000", "message": "Volypdaktos had quickly ascertained that he hated the elf that stepped into his office even more than the one that was already present. \"Ash is a merciful end for you, alferkin!\" he exclaimed using the demonic name for the elven kin taking a step towards Vithkun with his sword like claws bared and pointed towards the pure elf. Vithkun raised his sword the silvery flame extending from the sword much like the wings of a dragonfly and he was ready to retaliate with whatever force was necessary... However as Vithkun prepared to strike the foe he noticed that Myra suddenly threw herself towards the demon from behind and Vithkun seized his attack in the last moment - scared of the purifying silver flames perhaps harming Myra. With the high demon moving towards the elf with the terribly shiny and pure looking elven flames wrapping around his sword and thinking only to quench them he was unaware of the vicious attack from the back and as Myra jammed the dagger into the demon's thigh, Volypdaktos let out a terrified scream as the blade connected - and not only connected but went deep into his bones as if it was warm butter. The blade vanished into the demon's body leaving Myra only with the hilt in her hand. Volypdaktos screamed and cursed causing Vithkun to block his ears with his hands as some words were so rugged and sharp that he feared his ears starting to bleed.Falling to his knees the scales seemed to fade from his skin and the same did the sword like claws as suddenly a hump started growing from his back before a different scaled like creature phased out of the back of the lord falling down onto the stone floor and the expensive carpet. Serpentine body scaled all over with alligator legs and human like arms and the face of a lizard - the true form of Lord Volypdaktos had shown itself much against its will. Lord Hermouth had fainted from the exhaustion and Vithkun raced over to the passed out man dragging him away from the demonic creature.\"There is still a pulse..!\" he said to Myra feeling Hermouth's veins at the throat. \"What do we do about 'that' though?\" Vithkun asked although he might already know the answer, although he would follow any advice or hint Myra had learned to easier dispatch of the beast. The lizard and serpent like creature bared its teeth looking menacingly at the two elves as if it tried to decide which one to kill first. However at this point - although strong in his natural form - he was weakened from the sudden expulsion from his host, yet not any less angry.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Volypdaktos had quickly ascertained that he hated the elf that stepped into his office even more than the one that was already present. "}, "post-89474": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1552333975000", "message": "Distraction led to gain and gain led to separation of the creature and the prior lord that had been established in the place itself. Him being alive was but barely a consolation prize for what state of mind might he be in when he awoke. Still pleased by the outcome if there was some small mercy she could grant him she believed that the demon spoke as he might, that he spoke wanting to return his home to what it had once been and if that was not possible to then destroy it in order to bring peace to the land. Hermouth might be the healing it needed in order to reestablish the region itself, if he was capable. \"We kill it,\" was her simple answer once the demon was separated. Scooping her mace off of the floor her anger knew no bounds. He had tortured an innocent soul, buried it within the knife forcing it to become something so depraved of his former self. He had brought people to their knees in worship or fear. He had maimed and slaughtered and forced his way to the top scrabbling and fighting for his position. Now he would fight for his life. Myra had no greater hatred than in an oppressing force such as this. He would not block her swing this time for she put her concentration into pulling the very life from him, weakening him as she approached, and holding the mace with two hands she once again swung. This time it was for all she was worth with a punting sound coming from her mouth as she strengthened her diaphragm and let loose intending on breaking his arm, his ribs, and caving in his chest cavity with the very arm she pushed into it. All while demeaning him by using his own strength against him suffocating his very lungs. It was with pure hatred she mimicked the power of Annonai if only for an instant. Stripping the land in the manner he had done was unacceptable but this was fire against fire and her flames roared with all the power of hell behind them.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Distraction led to gain and gain led to separation of the creature and the prior lord that had been established in the place itself. Him being alive was but barely a consolation prize for what state of mind might he be in when he awoke. Still pleased by the outcome if there was some small mercy she could grant him she believed that the demon spoke as he might, that he spoke wanting to return his home to what it had once been and if that was not possible to then destroy it in order to bring peace to the land. Hermouth might be the healing it needed in order to reestablish the region itself, if he was capable. "}, "post-89475": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1552337669000", "message": "It was a simple thing and Vithkun - after ensuring that that heartbeat of Lord Hermouth would not suddenly vanish - put the lord at a safe distance on the ground behind him and got up facing the demon along with Myra. To kill it required perhaps a lot of effort but this effort was still something Vithkun knew about and it didn't seem by Myra's words as if the lizard demon was unable to be killed by regular means. Volypdaktos prepared his attack as acidic bile gathered in his mouth cavity ready to be spat at the drow target that had so insolently stabbed him - but something wasn't right because he just couldn't. Volypdaktos felt his breath stifled as the same power that he managed to escape from before had taken hold of him suffocating him and draining his life force. The attack having failed the next thing was unavoidable too as the vicious attack of the mace made contact with Volypdaktos' chest caving in both scales and bones causing severe inner bleeding as well while sending the demon scrambling back coughing up blood and bile. Vithkun had already seen was Myra was up to and had flanked the demon and with a determined stab his silver flame cloaked sword broke the skin of Volypdaktos' shoulder pushing him towards the window as blood started gushing out from the wound in the shoulder. \"Even if you somehow survive - this wound will never heal.\" Vithkun said with a wry smile. \"But I'm taking no chances!\" Vith said as his sword, still stuck in the demon's shoulder, started flaring up as the demon screamed and tried to removed his sword by force, but unable to touch it as it burned the flesh on its hands. With a astute kick in the gut the glass window shattered and the demon crashed through it finding himself looking at a fall of a hundred feet before having a date with the jagged and sharp rocks down below the would surely rip his body asunder and send him back to the abyssal pocket of oblivion he once slithered out from. Vithkun sighed and turned around to face Myra a hesitant smile only forming because he saw that she was not hurt.\"Are you... alright?\" he asked as he took a single step towards her although unable to gauge if her having to use her power had drained her. Was he to embrace her now - or did she prefer to just press on? Vithkun hesitated as he did not know what was right to do in the moment. \"You used... 'that.'\" Vithkun added concerned.  ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "It was a simple thing and Vithkun - after ensuring that that heartbeat of Lord Hermouth would not suddenly vanish - put the lord at a safe distance on the ground behind him and got up facing the demon along with Myra. To kill it required perhaps a lot of effort but this effort was still something Vithkun knew about and it didn't seem by Myra's words as if the lizard demon was unable to be killed by regular means. "}, "post-89478": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1552352712000", "message": "Horrifying to realize that your own breath had been turned against you, that the bile you had been summoning to spit as acid was choked down  and kept within your body. Your nostrils seemed free to breath on their own but he could not. The Drow had driven him into the darkest pits of need for to breath was the one thing most never had to think about. Now he had to very much consider how it might occur in those few moments. Then her Morningstar collided. Spikes tore into bone and sinew and drew back scales and crushed the very bones of his rib cage making him further hindered. His soul, while barely existent, was darker than any humans ever had thought to be. Darker than anything she had attempted to collapse in such a manner before. It was to disdain of the fact she did not end it but to Vithkun\u2019s good nature that he be the one to manage a killing blow. Should she have ended it by draining him and killing him with his own life force it might have immutably changed her, and not for the better. Even so as the glass shattered, shards flying outward and sealing themselves away in the carpet, she felt the immeasurable depth of her actions. How far had she been willing to go against such a creature. To what depths would she take her own depravity in order to ascertain his end? Her expression was one of tranquility. Nothing shown in the few moments that lingered after her gaze following the way of the so called Lord. Bright eyes had been turned to pure white, shielded as if she were blinded and yet she saw so clearly in the moments she had called upon her heritage as ashborn. His power now fueled her own as she had not contained it this time. She had allowed it the flesh it craved, gave in to her desires, used the power as it was meant to be used. Without constriction it did not make her weary for her earlier restrictions had been what drew her own force away. Not in her life but in the magic within her. Hearing the brighter one of them speak she barely acknowledged it but to look his way. Hollow in appearance the iris came down from white to blue and carried with it how frightened she was of herself. \u201cI shouldn\u2019t have,\u201d voice but a whisper she felt if she spoke louder it would crack. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Horrifying to realize that your own breath had been turned against you, that the bile you had been summoning to spit as acid was choked down  and kept within your body. Your nostrils seemed free to breath on their own but he could not. The Drow had driven him into the darkest pits of need for to breath was the one thing most never had to think about. Now he had to very much consider how it might occur in those few moments. Then her Morningstar collided. Spikes tore into bone and sinew and drew back scales and crushed the very bones of his rib cage making him further hindered. His soul, while barely existent, was darker than any humans ever had thought to be. Darker than anything she had attempted to collapse in such a manner before. It was to disdain of the fact she did not end it but to Vithkun\u2019s good nature that he be the one to manage a killing blow. Should she have ended it by draining him and killing him with his own life force it might have immutably changed her, and not for the better. "}, "post-89487": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1552427514000", "message": "Vithkun took another glance at Myra and another step towards her. The white eyes didn't scare Vithkun, he knew she was no demon although some may find the trait to call upon such images. Barely did Myra speak before another couple of soundless steps were taken and he held her in his arms. Firmly enough that she would know he was there for her, but also so softly that she would feel that the compassion was not forced. \"You did well.\" Vithkun said with a reassuring voice and smiled to himself. He was sure to be her support if she needed it and right now it seemed as if she did. However the moment was not allowed to linger as Vithkun heard clawed feet and hissing noises coming from the stairs outside. His minions were on their way and frankly Vith wasn't sure that Myra could safely draw upon her powers again for the time being.\"They are coming, we have to avoid them!\" Vithkun concluded and looked around the room. \"How did you get in? The front door?\" Vithkun asked as he hurried over and put the lord over his shoulder intending to carry him the way he was. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Vithkun took another glance at Myra and another step towards her. The white eyes didn't scare Vithkun, he knew she was no demon although some may find the trait to call upon such images. Barely did Myra speak before another couple of soundless steps were taken and he held her in his arms. Firmly enough that she would know he was there for her, but also so softly that she would feel that the compassion was not forced. "}, "post-89489": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1552445304000", "message": "How quickly had they progressed from indifference to understanding, he crossed but a portion of the floor here but mountains within both their minds. They had embraced before, in the village, as her own way of showing her support. Of giving him what physically both were stunted at emotionally. Even now as he took her within his arms she instinctively reached back to do the same. Had it been so long since she had been embraced like this. Never had those words been uttered to her. Their sincerity reached her in a way that broke through the mire of her actions. \u201cIt was necessary.\u201d The noise at the door made itself very insistent. Scratching and clawing on the wood that was guarded by his own protection spell. With his death immenent as he crashed along the rocks it would be but moments before they could break the lingering magic. \u201cThrough here,\u201d rushing she removed the panel and ushered him through. Following behind him she pulled it shut, tightly, and made sure that it would not be visible again from the other side. They would know their lord did not find his end from his own means. It would be near impossible for them to crawl down the vent shafts with the prior Lord in tow but finding a length of rope in the kitchen they could lower him down with her leading the slide and making sure he did not get stuck in the vents. While they worked on their task she quickly told him about the never ending fire. The one that would burn along stone and scorch it. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "How quickly had they progressed from indifference to understanding, he crossed but a portion of the floor here but mountains within both their minds. They had embraced before, in the village, as her own way of showing her support. Of giving him what physically both were stunted at emotionally. Even now as he took her within his arms she instinctively reached back to do the same. Had it been so long since she had been embraced like this. Never had those words been uttered to her. Their sincerity reached her in a way that broke through the mire of her actions. \u201cIt was necessary.\u201d "}, "post-89490": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1552462815000", "message": "Vithkun looked at then panel wondered for a moment how well, he would be able to carry the lord inside that, but would of course not give up that easily. He followed Myra, this time dragging the lord behind him in his arms through the secret escape tunnel as he heard how the pawns of the late Lord Volypdaktos rushed into the room - confused, scared and aggressive. This would have to be a better alternative that to fight through so many and especially when trying to protect the lord. The corridors seem to continue for a while and Vithkun nodded as Myra told him about the 'never ending fire'. He had heard about it before, but really he had little time to ponder such things now although he did wonder where they had gotten such things as demons were poor artificers and alchemists. Soon the arrived at an abandoned kitchen and Vithkun looked down the chute that Myra said they needed to go down. \"Yeah we can't just drop him.\" he said with a wry smile as they found rope. Vithkun offered to lower him down the chute as Myra stood ready at the bottom to receive the unlucky lord. \"Who is this guy anyway? Some fool that Volypdaktos possessed?\" he asked Myra as he also climbed out the hatch and into the cellar with the many vials of explosive liquid.\"Do you have a plan of how we ignite these? I have my fire inscription I can use but then we have to be quick - I would recommend that I summon Wind Strider and that we are already on the go when I make the inscription.\" Vithkun said and rubbed his chin thinking the plan over. \"You wouldn't know how to make a delay would you? I have heard that some use fuses, but I know little of that. It would give us a clear advantage.\" Vithkun argued as he struggled to get a good overview of in the pitch black darkness. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Vithkun looked at then panel wondered for a moment how well, he would be able to carry the lord inside that, but would of course not give up that easily. He followed Myra, this time dragging the lord behind him in his arms through the secret escape tunnel as he heard how the pawns of the late Lord Volypdaktos rushed into the room - confused, scared and aggressive. This would have to be a better alternative that to fight through so many and especially when trying to protect the lord. "}, "post-89492": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1552488672000", "message": "Myra helped drag the body of the Lord when necessary and caught him with an agile grace when he came through the chute avoiding hitting his head upon the edge of it before placing him down gently. Taking care with his body he was still the Lord in the area, he would be recognized, and if he could be mentally healed he could handle the scaring in the land and the hearts and minds of the people. \u201cHe was the Lord of this place, of these lands.\u201d Settling him against on the crates they did not have long to enact a plan and with Vithkun unable to see, something she did not notice right away as her vision was clear as day, she was busy breaking into one of the crates. Glancing back to see him squinting she smiled at the sight. Crossing over to him she took his hands in hers, \u201cWe cannot light a fire down here, come with me.\u201d Guiding him to the door she entered through she cracked it just slightly, enough light for him to be able to see and for her to not be blinded. \u201cWe can trail them,\u201d she suggested, \u201cThrough the door and by the main entrance. Just enough to where when one lights it shall light the others. It will be dangerous but with good aim just one shattering will be enough to quickly blow the whole thing. Keeping everyone inside will be the next challenge.\u201d He\u2019d been seen, and followed, killing the Lord would not have alerted his subordinates had she done it alone due to the shielding on the tower. \u201cThe gates have to be closed...\u201d They could not be closed from the outside either. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Myra helped drag the body of the Lord when necessary and caught him with an agile grace when he came through the chute avoiding hitting his head upon the edge of it before placing him down gently. Taking care with his body he was still the Lord in the area, he would be recognized, and if he could be mentally healed he could handle the scaring in the land and the hearts and minds of the people. \u201cHe was the Lord of this place, of these lands.\u201d "}, "post-89494": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1552551500000", "message": "\"The Lord of the land? So that demon... did he?\" Vithkun asked and frowned although no answer was necessary as he knew his deduction was true - the lord had probably been possessed from the very start. \"Oh... yes of course not.\" Vithkun said surprised by the sudden motion Myra made to hold his hands although it was of course necessary. Such firm determination came from her grip yet the soft touch did not betray her caring. Vithkun followed Myra to the door and he peeked out looking at the courtyard which had only a few resident demons walking around. \"Can we count on the rest being inside the castle after the ruckus we made?\" he asked Myra. \"If you think this is the plan to go with, I'm in. But how do we go about closing those gates?\" Vithkun asked concerned. \"Once they are closed I can make them stay closed, but only if they can be shut from the outside.\" Vithkun explained. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"The Lord of the land? So that demon... did he?\" Vithkun asked and frowned although no answer was necessary as he knew his deduction was true - the lord had probably been possessed from the very start. \"Oh... yes of course not.\" Vithkun said surprised by the sudden motion Myra made to hold his hands although it was of course necessary. Such firm determination came from her grip yet the soft touch did not betray her caring. "}, "post-89495": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1552581615000", "message": "\"If they're searching after whoever did this then perhaps,\" he was in the opening but she had stopped talking for a second glancing back to the door she had came through that led to the outside. He was watching the courtyard as a lookout, \"They should close the gates.\" The realization came an instant after she had been about to offer to remain there to do so. To hope that she would find someway to survive in order to finish their quest  but perhaps she didn't. The demons should be searching the castle itself and as soon as they realized the lord was dead they would squabble for control but secondly realize they needed to catch whoever was responsible before he could murder more of them. His escape was unlikely as he'd been visible before but they needed to cut off any chance of his escape. The main door was simply the next step in reassuring that. Picking up one of the vials she was testing the weight. It was not weighty but the problem was the fragility of the clay. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"If they're searching after whoever did this then perhaps,\" he was in the opening but she had stopped talking for a second glancing back to the door she had came through that led to the outside. He was watching the courtyard as a lookout, \"They should close the gates.\" "}, "post-89497": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1552602884000", "message": "Vithkun was pondering their chances at success at taking out the last few in the courtyard - and if the door was already closed, as Myra said, they would be well on their way to succeeding. \"Then I will make sure the door stays closed after I've taken out the few remaining the courtyard.\" he said and smiled. \"It seems like your dark vision ability will make my presence down her a nuisance for you anyway.\" he said jestingly. With deep red letters he wrote \"Blazing flames\" in elven on his sword and turned to Myra again.\"So if you prepare the vials, I will make sure we can stack them outside without risk of being attacked - right?\" he said rhetorically believing Myra to think his plan was sound. \"Take care with those, Myra.\" Vithkun said his words sincere and reflecting a slight fear of Myra getting into trouble accidentally handling them wrong. Moving outside one of the demons was close by and with a swing of Vithkun's blade flames stretched out incinerating the poor demon almost in and instant as Vithkun turned to the second, third and fourth who all went ablaze quickly after each other. It was powerful elven magic and not at all easy to manage - had the courtyard not been cobblestone he might have lit that up too and any allies close by might also suffer direct burns from the stray flames. However as the last remaining guards in the courtyard had been dealt with he raced up to the gate and planted his finger on the thick wooden door and wrote the elven words \"Ice Glacier\" as frost took hold and soon the entire gate had turned to ice and there was no way any demon would break through that anytime soon. Vithkun's knees went soft and he bend over slightly supporting himself with his hand on the door, panting. Two such powerful elemental spells so quickly after each other was taxing but clenching his fist he knew he could not linger or rest yet and strode back towards Myra. \"Are you about ready? Then I will summon Wind Strider and we can make our escape.\" Vithkun said with a hopeful voice. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Vithkun was pondering their chances at success at taking out the last few in the courtyard - and if the door was already closed, as Myra said, they would be well on their way to succeeding. "}, "post-89498": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1552603482000", "message": "While he had hurriedly dispatched with the last of the demons in the courtyard she'd been preparing the explosion. Laying them along the pathway upright and chucking a few through the ventilation shaft for good measure by rolling them along after a certain point. The problem with the way that the lords home had been arranged was the one entrance. It was meant to make it easier to defend but in the end it would ruin them for the servants entrance was the only other exit they had found. If it was the only other true exit than it would not be suitable as it was about to go up in flames. It seemed Hermouth would not regain his ancestral home after all but his life was not forfeit to the demon any longer. Myra set up the last few vials following the entrance around to the front where they would be able to toss one back and make sure the whole thing went up in an oblivion. \"Ready,\" she announced as she tossed the Lord over her shoulder and picked up the last vial to drop it on their way out. It would take only seconds for it to catch the next one alight and from there start a chain reaction. Wind Strider was the fastest steed she had ever seen and with the aide of his faithful tempest they would be gone before they knew what hit them. Carrying the Lord out and up they had to move quickly as surely someone would see them over the walls and either leap from them in pursuit or fire upon them.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "While he had hurriedly dispatched with the last of the demons in the courtyard she'd been preparing the explosion. Laying them along the pathway upright and chucking a few through the ventilation shaft for good measure by rolling them along after a certain point. The problem with the way that the lords home had been arranged was the one entrance. It was meant to make it easier to defend but in the end it would ruin them for the servants entrance was the only other exit they had found. If it was the only other true exit than it would not be suitable as it was about to go up in flames. It seemed Hermouth would not regain his ancestral home after all but his life was not forfeit to the demon any longer. "}, "post-89499": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1552634336000", "message": "Vithkun nodded concentrated, it was yet another spell in a short time, albeit one he knew very well. The torrents og wind swept together in forming the steed that was made from air only. \"Myra...\" Vithkun said and turned to his companion. \"You must take the reigns, I'm sure by now he trusts you.\" Vithkun said as exhaustion was visible on his face. \"You ride him as you ride any other horse only you must stay focused because if you show strong intention he will obey that too. The speed and torrents of wind surrounding Wind Strider should keep us reasonably safe from arrows.\" Vithkun said and put his palm on her shoulder and smiled as a sign of trust. \"Hand me the lord and I'll make sure he won't go anywhere while we're riding.\" he said with a smirk. If Myra accepted Wind Strider would briefly dissolve and recreate its shape beneath them lifting up Myra in the front and Vithkun carrying the lord at the back. It would probably be a little while before Vithkun could use any spell higher level spell again and would use the time on Wind Strider to rest the best he was able to. As they would ride out of the courtyard a few demons on the walls would aim arrows at them with poor result and a couple on the drawbridge would seek to block their way but throw themselves out of the way in the last second falling in the crevice the drawbridge went over. From here on out the way was clear and with the keep ablaze in the background they would need to head down to a village and deliver the lord. \"Maybe it's best that we don't tell these simple people, that a demon had taken hold of his body. They may get the idea that some evil still lingers - A prisoner should be a better story.\" Vithkun proposed as they had made it sufficiently far away from any perils left. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Vithkun nodded concentrated, it was yet another spell in a short time, albeit one he knew very well. The torrents og wind swept together in forming the steed that was made from air only. "}, "post-89500": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1552642927000", "message": "Boom boom! Crash burn. (Yay!) They escaped!\u00a0(Just kidding.)\u201cStrong intention,\u201d repeating his words out of astonishment she\u2019d consented the moment he said the words simply because of necessity. Doubtful that that she could manage it his faith carried her through as she transferred the weight of the lord to his shoulders. Wind strider appeared beneath them lifting them upwards. Riding him before it was nothing to sit behind Vithkun as they sped across the earth but for her to be in the lead was fantastic. Her hands intertwined in the razor sharp winds of his hair as it smoothed in her touch become as soft as the breeze that swam through the valleys in the spring. Fearful only that her aim would not be true she whirled around the tempest a good distance from the gate and with the determination lent to her from what might occur from failure her aim was good and true. Waiting only long enough to make sure the vial exploded and lit the first they turned and ran. For all the speed that was granted to Wind Strider she pushed for the harshest winds imaginable, ones that would tear apart the sails at sea, that could rip trees from their roots in a storm, and ones that would bring them to safety on the ridge of the next hill before looking at the massacre of the once great home of Lord Vermouth. The flames licked the wall to start. Making a ring of fire around the gate that soon destroyed the ice that had sealed it but now one dared cross its path after the first. Coming close had caught him alight and like the spell of a certain Drow he faded into nothingness just whispers of Ash catching in the rest of the flames and disappearing within its magnitude. It was but a precursor of what would occur after because as it reached the store room the true excitement  would begin. Akin to a backwards avalanche it all happened so quickly. The blaze that had spread over the walls with the attempt of smothering the stone blasted upward. Like hellfire setting itself upon the very landscape it seeped through all tunnels, tore through foundations, and in an instant brought floors crashing down into the subfloors. Breaking down every barrier meant to protect the once great home this would be its downfall. The storing of never ending fire. The screams that rose upward of tortured souls being torn apart and cast to the four directions would never leave Myra. Some had once been elves, humans, and other smaller things. All souls lost and damned and transformed by the regrets of a life not fulfilled. Wiped from the earth as if it never existed the stone melted downward into a pitiful representation of what once was and everything not hewn in stone disintegrated. It would be days before the flames fully lost their powers. If it was not surrounded by the mountains it might have been drawn away into the forests but as it were it was contained and it would form a crater of magnificent proportions. \u201cI believe you\u2019re right,\u201d Myra said half-heartedly turning about Wind Strider and heading back to the village they had left their speed considerably lowered no need to rush now. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Boom boom! Crash burn. (Yay!) They escaped!\u00a0"}, "post-89536": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1552857925000", "message": "Vithkun was proud of Myra - not only for having conjured up and made her plans come to fruition - but also for taking charge when it was needed. It was perhaps best represented with her taking they reigns of Wind Strider and safely bringing all three of them back to the city whence they departed. The villagers were there to greet them and had loads of questions - both to the chasm they could see in the mountains but also to the unconscious lord Vithkun tilted down to a couple of men who grabbed him. The pure elf was about to smile and tell Myra how proud he was of her when he himself felt how his energy had been used up and with a half smile on his lips he fainted and tilted the same way off the tempest that the lord had just done - and luckily there were arms to grab him. The following days were used on storing energy and food, repeating the stories of the demon fight to the children of the village and relaxing the best they were able to knowing what lay ahead. As the lord woke up Vithkun insisted on being the one to talk to him first which was of course partly because he could tell him what had happened and how the elf had relayed it to the citizen. However Vithkun's plans were somewhat spoiled by the fact that he was probably in need of months of restitution before he was mentally anywhere near a normal condition. It was understandable given the circumstances and Vith explained that he had been through a tough time and needed a lot of care. On day three after their arrival back both Myra and Vithkun felt ready to continue and Vithkun was sure that whatever evil may linger had taken a blow so severe that it would stay in the mountains for a very long time. Having packed their things and said their goodbyes they were heading out of the village and Vithkun couldn't but think back on the beginning of their adventure. \"Soon it will be apparent if you were right to bring me.\" he said with a wry smile. \"What will you do if by some reason I am not the right elf for the job?\" he asked hoping she would humor him a bit. The thought of who were to bring back the Crimson Ascend weighed even more heavily now and whatever lighthearted banter he could have happen with Myra, he would appreciate greatly. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Vithkun was proud of Myra - not only for having conjured up and made her plans come to fruition - but also for taking charge when it was needed. It was perhaps best represented with her taking they reigns of Wind Strider and safely bringing all three of them back to the city whence they departed. The villagers were there to greet them and had loads of questions - both to the chasm they could see in the mountains but also to the unconscious lord Vithkun tilted down to a couple of men who grabbed him. "}, "post-89539": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1552864888000", "message": "The pride he might have expressed at her abilities she felt in return. He had fended off almost half of the demons on his own where as she had only made her way in by sneaking around. He'd risked life and limb and everything in order to find her and the relief she felt at seeing him had sparked uncertainty within her heart. A decision would soon have to be made about the most precious thing she'd been sent to find. It was less and less precious the longer she traveled with the elf. The years spent before meeting him had been bracing to say the least, the Tower not the very least of them for it had taught her much about herself but nothing to dampen the temper that ran so strongly within her veins. It seemed that it took a lighter touch. One barely felt until he fell off of the horse. Dispelling the creature immediately in her rush she had betrayed true feelings to the villagers. There was no disguising she cared for the boy, loved him perhaps, as she brushed back his locks and made sure they carried him to a place of comfort. Remaining on a vigil when he slept she never left his side, never slept, and when he awoke she feigned that she'd just entered to check on him. A hard thing to do but she made herself believe it for she had slipped outside once in order to look to the stars for strength. Then she'd set about making preparations and when the Lord awoke she herself spoke to him. She explained that his soul was not tarnished by the things that had been done to the world, to his people, for he had been overcome with another. Her dark skin and demon like appearance may have never have gotten through to him but he felt her presence from the dagger. Knew she had been the one to free him. It was his very saving grace to see that one like her stood for the greater good in the world and that appearances were not what made the person but their strength of character. He had cried like a little boy and she awkwardly embraced him rubbing his back then before turning him over to a woman who was more matronly in order to age him back into a man. On the day of their parting she was reunited with Uma but refused to take her into the badlands of the world. Wind Strider had been summoned, the beast unable to be hurt by normal means, but neither chose to make their journey too swift taking off at a gentle pace with but a few days remaining. \"I think it already has,\" Myra would tell him settled in just behind them their packs temporarily made into one as she had to keep them behind her to hold onto him properly, \"But,\" and now she joked able to do so by the intention behind it, \"If you're not the next one I find I'll simply knock them out and drag them there so it will be a quiet journey.\" Good humor abounding for but a moment longer it was because she knew deep down of her own intent now that she could do so. Informing Vithkun might be a mistake for she wished him to be weary of where they headed. If it was her making him worry it kept him sharp and she needed that from him. As it were the journey itself was pleasant enough, the lands were empty. Barren far and wide with naught much to keep them company but the stars above and the dust that trailed behind them. Their assault on the keep had destroyed many who roamed this area. Frankly she was pleased by it and when they stopped on the nights and took shelter within his tent she would comment upon him taking out half the population single handed. Usually sleeping in the corner she'd come quite a bit closer sleeping on the other side of the bed in the floor next to the tent wall. It was so he could see her there and she him. They could speak as well. One night she told him about the citadel. A tower reaching up into the sky itself. She told him it was rare for anyone to make the journey as the stairs themselves prompted many to ignore it much less the stopping to adjust to the atmosphere. She told him of the view from there, of touching the clouds and feeling the condensation in her fingertips. Of the ocean spreading across the horizon. \"It never seems to end,\" she said, \"The blue just goes on and on and I felt as if I were the smallest thing in the world at that moment looking at that expanse. I wish to traverse it some day,\" she told him her eyes full of the memory as she talked of getting a small ship and heading out upon it until she could, \"no longer see land, no longer hear the sounds of the people. Just the gentle rise and fall, and when I look up I know that I shall see the true stars. No other lights to mar their brightness, just them.\" It had been perhaps the most open story she expressed to him but somehow the friendship that had been garnered between them was solidified and breaking at the same moment. They paused on the third night and she told him, \"We'll be there in the morning.\" Wanting to face it with fresh eyes and ears they had bedded down in some ruins that. Shells of buildings that had once been, only a few of stone with crumbling facades. Myra seemed on edge but she knew what they would see in the morning. They had been about to make camp for the night. Pulling off bracers and her cloak the air was warmer here, as if there was a pocket in the way the world was molded in this one section. Tossing them upon her pack Vithkun had yet to unfold the tent and she had been about to suggest they remain out among the stars. Their path tomorrow would be colder, and ending. Then there were sounds of wolves howling. They were distant, and then close. Shadows along the walls of the buildings as they turned, the moonlight betraying their presence as they padded ever closer. Larger than regular wolves these were dire ones. Sharper teeth and senses and backs of raised hair as their hackles drew upward in a threatening way. How the two had not sensed them beforehand was a testament to their silence and the direction of the wind when they'd made their approach. There were too many to simply fight and Myra backing up a step her Mace left by her pack backed into Vithkun, her back to his chest. Looking up almost breathless at the sight of them she'd not expected them, not this time at least. Before she had spent days in this location and their appearance had been thought to simply be coincidence but this time she had but barely been here an hour. Escaping was the only goal, before she had left her belongings above and they had been there when she returned, for what would wolves want with them, and even now she cared not to go for her pack. There were more pressing matters.Elf and Drow stood, one before the other, and she had only one question for him in that moment, \"Do you trust me?\" ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The pride he might have expressed at her abilities she felt in return. He had fended off almost half of the demons on his own where as she had only made her way in by sneaking around. He'd risked life and limb and everything in order to find her and the relief she felt at seeing him had sparked uncertainty within her heart. A decision would soon have to be made about the most precious thing she'd been sent to find. It was less and less precious the longer she traveled with the elf. The years spent before meeting him had been bracing to say the least, the Tower not the very least of them for it had taught her much about herself but nothing to dampen the temper that ran so strongly within her veins. It seemed that it took a lighter touch. One barely felt until he fell off of the horse. Dispelling the creature immediately in her rush she had betrayed true feelings to the villagers. There was no disguising she cared for the boy, loved him perhaps, as she brushed back his locks and made sure they carried him to a place of comfort. "}, "post-89545": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1552991363000", "message": "Vithkun laughed and felt joy remembering back.\"Well that was pretty much what happened last time - only you made the mistake of letting me wake up. Tell me is it the same strategy you use in your love life? Knocking them unconscious and...\" Vithkun said and couldn't help but think that his joke resembled what she had done to him. \"... and claiming them as your own?\" he said with a wry smile, the joke hopefully sounding as if he distanced himself from what had happened at the dwarves rather than poking more into that. After all the emotions were not that deeply buried beneath his pure skin and the risk of conjuring them up again were a little too dangerous. The way there was barren - calling it the demon lands was certainly warranted though luckily they encountered no demons on the way - and Vithkun may have an idea of why they didn't. Using Wind Strider as transport was a good idea as he was a steed that couldn't be harmed by normal means and also didn't need food or much rest - only the rider needed rest because of the concentration it took. But at this pace it was easier - almost as easy as with a real horse and with Myra behind him and arms around him at was admittedly a welcome return to feeling her warm embrace.Their relationship was also improving and on the journey it seemed as if they opened up to each other to a far bigger extend than they had before. No longer was Myra clinging to the far side of the tent and their talks in the evenings had inspiring. Myra had told Vithkun about a citadel that reached the sky and gave one an almost magical view of the ocean. The pictures she conjured in his mind were vividi - but how accurate were his thoughts? Water in that amount he could only imagine.\"I've never seen the ocean, only lakes. If you were ever to go sailing on the ocean I would want to go too.\" Vithkun said with a soft smile laying with his hands behind his head and a gentle sigh. It sounded almost too tranquil to be true and water was not the preferred element of the pure elves, but with Myra he felt as if he was almost endlessly adventurous. The third night was the last night and they opted to sleep outside close to some old ruins but the howling in the distance seemed to have other ideas. Vithkun grabbed his sword knowing just as well as Myra that these wolves weren't ordinary ones. Very quickly they were surrounded and Myra backed into Vithkun as the pure elf put his hand on her shoulder as he clenched his teeth.\"They are so many...\" Vithkun said focused ready to fight with everything he had but has he was about to inscribe magic into his sword to fight a fight that he might be loosing, Myra spoke. \"Excuse me..?\" he said and blinked although the seriousness considered she might have something up her sleeve. \"Yes, of course. Don't even ask that!\" Vithkun said and kept his eyes on the wolves awaiting what Myra had in mind. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Vithkun laughed and felt joy remembering back."}, "post-89556": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1553035693000", "message": "If the situation had been less tense his response might have been laughable. As it were they faced the impossible but feats that had been impossible before were conquered through ingenuity and strength. Now it was not fear that drove her actions but knowledge but it might be fear that gave him reason to halt. Or another misunderstanding due to the fact she had initially intended on taking the jewel for her own sake. Reaching it required his presence so he was safe for a little while longer. Shifting her stance as she glanced to the wolves they snarled and snipped but kept some distance. Circling and looking for an opening. the two of them were swifter upon their feet, for a time, but the wolves would endure as long as they did and just a bit farther. Their thin sides were heaving up and down their last meal too long ago. They required sustenance and their determination would drive them to the ends of the earth now that prey was in their sight. \"Run,\" challenging the man in her word she had already turned face and she grabbed an open hand to put insistence into her words dragging him along beside her. Ducking through and around the ruins they came to a hole within the ground. Appearing like a sinkhole the edges were sturdy as they approached. The night was dark and the depth something even she could not ascertain but the wolves were nipping at their heels by the time they reached it. They would encircle them again. Myra seemed to have no hesitation as she approached but she gave Vith just a moment of it as she told him to \"Jump\" and she herself went down releasing his hand if necessary but if he held on they would go together. Flitting through the air as they both caught the breath they had lost she shouted to him, \"There's water at the bottom!\"Putting her feet together she plunged in and then swam for the surface. There was light in the distance above them in the murky black. Hoping that he could swim as well if he were not capable she would go in after him. They would come up to cavern, dark but warm, the very water itself almost steaming as if they landed in a hot spring. Swimming to the edge there was a small portion that was able to be traversed with dark shale crushed into sand. Gaining footing she walked up onto it brushing back wet locks away from her face before wringing them out by the waters edge leaned over it. The cavern led downward from the pool and there were dim lights in the distance, as if the dwarves had once been here the way lit by faint blue stones embedded into the cavern walls.\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "If the situation had been less tense his response might have been laughable. As it were they faced the impossible but feats that had been impossible before were conquered through ingenuity and strength. Now it was not fear that drove her actions but knowledge but it might be fear that gave him reason to halt. Or another misunderstanding due to the fact she had initially intended on taking the jewel for her own sake. Reaching it required his presence so he was safe for a little while longer. "}, "post-89577": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1553110983000", "message": "\"Wait... run..?\" Vithkun asked surprised that they weren't going to do pull off a more offensive move. As she pullet his hand and he promptly sheathed his sword running alongside Myra - slightly behind to enable her to lead. In the back of his head he always had the wolves in mind ready to make a stand if they came too close - shielding Myra's back was an unexpected priority. None of those beasts would lay a paw on her while he was there. \"Where are we going? They'll outrun us eventually..!\" he exclaimed as he raced towards whatever destination she had in mind dodging right and left around the corners of the once proud buildings with the darkness of night swallowing the shadows of the hunting pack leaving only their glowing eyes in a levitating pursuit of the elves. His mind wanted answers so he could act accordingly but his heart trusted her completely even if no answer was given. An answer was given through his eyes though as they approached and Vithkun knew what they had to do even before the command left her lips. Still he did almost hesitate when the clacking of the jaws behind him reminded him of what the alternative would be. Still holding on to Myra's hand Vithkun jumped into the unknown abyss letting out a silent scream as his feet left solid ground and gravity was free to act upon the elf. And although he was agile as few human beings, jumping into the obsidian unknown was asking for trouble. \"Water..?!?\" Vithkun shouted back to Myra knowing that at least he wasn't going to break his legs now - but he still didn't know when the impact would happen but immediately closed both mouth and nose. The plunge happened a little later than he had anticipated but suddenly he found him in the pitch black grasp of the water and struggling he immediately tried to claw his way up towards an unknown point he couldn't discern called 'surface'. He was used to swim in the soft and blissful lakes near High Haven where the bottom was never far away and you would always feel safe. Here it was as if, even though a he could now just spot a dim light in the distance, that the dark grasp pulled him down and he doubled his efforts in getting up. Apparently water was not the same everywhere - or perhaps his panic just got the better if him. A helping hand was indeed appreciated although he would likely find his way to the surface eventually.With a deep breath for air he emerged over the surface and immediately looked around trying to discern the place. There was not much to see, but the water was hot and as he followed Myra to the small shore he trotted up like a wet and beaten dog. \"Y-you've done that before..! You cheater!\" he said and pointed at Myra panting and his white hair all over his face before he cracked up a little. As he had regained his composure a little he also noticed the dwarven impact in the cave and started wondering. \"Where exactly are we?\" he asked Myra although he had a hunch... ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Wait... run..?\" Vithkun asked surprised that they weren't going to do pull off a more offensive move. As she pullet his hand and he promptly sheathed his sword running alongside Myra - slightly behind to enable her to lead. In the back of his head he always had the wolves in mind ready to make a stand if they came too close - shielding Myra's back was an unexpected priority. None of those beasts would lay a paw on her while he was there."}, "post-89578": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1553111688000", "message": "The unvoiced concern at the cavern they leaped into was appreciated but the fright in his voice at the mention of what lay below was shocking. The assumption that he could swim was a mistake and it was the reason she had been watching for him to surface. Her eyes had adjusted to the dim light instantaneously whereas his struggle was made apparent. Going under in order to retrieve him his flailing might damn them both but gripping his shirt and drawing upon him she came up to the surface with him. Treading water now he was on the surface, though less composed than usual, he had a hold of the situation well enough to make a good go of it to the edge. Showing proficiency the pools were a gentle sort of place to be in but the howling above them that but barely reaching their ears was a reminder of the danger they'd recently left. Even in the heat of the ground flowing around them remaining in wet clothes would cause chaffing and an uncomfortable start for the trek farther in. \"Well to be fair the first time I was not certain there was a bottom to this place,\" she told him laughing as well despite herself. In that moment it was all she could do watching him attempt to sort himself his hair concealing his face. Rising up she moved one of the longer strands out of the corners of his eye. She'd avoided the wet rat look but just barely for she'd flipped her own hair back to keep it from interfering. Dropping the hand but not the distance between them she glanced back towards the way the the slim path led, \"This is the entrance.\" Posture erect it was tenser than usual her shoulder blades knitting behind her as she looked to the path, \"I had hoped to face it in the morning with fresh eyes...\" ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The unvoiced concern at the cavern they leaped into was appreciated but the fright in his voice at the mention of what lay below was shocking. The assumption that he could swim was a mistake and it was the reason she had been watching for him to surface. Her eyes had adjusted to the dim light instantaneously whereas his struggle was made apparent. Going under in order to retrieve him his flailing might damn them both but gripping his shirt and drawing upon him she came up to the surface with him. Treading water now he was on the surface, though less composed than usual, he had a hold of the situation well enough to make a good go of it to the edge. Showing proficiency the pools were a gentle sort of place to be in but the howling above them that but barely reaching their ears was a reminder of the danger they'd recently left. "}, "post-89580": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1553118480000", "message": "Vithkun looked down the shaft and felt his strength waning. \"No bottom to this place..?\" he said and rubbed his chin before proceeding to unbutton his shirt stripping off his upper body revealing the subtle toned and athletic body - but also a couple of scars that elves would not normally carry for their advanced healing that rarely let such things mar their bodies for long. Vithkun proceeded to wrench his shirt getting the worst of the water out of it feeling as if perhaps they had experienced enough danger and adventure for one day and nodded. \"I think I'm with you there, in this heat we won't become cold although I doubt the clothes will dry over night given the moist.\" Vithkun concluded and scratched his head. \"Speaking of which, where does this heat come from?\" he asked curiously. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Vithkun looked down the shaft and felt his strength waning. \"No bottom to this place..?\" he said and rubbed his chin before proceeding to unbutton his shirt stripping off his upper body revealing the subtle toned and athletic body - but also a couple of scars that elves would not normally carry for their advanced healing that rarely let such things mar their bodies for long. Vithkun proceeded to wrench his shirt getting the worst of the water out of it feeling as if perhaps they had experienced enough danger and adventure for one day and nodded. "}, "post-89581": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1553129121000", "message": "\"My first jump down,\" clarifying, the fact that he was stripping was at first not noticed the open sky through the rather large opening above them her focus. Her first trip here she had to climb the walls, not an easy task but one that was necessary. It had been after extensively sorting out that there was no other way than forward and backward and a myriad of tunnels leading to dead ends. It was the reason she wished to wait til morning for the trek down was some length as well. Finally looking down as he spoke of clothes she almost gaped. His vision was fine in the dim light, enough to see her clearly her hair shimmering in it the light almost reflective. Hers, however, was comparable to full light in such darkness and she saw him clearly. The curve of his shoulders, the way that the line of his hips led downward, the long scars that decorated his body in such a fashion as to be out of fashion. He was attractive enough without him being half stripped but if her silence was any indication it had been enough to make her speechless. Cheeks flushed she tore herself away her voice small as she answered, \"It seems to be from a hot spring within the water.\" Speaking of the water it gave her an idea and one way to get back at the fairer one of the two. Reaching downward she gathered her confidence and with strength she did not feel she un-tucked her long shirt and began to pull down her breeches. Covered still down to mid-thigh with her boots kicked off and her pants tossed aside she'd start towards the water, \"A while without them on might,\" she challenged in return to his prior ones draping the pants over a stalagmite. The cloth of her shirt clung to her form like a second skin framing the outline of her heart shaped bottom clinging to the curve of the hip and accentuating how her chest rose and fall as it stretched over her abdomen. Feet bare she walked towards the water. The muscles in calves were like stone but they rippled in her thighs with each step flowing upward from there. Long tresses landing just above the small of her back it left him a clear view of the way the rest moved as well.\u00a0Stepping onto the crushed shale it was soft beneath her feet the calluses preventing any damage. Slipping further until her shirt had begun to float she took it by the bottom with both hands drawing it up and over tossing it back over another to dry. She wore a thinner style of undergarments that resembled a more modern brassiere the color darker than her skin in the light. The dress she had worn before to dinner had clung to her curves but the midnight air wrapped her within it greeting her as a child born of night and stars as she sauntered into the depths of the pool ripples starting at her form. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"My first jump down,\" clarifying, the fact that he was stripping was at first not noticed the open sky through the rather large opening above them her focus. Her first trip here she had to climb the walls, not an easy task but one that was necessary. It had been after extensively sorting out that there was no other way than forward and backward and a myriad of tunnels leading to dead ends. It was the reason she wished to wait til morning for the trek down was some length as well. "}, "post-89591": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1553293068000", "message": "The blush was not noticed in the dim lighted cave and at the same time drowned out by the smooth dark skin, however her evasive voice and glance was picked up by the elf who couldn't but smile a little without commenting further on her answer. Although it had not been his intention Myra was quite charmingly cute when she was caught off guard like that. \"Don't tell me I'm the only shirtless elf you've seen? My kin do enjoy exploring what 'oneness with nature' is all about.\" Vithkun joked and chortled. Among the elves races the pure elves were somewhat put in the same league as the even more naturist wood elves, that admittedly quite enjoyed throwing off their threads whenever possible - and preferably quite suddenly in public places out in nature. The pure elves were somewhat more private about such things although nudity was something that also did connect them to nature in many of the same ways and Myra would certainly know at least the stories that connected each of them but also how the pure elves were often mistaken for wood elves and assigned their habits. The distinction was basically that wood elves would not care about being seen - some even aiming for it - and pure elves would want to share the moment privately with someone they wished to bond with at a much deeper level. The situation was more vulnerable and intimate, whereas the wood elves threw away their clothes for fun, friendship and 'the heck of it'. Even throwing away his shirt was a sign that Vith felt quite comfortable around Myra although his intention was not yet extending further than that. But for a drow to start undressing - even Vith was not quite sure what the stories told about this tradition. Perhaps it was a challenge? A direct seduction? Or maybe even a test? The line of thoughts only just grazed his mind before he saw that the drow in front of him was doing just that. Vithkun dropped his jaw as she started unbuttoning her shirt and throw off her pants, but he was quite sure. This was an invitation if he had ever seen one.The dimly lit cave cast shadows along an already dusky skin but her forms were clear as day. This was the first time he had seen it this openly and the first time Vithkun hadn't looked away like a proper gentle elf - somehow there was no need right now, she would not snap at the pure elf. Her body was properly shaped, softly curved in all the right places but also sharply accentuated her toned muscles revealing a striking contrast. Almost teasingly she moved towards the small shore and continued out into the water as a mermaid would lure her victim out into the deep feigning to pay no attention to its victim. And the victim here was Vith. He had just left the damn water and by some drow spell he now wanted nothing more than to let it embrace him again. Kicking off his boots a little more hurried than he perhaps should have if wanting to keep a cool facade he tempered his emotions slightly as he stepped elegantly out of his pants revealing the elf in all his natural splendor and only his undergarments to cover the rest. It was a loincloth covering front and back halfway down to his knees but leaving the side of his toned thighs exposed but for the cloth that was wrapped around his waist to support what covered front and back. His body both elegant and athletic the perfection expected by a pure elf of his status only broken by the scars - one long on his left thigh too. Vithkun donned a smile as he slowly strolled down towards the water changing his gaze from Myra to the ground only by necessity as he sought the shore for obstacles. Covering heel, shin, knee... quickly the water would cover even his waist as he bend forwards and let his body merge with the warm spring water and taking a few strokes he let himself glide through the water the element seemingly parting effortlessly in contrast to the panic that arose when he first fell into the pool. \"This is a lot more comfy than before, don't you think so?\" he said to Myra breaking the silence with a smirk but keeping the now almost electrifying contact he felt when his eyes met hers out here in the warm embrace of the hot water. And although a few meters still separated them he felt as if the water and their vibrant eyes was already connecting them skin to skin and igniting emotions and a longing he had though suppressed.  ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The blush was not noticed in the dim lighted cave and at the same time drowned out by the smooth dark skin, however her evasive voice and glance was picked up by the elf who couldn't but smile a little without commenting further on her answer. Although it had not been his intention Myra was quite charmingly cute when she was caught off guard like that. "}, "post-89592": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1553294954000", "message": "Modesty among elves was subjective, she was aware of the tendency of wood elves, and had seen a water elf that ran around naked for a time with no qualms as to dressing until she\u2019d volunteered her own clothing to cover her. Frankly feeling modest for her then she was being braver than she had ever been by stripping and moving into the water. The murkiness of it hid much of her form but not the way that the droplets ran between the line of her breasts. It kept her long locks clear of her face as they floated behind her drawn along as she moved. Watching him with fine lit eyes the blue was reflective and focused. She\u2019d lost her mind in that instant, truly, and beautifully and she wished for nothing more than to explore the deranged mood that had been cast upon her. Perhaps it was the last few nights, or way he\u2019d embraced her openly after defeating the Lord. Each drew on one another\u2019s strength and desired much more than words could or would express. He was still betrothed to another and while she had no qualms about a relationship outside of marriage she did with one who was about to be so. Still it had been forgotten it seemed in a place no one else would see them. Watching as he kicked off his boots they landed roughly and she covered a giggle to keep from embarrassing him as he dove into the water. He had a fine form, lean but toned, crafted as if from marble if not for a few imperfections. Scars that served as reminders along the length of his skin the puckered tissue marring the image he\u2019d originally presented. She carried few upon her that he would notice openly, all thin white lines that made her grey skin seem lilac around then. Smaller ones along the edges of her heels where she was caught in a briar running once, a larger one along her upper arm on the outside right where an arrow had almost landed a lucky hit. The Tower would have provided a myriad had Kelly not honored a deal struck and when she left they disappeared but not her knowledge of that place. \u201cNow that you know what to expect,\u201d she chimed back uncertain of what she expected. Crossing the distance with wide even strokes that carried her forward in an upright position when she was but a few feet away she grinned mischievously. Her right hand was beneath the water but soon it skimmed the surface slinging a torrent his direction seeking to break some of the tension by winning in a child\u2019s game. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Modesty among elves was subjective, she was aware of the tendency of wood elves, and had seen a water elf that ran around naked for a time with no qualms as to dressing until she\u2019d volunteered her own clothing to cover her. Frankly feeling modest for her then she was being braver than she had ever been by stripping and moving into the water. The murkiness of it hid much of her form but not the way that the droplets ran between the line of her breasts. It kept her long locks clear of her face as they floated behind her drawn along as she moved. Watching him with fine lit eyes the blue was reflective and focused. She\u2019d lost her mind in that instant, truly, and beautifully and she wished for nothing more than to explore the deranged mood that had been cast upon her. Perhaps it was the last few nights, or way he\u2019d embraced her openly after defeating the Lord. Each drew on one another\u2019s strength and desired much more than words could or would express. He was still betrothed to another and while she had no qualms about a relationship outside of marriage she did with one who was about to be so. "}, "post-89605": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1553462249000", "message": "Vithkun smirked. \"Now that I know what to expect... yes.\" he admitted and chuckled. However it would soon be obvious that the pure elf was still not aware of what to expect as the drow before him had concocted a mischievous plan to wet his face with the hot spring water. \"However I didn't see you as flustered as I was when...\" Vithkun started although suddenly a good deal of water was thrown into his face with no prior warning. Sure it was still somewhat wet from before, but still he frowned. \"Why that's just mean! No wonder any elf with respect for themselves carry mistrust towards your kin!\" he said and smiled wiping wet strands of hair from his face. The sense of competition however rose in Vithkun - much like with Davil - but this time it was far more playful. \"How about this then for a revenge?\" he said and smirked as he leaned back floating on his back and started splashing with his legs and feet creating a slash of water in the vicinity that was sure to drench the drow before returning to an upright position stroking his arms smoothly back and forth to keep him afloat - seemingly with relative ease. \"Well have you ever seen such an elegant comeback?\" he laughed figuring she probably hadn't seen such a childish display coming, and perhaps Vithkun hadn't either. It was quite unbecoming of a pure elf prince, but somehow deep in this cave some force of nature had decided it really didn't care anymore as he was so far from the conventions, guiding stars and expectations of his kin he was usually bound to that it seemed laughable to follow them so strictly right now. But perhaps it wasn't the cave that had carried him so far from the conventions, perhaps it was the drow that was before him who's rebellious nature had slowly crept under his skin. But right now the smile on his face said 'I don't care'. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Vithkun smirked. "}, "post-89637": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1553656902000", "message": "Fantastically almost drowning him before he called her rather mean for the action she was giggling as he spoke of mistrust and she was about to shout something back playfully before he reared back. Unprepared for the assault that came her way she quickly dived under the water keeping to the darkness of the depths her vision allowing her to see even in the deep. Hearing but the last part of him speaking about a comeback he was fixing to see just how playfully vindictive she could be in return. Rising upward with swift strokes she popped up out of the water before him grasping his shoulders and then exerting downward pressure in order to dunk him under. Still laughing as he went under she used her arms to move her back so she didn't kick him getting some distance in return. If he was quick to notice he might see dark script on the bottom of her forearms but she had them to the water again as soon as she had backed off, \"I have,\" she smirked right before dropping  him down and even as he struggled to right himself, or come for her, and she was certainly scanning the water in preparation, she was ready with a second quip, \"That was it,\" laughter poured from her lips. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Fantastically almost drowning him before he called her rather mean for the action she was giggling as he spoke of mistrust and she was about to shout something back playfully before he reared back. Unprepared for the assault that came her way she quickly dived under the water keeping to the darkness of the depths her vision allowing her to see even in the deep. Hearing but the last part of him speaking about a comeback he was fixing to see just how playfully vindictive she could be in return. "}, "post-89640": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1553715601000", "message": "As Vithkun returned back to a rather more vertical position in the water and had finished the bragging about his comeback he suddenly noticed that there were no one to hear of his success. Vithkun looked left and right before even considering that the threat would come from beneath. As Myra emerged as a shark in attack on a boat his half open mouth spoke of the shock and there was no defense to be had before the drow laughingly put her weight and strength onto his shoulders quickly sending him below the surface of the water in a bid to win their small scuffle - that had turned a little more serious by the two competitive elves. Before being sent beneath the water he however noticed a black inscription on Myra's forearm although neither the signs nor the meaning registered in Vith's mind right now as mouth and eyes were quickly filled with the tempered spring water. However this was definitely it and working his arms and legs he made it to the surface spitting out half a cup of water with hair hanging in his face while waving his hands before him.\"I give up, I give up..!\" he said and laughed. \"Your methods are highly effective but also equally morally questionable!\" he said and smiled as he brushed the wet strands of hair from his face. Vithkun's eyes lingered at her forearms again and although he couldn't quite make out the signs from this distance either and while she was moving them to stay afloat it caught his attention. \"Inscriptions are seldom meaningless - what does the one on your forearm mean? An old lover? Or a code to open a secret chest of gold somewhere perhaps?\" he asked with a teasing smirk. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "As Vithkun returned back to a rather more vertical position in the water and had finished the bragging about his comeback he suddenly noticed that there were no one to hear of his success. Vithkun looked left and right before even considering that the threat would come from beneath. As Myra emerged as a shark in attack on a boat his half open mouth spoke of the shock and there was no defense to be had before the drow laughingly put her weight and strength onto his shoulders quickly sending him below the surface of the water in a bid to win their small scuffle - that had turned a little more serious by the two competitive elves. "}, "post-89641": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1553717103000", "message": "His laughter was infectious but seeing as she\u2019d already been developing fits before he disappeared into the water she was not only joyous in victory but in the way things had developed between them. There had never been another in whom she had so openly presented herself either in word or the amount of skin that was visible above the water. His dim vision allowed him some insight into what was below it but only when he was but an armsbreath away. It appeared he was all too conscientious of her revealing more than she cared to as he caught something she hoped he might never notice. Bringing her arms down into the water the movement was a quick jerk and revealed it was not one side but both the way she drew them back under. \u201cThere are other morally questionable things,\u201d she spoke with the tremor of anger within the rolling sweet tone she usually carried, \u201cIt is the marring they imprinted upon me when they declared my banishment and my speech.\u201d Returning home was plausible but every step within the territory would be as if she were walking on shards of glass. Only true repentance by completing her task would allow her the freedom she desired. Her face was clear in the low light as it averted the topic one rarely touched upon even by her own mind.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "His laughter was infectious but seeing as she\u2019d already been developing fits before he disappeared into the water she was not only joyous in victory but in the way things had developed between them. There had never been another in whom she had so openly presented herself either in word or the amount of skin that was visible above the water. His dim vision allowed him some insight into what was below it but only when he was but an armsbreath away. It appeared he was all too conscientious of her revealing more than she cared to as he caught something she hoped he might never notice. "}, "post-89643": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1553719375000", "message": "\"Other morally questionable things..?\" he said and noticed Myra's quick hiding of her forearms. He was enough gentleman to know that forcing this matter would be a poor way to open up the subject but still wise enough to know that the subject would need to be addressed. That's why a soft smile appeared on his face as Myra explained that it was indeed the description that held the enchantment that made her virtually unable to lie or speak any untruth. His smile had been brief though and quickly turned into concern as he gently closed the distance between them understanding fully what it meant to be be limited and shackled and that way. Even if it was to stop lies no innocent elf should have to endure such shame. \"What a foul enchantment...\" Vithkun said and softly reached into the water lifting her left arm hoping that she would let him examine it a little more closely. If allowed to Vithkun would be running his thumb over the inscription and recognize some of the drow letters that comprised the enchantment. \"Hmm... This looks like a complex seal...\" he said and looked up at Myra. \"Why did they bother using such thing on you? Was it really because of your heritage?\" he asked curiously and put his palm on the inscription and closed his eyes confirming his suspicion that it was bound by a strong sorcerer. \"Powerful, but not unbreakable. When we are done here I will take you to the Eldest and I'm sure she will remove this accursed wound they marred you with.\" Vithkun said trying to cheer Myra up a little. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Other morally questionable things..?\" he said and noticed Myra's quick hiding of her forearms. He was enough gentleman to know that forcing this matter would be a poor way to open up the subject but still wise enough to know that the subject would need to be addressed. That's why a soft smile appeared on his face as Myra explained that it was indeed the description that held the enchantment that made her virtually unable to lie or speak any untruth. His smile had been brief though and quickly turned into concern as he gently closed the distance between them understanding fully what it meant to be be limited and shackled and that way. Even if it was to stop lies no innocent elf should have to endure such shame. "}, "post-89644": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1553736800000", "message": "The proximity was unsettling when he insisted on observing something she kept very private, the bracers she wore were not for the purpose of armor to keep her from being harmed but to keep them from being disturbed. Attempting to shear off the skin by dragging a knife beneath the area it had never made contact. An invisible barrier kept her from marring or harming that which was inscribed in old Drow. The pain had been unprecedented and crippled her whether she intentionally or unintentionally brought blade, flame, or further ink to her skin. Well aware of the consequences of her decisions when he lifted it she very well was prepared for such an eventuality. Thankfully it didn\u2019t occur. His touch was light and seeking information and not to change it. Unable to hold back the flinch but not resisting his touch it was a reaction that lasted only a second and his concentration on the script meant it was unlikely he would notice. \u201cIt was a discouragement,\u201d she told him, \u201cNot only for my supposed crimes but what occurred during it. I lashed out in the worst possible way according to the council for ashborn are shunned. I have never heard of another developing their powers but perhaps it is because it is squashed rather quickly.\u201dWhen he finished she drew back her forearm and noticing his kindness for what it was she would joke in return the mood taking a darker turn earlier, \u201cIt would be unwise for me to go to elven lands,\u201d she smiled now, perhaps forced but there, \u201cYou never know who I might insult with the truth on the way to her.\u201d  ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The proximity was unsettling when he insisted on observing something she kept very private, the bracers she wore were not for the purpose of armor to keep her from being harmed but to keep them from being disturbed. Attempting to shear off the skin by dragging a knife beneath the area it had never made contact. An invisible barrier kept her from marring or harming that which was inscribed in old Drow. The pain had been unprecedented and crippled her whether she intentionally or unintentionally brought blade, flame, or further ink to her skin. Well aware of the consequences of her decisions when he lifted it she very well was prepared for such an eventuality. "}, "post-89659": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1553842787000", "message": "Vithkun took a closer look at the seal again feeling his insides starting to boil although he remained relative serene in his outwardly expression. \"A discouragement? Hopefully they didn't manage to make you think it was fair? Anyone would eventually lash out when they feel shunned and excluded from their own society.\" Vithkun argued firmly. \"Did they promise that you would have it removed when returning with the Crimson Ascend?\" he asked skeptically. Myra's joke did not fail to lighten the mood though and the elf laughed. \"Yes you're right on that account! I would say... just about everyone!\" he said jokingly although he knew it to be more true than he wanted it to be. \"However I may be in need of a translator with all the lies going on in the court...\" he said with a soft smile. \"And one to punch their lying mouths shut too!\" he added and chuckled putting rather brusque words in his mouth - something he wouldn't have dreamed of even a couple of weeks ago. Perhaps it was his own words of truth he should be most afraid would offend the fair people of High Haven.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Vithkun took a closer look at the seal again feeling his insides starting to boil although he remained relative serene in his outwardly expression. "}, "post-89660": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1553858422000", "message": "No answer needed in order to provide one to his first question the harrowed look at the inscriptions was enough to speak the truth. Pain would beset her upon her return without it and though no physical effects could be seen the mental ones would be horrendous. Discouraging enough she might have lashed out, entered the world and threatened as a Drow, destroyed as a Drow, made the world refocus upon the talents of the darker elves so they might realize how dangerous the neighbors they were happy to ignore were. Meek in the eyes of the council they expected her to follow the path they put forth for her and she had like an utter fool. A fool who was now listening to the tinkling laughter of a man who might have thought her the same but for all the old gods and the new she hoped he did not. The surface just beneath their feet she could stand within the water but her shoulders showing and her arm that he kept clenched in order to observe one side of it. Thankfully it was only the one caging her voice. It was enough to give her hope he never saw the other. \"I think you're quite capable of discerning them,\" she gave him credit where credit was due but this time when she smiled it was well and truly of happiness as he joked on their rather odd beginning, \"Though I do believe I'd sooner see the jailers cells than the court if I started to handle them as I handled you.\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "No answer needed in order to provide one to his first question the harrowed look at the inscriptions was enough to speak the truth. Pain would beset her upon her return without it and though no physical effects could be seen the mental ones would be horrendous. Discouraging enough she might have lashed out, entered the world and threatened as a Drow, destroyed as a Drow, made the world refocus upon the talents of the darker elves so they might realize how dangerous the neighbors they were happy to ignore were. Meek in the eyes of the council they expected her to follow the path they put forth for her and she had like an utter fool. A fool who was now listening to the tinkling laughter of a man who might have thought her the same but for all the old gods and the new she hoped he did not. "}, "post-89670": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1553937983000", "message": "Vithkun had already let go of the arm - if he could have done something he would have, but grudgingly he had to accept that right now there was nothing he could do.\"My own inscriptions won't do much even if I could inscribe something in the same area, which I doubt.\" he said looking at Myra noticing the silence that had fell over the place. Right now there were no dire wolves, no splashing of water and hardly no noise at all. The only sound to be heard was the faint breathing that almost happened in unison by the two elves and the embracing silence felt almost consoling. \"Maybe I am now, but I'm not sure I was back in High Haven.\" Vith said sincerely. \"I've learned a few things I have to admit that.\" he said and smiled softly before chuckling from her joke. \"Well there would be one elf making sure that didn't happen..!\" he said as his chuckle turned into a wholehearted laughter that broke the silence and echoed back and forth between the stone walls. \"Also... I think you've come to handle me a little more gently since we met first time... don't you think?\" he said teasingly and moved half a step closer to the drow. \"In fact... if you start getting much gentler with me, I could have you employed as one of my chamber maids who's mouths I couldn't lure a sharp word from even if my life depended on it.\" Vithkun said with a smirk. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Vithkun had already let go of the arm - if he could have done something he would have, but grudgingly he had to accept that right now there was nothing he could do."}, "post-89671": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1553947271000", "message": "His laughter sparked her own joining in on the joke she had made the pure hearted joy in it apparent, as was the changes it made physically. The silence had been deafening but a moment ago but it changed in the movement as she covered her mouth, and her chest noticeably rose and fell with the effort of it. He was right, he had learned quite a bit but so had she. Then he started acting differently, teasing in such a way that might have elicited a response that had knocked him off of his barstool once upon a time. Arguably it was likely even now but the way her breath hitched in her throat as he closed the distance was telling her forearms drawn in against her chest. It was almost a position of claiming innocence hands towards him as the back of her forearms put light pressure on her breasts with he movement. This was dangerous. Him moving forward was dangerous, him looking down to her with bright eyes and a smile was dangerous, the way her heart got away from her within its own cage was dangerous, and the fact she did not immediately smack him for insolence was the worst of all of it. Instead her right hand found purchase on the outer edge of his upper arm. She stood shorter half a foot shorter than him, perhaps more, and it meant that now that her eyes raised upright to his framed with long black lashes that fluttered when it fell downward to his chest, measuring out her response she came to a breathy one her voice barely above a whisper, \u201cAre you so sure, your highness?\u201d", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "His laughter sparked her own joining in on the joke she had made the pure hearted joy in it apparent, as was the changes it made physically. The silence had been deafening but a moment ago but it changed in the movement as she covered her mouth, and her chest noticeably rose and fell with the effort of it. He was right, he had learned quite a bit but so had she. "}, "post-89672": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1553950380000", "message": "She looked like one of his chamber maids when pushed too right until... That voice and that look. Oh no, that feisty part was coming back to the surface for sure and the elf instinctively moved his head back a few inches. There was no punch this time but her words had certainly packed one. \"I... Well of course difference is, that you can't tell the truth and my chamber maids are constantly lying - flattering one's ego that is.\" he said almost apologetically scratching his head as it was now the elf who found himself with palms suspended at chest level towards the drow. But he smiled jestingly still although he was unsure if this was enough to excuse his insolent joke. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "She looked like one of his chamber maids when pushed too right until... That voice and that look. Oh no, that feisty part was coming back to the surface for sure and the elf instinctively moved his head back a few inches. There was no punch this time but her words had certainly packed one. "}, "post-89673": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1553950851000", "message": "Tempering anger with kindness was a difficult trait to master but unnecessary in that moment even if his movement was very telling of what he expected. A month ago she would have cleanly knocked his socks off with brute force but now she did it with a tone he might not have been expecting, and an alluring smile that spoke all to well of it simply being a joke no forced intentions put into it. Dipping her hand down and around when he shifted his own stance it called to light the thin silvery lines of the scars upon him. Curiosity got the better of her as she gently touched his chest tracing one on his collarbone, \u201cYou flatter yourself enough,\u201d she joked again giggling at it before returning to the serious nature of how her fingertips rested on the edge of the hollow in his neck her palm falling just beneath it, \u201cWhat happened here?\u201d", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Tempering anger with kindness was a difficult trait to master but unnecessary in that moment even if his movement was very telling of what he expected. A month ago she would have cleanly knocked his socks off with brute force but now she did it with a tone he might not have been expecting, and an alluring smile that spoke all to well of it simply being a joke no forced intentions put into it. Dipping her hand down and around when he shifted his own stance it called to light the thin silvery lines of the scars upon him. Curiosity got the better of her as she gently touched his chest tracing one on his collarbone, \u201cYou flatter yourself enough,\u201d she joked again giggling at it before returning to the serious nature of how her fingertips rested on the edge of the hollow in his neck her palm falling just beneath it, \u201cWhat happened here?\u201d"}, "post-89676": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1554043485000", "message": "Apparently it had been enough - and more so it seemed as she neared him once again and without warning put her hand on his chest. The jesting humor in his voice disappeared like the morning mist as her gentle touch and soft spoken voice aroused emotions he had though 'forgotten' since that time with the dwarves. However they were not forgotten, rather poorly suppressed. \"I...\" he said slightly taken aback by her actions and the sudden feelings of affection he felt towards the drow but but loosened up with a soft grin though the attraction now felt almost magnetic and had him unable to move even an inch from her while her eyes sparkled so. Those scars however was not something he had either shown nor spoken of to a great many people. \"I might tell you, that it was a sword... or perhaps a bear or some other animal. Even the work of a demon who I've fought and defeated through great effort.\" he said and looked down as if confronted with a great shame. \"At least that is what I would tell anyone than you at any other place than this.\" he said and eyed his scars again. \"I trust that these walls do not tell - and the same with these ears.\" Vithkun said and softly brushed her right ear with a melancholic smile putting a trust in the drown that he would not place in anyone else he knew. \"My scars have not come from battle - at least not a battle I remember. When I was born I had small red lines where the you see these scars and when I turned fifteen they evolved to this.\" Vithkun said and touched Myra's hand to gently press it against his chest where the scar was for her to feel it and she would feel his heart beating just a little faster at the same tim. \"I asked father what these scars meant and grudgingly he told me what he couldn't bear to tell me before... that as an elf the scars indicated I was a pure soul that had been sent back to redeem myself for some terrible deed done in another life - and before I had done that, the scars wouldn't go away no matter what medicine would be applied. And I would not be in contention to the throne neither...\" Vithkun said and breathed heavily drawing his hand to his head the pain of telling his story shielded from the drow he cared about in front of him. \"Of course...\" he said his voice no longer smooth and pure but on the verge of trembling. \"... I would seek out any challenge I could find to redeem myself and regain my standing - including this toughest one..!\" he said strained as a single tear rolled down his cheek.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Apparently it had been enough - and more so it seemed as she neared him once again and without warning put her hand on his chest. The jesting humor in his voice disappeared like the morning mist as her gentle touch and soft spoken voice aroused emotions he had though 'forgotten' since that time with the dwarves. However they were not forgotten, rather poorly suppressed. "}, "post-89677": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1554045713000", "message": "Poorly suppressed on his side and poorly concealed on hers the blood rushing to her cheeks spread across them like wildfire as he smiled at her. Like the moon rising it was fainter than the sun, dimmer because it was a reflection of light but so beautiful for one could see the mistakes within the surface. Observe the way the craters had been formed and wonder if the emptiness was truly that upon it. It was a subtle change for him to bring himself to honesty because he had once again found himself placed under a steady gaze of a roving star. One that shone so brightly he could not ignore it for long its guidance having brought him here. Listening without wavering his shame was not shared but instead pride seemed to come from her because of the comfort he felt in sharing something so personal. Her banishment and her suffering was nothing compared to the self-hatred he carried of mistakes he had not committed. Punishing himself for slights not known was the same as her doing so because she was Ashborn. Neither truly deserved their fate that they submitted themselves to. He placed her right hand upon his chest. His beating heart thrummed beneath it infusing her with new strength at how steady it moved beneath the skin. The heartbreak she felt within her own was an ache that was insufferable clinging to his pain and wishing that by some miracle she could relieve it. Whatever task he took she vowed to see it through and while the jewel had almost been his in her mind in that instant it became truly his. No prize was worth the pain of watching him so tormented, of him believing so little of himself. \"The Gods be damned Vithkun for you have nothing to redeem yourself for,\" that single tear was wiped away by her thumb as it rolled off the back of it. Her left hand upon his cheek, her right upon his chest, no longer held by his own. It moved to his face as well, forcing him to look down to the Drow despite any wish to remain stoic, \"I would never betray your secrets nor could I ignore such a plea when it comes from your lips but I will not allow you to think so little of yourself either. You have accepted that there is good within even the darkest of those around you, surely you must see there is also that in you.\" ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Poorly suppressed on his side and poorly concealed on hers the blood rushing to her cheeks spread across them like wildfire as he smiled at her. Like the moon rising it was fainter than the sun, dimmer because it was a reflection of light but so beautiful for one could see the mistakes within the surface. Observe the way the craters had been formed and wonder if the emptiness was truly that upon it. It was a subtle change for him to bring himself to honesty because he had once again found himself placed under a steady gaze of a roving star. One that shone so brightly he could not ignore it for long its guidance having brought him here. "}, "post-89687": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1554136954000", "message": "The elf felt shame so deeply that even his heart started trembling - it started to doubt in the conviction he had in himself and this whole trip. Was this really the right thing, would it bring him any closer to salvation? Until now there was no sign that it would and he feared that the gods might have put him on this earth just to mock him and add a further punishment to his soul for whatever crime had been committed in an earlier life - or lives - and that there was no salvation to be had in this existence. But whether he knew it or not salvation may have been a lot closer, than he thought. Myra's comforting palm on his chin contrasted her loving but firm words, which seemed much in need for Vithkun to accept himself properly. His eyes caught hers and fell into the bright deep wonder that looked at him with such endless care for the elf - a care he could not show himself and much less knew how to handle. Her loving words and gaze pained him for it was now clear what he had not been able to give himself for all this time. But for all the pain and self suffering the warmth of Myra's touch seemed to simultaneously relieve him of it too as if it was finally allowed to seep out. How could he have missed something that obvious when it announced itself right in front of him time and time again? His hands placed themselves gently on Myra's waist and her neck drawing her closer - he would not even ask her to keep this a secret for her cared not whether it remained as such or not.\"Myra...\" he said as a soft grin crept up his cheeks when he met her warm body his breathing heavier and Myra being able to feel his heart speeding up as he would touch his lips upon hers. Initially just a touch to declare his intentions and if she would not resist he would slowly lean into the kiss pressing her tighter against himself while gently but firmly closing his left fingers grasping her hair in passion and enjoying the second meeting of the two elven souls - meetings that seemed destined to happen only far beneath the revealing moonlight and prying stars. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The elf felt shame so deeply that even his heart started trembling - it started to doubt in the conviction he had in himself and this whole trip. Was this really the right thing, would it bring him any closer to salvation? Until now there was no sign that it would and he feared that the gods might have put him on this earth just to mock him and add a further punishment to his soul for whatever crime had been committed in an earlier life - or lives - and that there was no salvation to be had in this existence. "}, "post-89688": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1554137888000", "message": "His trembling was not frightening to her, she might have held him properly, given him all she had if had not been for is earlier refusal of her. Once he had kissed her, drunkenly, and after quite a few insults from a proper dwarf whom he\u2019d come to despise. Myra could not despise Davis for his insecurity for she misunderstood his intentions then, just as she did now with Vith. She looked to him as if were her stars for in the depths of the darkness of the pool both stripped of the masks they carried he had shown his light. Not the overwhelming bravery he\u2019d given the villagers, nor the outright overzealous manner of speaking that he had, but the simple light of the kindness of his soul. The compassion within him and the want for the best for his people. His own bravery and courage and in a moment of true integrity his own honesty.He had shifted his stance, took her within his arms, drawn her towards him in the same instant and while her heart cried for release for once she felt uncertain. Was this to be a repeat of before? Was he to kiss her and say it was a mistake to have done so. Having sealed herself off from all she felt after that incident he tore off the blood bandage and laid her wounds out for her to see. They were festering and untreated and he was attempting to heal them and his scars by bonding them together through more than friendship. He kissed her and for the gods she had damned but moments ago she kissed him in return. His tentativeness never needed she raised up to meet him before she could feel guilty that she was the other party to another female. A horrid reminder in the way he drew at the strands of her hair and she found her arms around him, and then not. They shifted downward to his chest gently pushing him back. \u201cVith,\u201d so breathless was his name spoken, so sweetly on her lips as it had not been before, but so devastatingly saddened in what came after, \u201cI cannot do this. You are betrothed and when you take the jewel back you shall prove yourself and find your destiny. It lies in the arms of another woman  and on a throne which I will never see but I hope that by you being on it you will prove to be a greater king than all your forefathers.\u201d ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "His trembling was not frightening to her, she might have held him properly, given him all she had if had not been for is earlier refusal of her. Once he had kissed her, drunkenly, and after quite a few insults from a proper dwarf whom he\u2019d come to despise. Myra could not despise Davis for his insecurity for she misunderstood his intentions then, just as she did now with Vith. She looked to him as if were her stars for in the depths of the darkness of the pool both stripped of the masks they carried he had shown his light. Not the overwhelming bravery he\u2019d given the villagers, nor the outright overzealous manner of speaking that he had, but the simple light of the kindness of his soul. The compassion within him and the want for the best for his people. His own bravery and courage and in a moment of true integrity his own honesty."}, "post-89690": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1554154321000", "message": "The sweetness of the lips touching and their tongues connecting was sweeter than any nectar, any song or any star Vithkun had ever experienced in High Haven. Having her this close was pure bliss and opposed to the time with the dwarfs it felt exactly right. It felt like he could shed any fear or doubt right now... But then it ended. Not by lack of air while drowning in each other but by the will enacted by the drow.\"Myra..?\" he asked perplexed feeling her palms putting distance between them yet again. What had gone wrong? How was it, that when he was ready and sure she wasn't? Of course she was right, he was betrothed to his fiancee - at least that was what he had made her believe. \"Myra... Myra..!\" he said trying to get her attention smiling at her words but saddened by her expression. \"She is indeed my betrothed... but in High Haven one can be betrothed to many at the same time and only the one proving him or herself worthy will marry this person. She is not chosen by my love but by the throne!\" he said firmly trying to explain things as clear cut as he was able to while his feelings were in such disarray.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The sweetness of the lips touching and their tongues connecting was sweeter than any nectar, any song or any star Vithkun had ever experienced in High Haven. Having her this close was pure bliss and opposed to the time with the dwarfs it felt exactly right. It felt like he could shed any fear or doubt right now... But then it ended. Not by lack of air while drowning in each other but by the will enacted by the drow."}, "post-89691": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1554163401000", "message": "Her grief was meant to be rather quickly extinguished by his explanation and his joy took her aback. Rather when he smiled she shifted her position hands dropping from his chest to his forearms keeping him literally at arm's length by the action for he could not lean forward without them moving. Watching him as he spoke he smiled with such glee like it solved everything and yet it did not. \"So therefore if you want to ascend to the throne you will have to marry this woman that was chosen to be the future Queen?\" It did not take much to clarify that question, a simple yes or no. Vithkun was quite set on obtaining the throne. It had been proven quickly by his earlier words about his commitment to the cause of finding the jewel itself. How many times had he attempted to talk her out of it, offered her coins or some other trinket she might find worthy in return, how often had he simply put on a front in order to achieve his goals. Was she gifted enough to pick apart the truth from the falsehoods he had shown her? Right now, here, in the dark he had shared so openly and she felt this was truly who he was but who was she to deny him what his birthright was?", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Her grief was meant to be rather quickly extinguished by his explanation and his joy took her aback. Rather when he smiled she shifted her position hands dropping from his chest to his forearms keeping him literally at arm's length by the action for he could not lean forward without them moving. Watching him as he spoke he smiled with such glee like it solved everything and yet it did not. "}, "post-89694": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1554189254000", "message": "The explanation Vith offered her was true, but even he himself had not yet pondered its consequences and it struck him like a fist hearing it come from her mouth. Just a few moments ago that was but a theoretical problem and he had been ready to stay inside that cave with Myra until the last of his days - keeping their taint and forgetting all about the jewel. It was such a naive sentiment. \"Yes.\" Vithkun replied reluctantly now understanding fully what kind of situation he was in. If he chose the throne, he would not get Myra. If he chose to pass on the throne, Myra would likely not have him for abandoning his duty and destiny. \"Yes it is true that my path - and your path - is evidently set to divide when all this is done.\" Vithkun said as his heart grew heavy for the burden it was to once again have to deny his true feelings and face the cold facts - but this time it was different. He knew he could not just stop these emotions but had no clue how to change his situation - although a fire of revolt towards this whole mess was starting to slowly ignite inside him. \"We... better go get some sleep for the night.\" he said with a soft but tormented smile as he briefly brushed her cheek and nodded towards the shore. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The explanation Vith offered her was true, but even he himself had not yet pondered its consequences and it struck him like a fist hearing it come from her mouth. Just a few moments ago that was but a theoretical problem and he had been ready to stay inside that cave with Myra until the last of his days - keeping their taint and forgetting all about the jewel. It was such a naive sentiment. "}, "post-89698": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1554231941000", "message": "Divide because of poor decisions on both parts, she thought. It was not a relief to know they would be separated, rather the opposite, for the past four weeks and been the greatest of her life. Despite the danger and plotting and his rather annoying countenance at first she knew that after this she would be lost for a time. Returning to help Annonnai might ease some of her pain but not relieve it fully for it would take decades to forget all that she had lost in such a short period. \u201cThat\u2019s probably for the best,\u201d he touched her cheek and she wanted so badly to take the hand that did so, to pull it downward and him closer and to forget their problems until the morning. Frankly it would have been the easiest approach for the moment but much harder to know what more she lost from it. Retreating to the shore they had not spent long in the pools but their clothes seemed to have been dried spectacularly by the dryer heat on land. Drawing back on everything but boots and socks for they were still quite soaked they bedded own for the night. The ground was hard but her heart was growing harder at the tasks before them. They laid not much distance from one another in the darkness but the silence was quite more deafening and more distance than either could elaborate on. She fell asleep the last thing she saw his face in those few moments. In the morning she rose first the light barely filtering in from above. It appeared without the lights they would have been left in total darkness. Grabbing her boots she had no weapons as he did as they had been laid down but she doubted that any test they faced now was one of physical strength because the first last time had not been. Waiting at the entrance of the hall she carried with her a nervous energy. Her hair left out of a braid for once she was constantly tucking it back behind her ears to keep it out of the way. And to give her hands something to do. \u201cReady?\u201d She asked him once he appeared to be so. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Divide because of poor decisions on both parts, she thought. It was not a relief to know they would be separated, rather the opposite, for the past four weeks and been the greatest of her life. Despite the danger and plotting and his rather annoying countenance at first she knew that after this she would be lost for a time. Returning to help Annonnai might ease some of her pain but not relieve it fully for it would take decades to forget all that she had lost in such a short period. "}, "post-89702": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1554273344000", "message": "\"For the best...\" Vithkun echoed Myra with a whisper. Before this he knew what was for the best and claiming the Crimson Ascend was certainly for the best and so was ascending the throw but now he was torn. The drow had shown him so many things, things that could not be shown by stars or story, things that only such a thing as 'love' would reveal. Coming back to the shore he was surprised at how quickly his other clothes was drying up too and lay down on the hard rocky bed content with this for now and waited until he could hear Myra's breath slowing down and becoming deeper. He slowly sat up and folded his hands looking up at the dim light source in the cave wondering what he had to do to make things right. What kind of elf king to be would he be, if he had let Myra come this far only to take the jewel for himself and part ways with her? There were so many questions and only after hours of pondering and walking around the place did he finally find the peace he needed to rest. Not out of a clear mind but out of exhaustion. The dreamscape that unfolded was however not one of tranquility as normally with elves, but one of strife, doubt and bitterness. Waking up his body may be rested but his mind was hardly much better off than yesterday. Both elves were too preoccupied to do anything but getting ready and looking at Myra it was clear that she had suffered at least the same amount of stress that he had - but her words about him being ready was a sobering question. He had to be ready and give his best now - Vithkun could give much care to what lay beyond the jewel at this moment. \"Yes.\" he replied straightening himself as he carried but his sword on his side. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"For the best...\" Vithkun echoed Myra with a whisper. Before this he knew what was for the best and claiming the Crimson Ascend was certainly for the best and so was ascending the throw but now he was torn. The drow had shown him so many things, things that could not be shown by stars or story, things that only such a thing as 'love' would reveal. "}, "post-89703": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1554295830000", "message": "\u201cThe entrance is hidden to the naked eye and would have been beyond my own capabilities to discover normally as I do not work in illusions but eventually I did find it,\u201d the time had come for them to enter the halls of which she had spoke very little of. They walked for a time turning left, and right, and passing different halls and moving through a maze. She had been here for some time on her last visit but thankfully she\u2019d had supplies then to soothe her. Coming to what appeared to be a dead end she would explain, \u201cEvery hall that I came to seemed to dead end. I knew there had to be some trick to it but it took me a time to feel it.\u201dNerves did not betray her in her hands as they reached out searching for the break in the fabric. It was as if there was a loose strand settled along the lightest breeze and by plucking it the whole spool would unravel from where it had been threaded revealing the doorway, or lack of one, as there was only an entrance. Like a tent where the wind ripped at the opening the veil between these two places could have transported them anywhere but at her request it would take them to where the gem was located.\u201cThrough here,\u201d wasting no time for assumptions or for questions he had followed her this far, what was one step farther into the unimaginable, her hand extended for his assuming that he took it she advised him to, \u201cTake a deep breath and hold it,\u201d before drawing upon him as they passed beyond it.A chill settled into their bones very briefly. Pouring through their veins as if ice itself had been released among the heat of their blood as their heart pumped it swallowing the tendrils of the frozen onslaught as it surrounded the very vessels on the outside of it. Had he not held his breath he would have certainly felt it within his lungs. It was one small relief but not enough to entirely forgive the ordeal itself as they landed flat footed. Their skin felt as if they had walked through water but none lingered upon them, no sign of the shifting of planes noticeable now but the feel of it would never be forgotten.Myra let go of his grasp leaning forward with hands on knees as she struggled to breath the free air now. Gasping and gulping Vithkun would have no time to assist her as he himself would feel as if he had been suffocated briefly and only then given relief. Myra had been aware of the result of their passing but feared he might hesitate if he had known, or if he knew what he would see then when his eyes raised.The floor had been polished smooth as glass, dark in appearance but reflecting the very world above it, the ceiling was if they were in a cave with mineral deposits thrusting downward crystals broken and growing with no rhyme or reason. The area itself was wide with no visible walls at first until he might realize they were reflecting inward as well making it appear as if this world was endless. It was not the vastness that would be bothersome but as it could be explained away by the mind but what accompanied it, what remained there for them to walk through. There were statues, each of an elf and each holding a torch within their hand or hands held aloft and spitting blue flames. Further investigation would reveal these statues to be beautiful, the details almost impeccable. The clothing styles of each were different and if he recalled his history most would be dressed in the current style of all of the ages before his. It was not until he might pass one he could see the solemn look of melancholy each possessed. None seemed pleased or indifferent, only burdened by the fate of forever waiting, and holding their own light.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\u201cThe entrance is hidden to the naked eye and would have been beyond my own capabilities to discover normally as I do not work in illusions but eventually I did find it,\u201d the time had come for them to enter the halls of which she had spoke very little of. They walked for a time turning left, and right, and passing different halls and moving through a maze. She had been here for some time on her last visit but thankfully she\u2019d had supplies then to soothe her. Coming to what appeared to be a dead end she would explain, \u201cEvery hall that I came to seemed to dead end. I knew there had to be some trick to it but it took me a time to feel it.\u201d"}, "post-89704": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1554310213000", "message": "They walked quite a ways before finally reaching the place Myra had talked about being hidden. The pure elves weren't bad at spotting illusions, but these illusions that were more mechanical in nature and not based upon nature itself was something he was more unfamiliar with. \"Is this made by the dwarves I wonder? They tinker a lot with hidden entrances and illusory doors - I honestly don't know if it's a drow art also?\" he asked Myra curiously as he saw her prove that she knew indeed some way of dispelling illusions. \"Well done, I hadn't spotted that.\" he complimented her with a professional tone seeing the thread unravel. \"Is it...? A portal?\" he asked and hesitated to follow Myra. \"Portals are not to be trifled with, you could end up in the nether regions beneath the dining table of demons far worse than Volypdaktos.\" Vithkun said firmly waving his finger indicating caution although it seemed like there was no talking her out of it - or getting a proper explanation. \"A deep breath?!?\" he asked deeply skeptically but obliged and took the hand of the drow knowing that coming this far would only mean that the challenges would rise and he would be in for a steep learning curve. The cold was unforgivable yet not malign but coursed through Vithkun's veins seemingly attempting to freeze his very blood from the inside. Holding his breath he followed Myra hoping for the torturous frosty grip upon his soul to end very quickly - and so it did as they stepped out of the dimension door and he could finally breath again. A quick but gasping glance of acknowledgement was sent towards Myra as Vithkun now understood what will she possessed - because a lot was needed to guide one to the right place under such circumstances between the shifting planes. Typically wizards and warlocks would create multiple wards and incantations upon themselves to prepare for this and they had just walked through it all exposed and Vith gave a wry smile thinking about the recklessness they had just shown.Slowly shaking off the feeling of suffocation his eyes started to scan the place while his body straightened and he noticed the obsidian and polished floor, the vastness of the room and the odd crystals in the ceiling. What struck Vithkun, and had his jaw hanging but a little open, was the immaculately made statues that were clearly put there to show a path. \"This is... unbelievable.\" he said and looked at the ones with the torches and then those with the blue flames. \"Their clothes... This place is ancient!\" he said and turned to Myra stunned not only by the vastness in space but also by the vastness of time this place had been here. \"However... What is this... sadness I seem to feel in my heart when I look upon them? This burden they carry?\" he asked himself but also put the question in a way so Myra might chip in.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "They walked quite a ways before finally reaching the place Myra had talked about being hidden. The pure elves weren't bad at spotting illusions, but these illusions that were more mechanical in nature and not based upon nature itself was something he was more unfamiliar with. "}, "post-89705": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1554311497000", "message": "\u201cA portal,\u201d she echoed but an air of uncertainty lingered in her words as they fell through on the other side, \u201cI have no talent with it but I did as much research as possible before coming here. Aligning my path with the stone itself meant that there was much I had to learn and when I came to it I knew it was a test as well as any that might have come before it. The leap into the cavern was perhaps meant to be done from the top instead of sliding down a rope but I still could not see it. Considering that some light comes in from above I think that there is some spell upon the entrance. Enough to make one believe it is never ending.\u201d Explaining further it was the most she had said in some time but if trust was to be given to her he needed more explanations than, take my hand and hold your breath. Here on the other side without precaution taken when passing through she gave him a more thorough one. \u201cI knew at the very least that passing through would not harm us for my intent is different from most that entered here.\u201dThe statues that they faced ran the length of the hall. The very place was about 6 meters wide, at least a hundred long, and spanned upward in the range of 30-40 with the crystals filling the gaps of the space. No dwarven lights existed here, only the fires that they held within their hands and above them. Each stone face carried an expression that he had noticed immediately, commented upon further, cared about their pain in the way it gripped him. It had chilled her as well the first time. \u201cI looked at them all before,\u201d she told him looking down the expanse each statue approximately a meter apart both from the side and front and situated with varying positions but none reaching their arms out to the side only forward. Medusa herself might have been proud of the arrangement, \u201cAs near as I could tell none seem to be before the jewel itself was taken and not all are elven. It took me some time to learn such for the only real difference was the choice in clothing for some of them. Our kind carries no distinctive marks from one another it seems when all is said and done.\u201d", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\u201cA portal,\u201d she echoed but an air of uncertainty lingered in her words as they fell through on the other side, \u201cI have no talent with it but I did as much research as possible before coming here. Aligning my path with the stone itself meant that there was much I had to learn and when I came to it I knew it was a test as well as any that might have come before it. The leap into the cavern was perhaps meant to be done from the top instead of sliding down a rope but I still could not see it. Considering that some light comes in from above I think that there is some spell upon the entrance. Enough to make one believe it is never ending.\u201d "}, "post-89707": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1554316748000", "message": "It made sense that the entire place was enchanted in the different places and Vithkun did not doubt that he would be unable to ascertain even half the illusions that were put onto this place. \"A long time ago the reclusive and mystical Nature Elves that excelled in memories and dreams and the more sophisticated and aesthetically interested Skyborn Elves found each other and soon they were marrying back and forth between the clans gaining great knowledge and learning countless abilities from the opposing clan. Over only a few hundred years they started settling and living in the same land and the Skyborn, who were known for being masters of elemental creation through magic, and the Nature Elves, who were peerless at conjuring up illusions of extreme beauty and accuracy became as one race. Later they became known as 'Pure Elves' and the land as 'High Haven'.\" Vithkun told Myra in a very elaborate response. \"However among the Pure Elves no one has been born with proficiency in both creation and illusion yet and one will only master one of the arts - never both. I was of course born as one who can do physical creation which ties me to the Skyborn, and even putting in hard work the illusions I can do are only very rudimentary and requires my greatest effort and concentration. For some of the best of my kin illusions are conjured with a natural effort like that of breathing.\" he said nostalgically thinking back on his proud ancestry. \"Also...\" he said and smiled. \"You can usually tell by my branch having somewhat less pointy ears..!\" he explained and pointed to them indicating them to be shorter and less curved then those that had inherited the skills of the Nature Elves. \"So never trust what a long eared elf shows you - if you ever pass one from High Haven.\" he said jestingly and winked. Later when Vithkun was examening the statues closer he couldn't but think of what Myra had said about her intent having protected her from harm through the portal. \"You're right, not all here are elves and some of these clothes could easily be from after it had happened. But... why erect statues after that event? Are these people some kind of champions? Golem protectors of this place that might awaken when attacked?\" Vithkun asked and shivered slightly as he walked along the path with his hands on his back trying do feel if there was any magic that might indicate inherent life to these beings. \"As I explained I'm quite good with creation magic but I can't sense that these should start moving because of inherent life.\" he said and frowned as he continued to move forwards scrutinizing the statues as he paced along them. Suddenly Vithkun came to an abrupt halt looking right at one of the statues. \"Th... this is..!\" he said as his eyes scanned the details of the face before he turned to Myra and pointed at it. \"This is Maexar Almear, my great grandfather!\" he said taken aback by the lifelike presentation. \"Wait..!\" he said and stumbled a few steps back. \"My great grandfather was an adventurer and he vanished in this area as it was recorded and was never found. It makes absolutely no sense, that anyone would have made a statue of him - and much less with this degree of accuracy!\" Vithkun argued feeling almost frightened. \"Unless...\" he added and almost didn't want to finish his deduction out of fear that it was indeed correct. \"That it was once him...\" he said with a grim expression and tilted his head looking at the statue knowing it was true. \"He must have sought what I'm seeking...\" Vithkun said and felt his own story mirrored when looking at his ancestor - but also a warning that in some way his grandfather had evidently failed a test. Failed it along with at least a hundred more down here as suddenly a profound sadness caught onto Vithkun and his shoulder fell along with his otherwise determined gaze. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "It made sense that the entire place was enchanted in the different places and Vithkun did not doubt that he would be unable to ascertain even half the illusions that were put onto this place. "}, "post-89708": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1554318291000", "message": "Listening to his explanation he would have made a fantastic teacher in expressing history in a way that could be easily understood as well as with humor implied into it that made even the sourest of Drow smile within the darkness of the shadows cast upon them. His speech eloquent there was no opening in which to interject for some time and when she did so it was with a hand placed on the shoulder of another, a woman, to say, \u201cThis one is Drow, Usharan I do believe.\u201d His own explanation much longer she would elaborate a moment later coming to another, a male this time, \u201cAnd this one of Baleoc,\u201d her fingers touched a pendant placed upon the collar in order to show them, \u201cThe land of the Drow is but a small corner of the world but we are separated by choice. A line of death surrounds us, ash that has been borne of the world surrounding it. Born of war and death that came from the very destruction of those who opposed us. Declared to be our border by the intensity of such a magic. Born of stars and yet seeking shelter in the darkness our skin is still darkened from a time that we saw no light. Now we are more akin to yourselves in our respect for what lies within the boundaries, there are forests and mountains, and the citadel that I spoke to you of before. The land is separated into factions where great families take ownership and form the council of the King. The Drow were meant to be protectors of the night. I know much that I should not from the council. We once lived as one people separated only by the intensity of the sun as your brethren guarded our sleep and when we rose so did we guard them. Nature and Sky combined over time and some of the Drow were combined in their ranks. There are still a few in High Haven I am sure who have Drow blood within their history whether they choose to remember it or not. We have the same past but not the same future it seems. Our differences were enough to divide as your skills were kept in the lighter places of the world and a faction of my own decided to dip into dark magic, pale magic as it were for Ashborn were formed of it. I was told that all had been extinguished long ago but not before it tore a rift between us and caused a Great War. One we eventually were able to draw a peace from and from where the Crimson Ascent itself was offered in good faith. Peace only lasts so long with such deep seated emotions and with true separation of our lands how could we expect much to change.\u201d Reminiscing as well his history lesson sparked her own. The rendering of ever piece he passed was immaculate. Perfection in the sharp planes of their faces, in the wide slant of their eyes, even minute noticeable flaws such as a hair out of place here or there and clothing with small holes torn into the fabric as it laid against their skin. The chill of the portal was nothing compared to his realization that the passageway they walked through now was not some great mural or piece. This was a graveyard. One committed to capturing likeness by freezing the very passage of time in solid stone and each represented here was truly not a representation but the person themselves. She knew this from her first passing but to know that a relative of Vithkun\u2019s was trapped here, that she never could have been aware of. The instant that he began to speak, that he declared himself knowing of the man she joined his side. It was swift, the way she flitted between them with a purposeful walk. His shoulder dropped and she supported it hand on his upper arm making him take heed of her intense gaze, \u201cYou are not he, and you have not come alone, we will not make the mistakes of others because we are together. Whatever comes we will face it as one.\u201d", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Listening to his explanation he would have made a fantastic teacher in expressing history in a way that could be easily understood as well as with humor implied into it that made even the sourest of Drow smile within the darkness of the shadows cast upon them. His speech eloquent there was no opening in which to interject for some time and when she did so it was with a hand placed on the shoulder of another, a woman, to say, \u201cThis one is Drow, Usharan I do believe.\u201d "}, "post-89709": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1554324477000", "message": "Myra's own explanation that followed had Vithkun's ears immediately interested. 'Usharan' and 'Baleoc - Myra was 'Host', which he knew to be the least flattering of the surnames you could be granted so he saw no reason to dig any deeper into what kind of nobility those two were - because they were certainly seen as much higher in drow society than her. However the facts that she put on the table had Vithkun surprised.\"As one people? Are you perfectly sure? Nothing in our annals says anything about that, and our lands are so far apart that I hardly see it being possible?\" Vithkun said and shrugged although he wouldn't want to be too rude about her - probably - having been sold a lie. But for his skepticism at least this had made him think because obviously things were not as clear cut as he had thought previously. The two people must once have had reason to go into war with each other, and may have even lived closer to each other than they did now. \"I suppose there is more to find out - at least I now have some questions to seek answers to.\" Vithkun said although he kept it to himself which questions that was to be exact. The realization was a tough one for Vith and biting his own lip he had to muster all the willpower in his soul in order to not cower and lose his faith. However as to not lose himself completely Myra's support was crucial as she touched his arm and had him look at her through that steely gaze that now looked at him firmly - almost as if they wanted to scold him and yet... such caring and merciful love they showed him once again. Her words were empowering and nodding to Myra he looked at his great grandfather silently paying him the respect that was due - but the real respect Vithkun felt was towards Myra. Such a difficult time they had had together with the rampant emotions they still carried and she was still brave enough to catch him when it mattered. He was grateful.\"Thank you, Myra. We will indeed!\" he said with a smile that was now stronger and brimming with intent. \"Let's finish this march of death and see what the old drow had in mind for us!\" Vithkun said determined and started pacing down along the people eternally frozen in time but himself feeling suddenly very much alive and energetic with Myra by his side being such a strengthening of his will and soul. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Myra's own explanation that followed had Vithkun's ears immediately interested. 'Usharan' and 'Baleoc - Myra was 'Host', which he knew to be the least flattering of the surnames you could be granted so he saw no reason to dig any deeper into what kind of nobility those two were - because they were certainly seen as much higher in drow society than her. However the facts that she put on the table had Vithkun surprised."}, "post-89710": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1554327042000", "message": "Half a conversation led before his discovery she answered before needing to rush to his side, \u201cThe elders that spoke to me were blinded by the starlight. Perhaps they knew what I was but they did not speak upon it nor elaborate other than to express that there was a great power that had split us on both sides,\u201d forlorn in a sense at the loss she added not unkindly, \u201cI think both of our people want to view things as the best from their own point of view.\u201dIt was a fair enough assumption or the history of the world was written by the victors. Those victors would declare themselves as the righteous, or at least more righteous than the others. It was simply to the benefit of elves that their long lives allowed them to see more clearly. Surely some knew the truth even if their seclusion meant a lack of currently knowledge of the world. \u201cThat\u2019s the spirit,\u201d she stated following him with a wry smile. He had a way of bolstering himself that she felt almost unnecessary. Surely he might have done the same without her aid and marched off with enough confidence to start his own private war. Following him along the path they would come to the end of the hall, a rough wall surrounded the far side, not reflective as the rest with a center doorway. Two doors that were of grand size, enough that one would struggle to open both by themselves for they were of a staggering height. The doors were made of a white stone, Myra recognized it as the stone of the capital city, a rare find in Drow lands much less outside of them. The handles were of the same polished obsidian as the floor. At least a foot in height and long narrow tubes that were hollow should one bang on them. The doors came together in the center with no locks, only a line of silver that plated the edges of the doors going to the top where it met in a half circle, and then down around the sides to the bottom. One one door there was elven script, long, flowing, beautiful, but missing words. On the right there was Drow, a harsher tilt to the way the letters were formed but definitely related to the elvish. It bore the same odd style where there were spaces for missing words between them. The rock had been carved out in those places, roughly, as if chisel had met stone. The elven side stated, \u201dEnter - and - that - you -. For - you are worthy  it - be yours. - be, - alone you - -, together - rise.\u201d The Drow side was in an older dialect, which was difficult to read even for one well versed in the language but for what was not scratched out stated, \u201c- Friend - find - which - - seek. - if you - worthy - shall be yours. Weary -, for alone you fail* - you rise.\u201d *The word fail is almost unreadable. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Half a conversation led before his discovery she answered before needing to rush to his side, \u201cThe elders that spoke to me were blinded by the starlight. Perhaps they knew what I was but they did not speak upon it nor elaborate other than to express that there was a great power that had split us on both sides,\u201d forlorn in a sense at the loss she added not unkindly, \u201cI think both of our people want to view things as the best from their own point of view.\u201d"}, "post-89714": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1554447698000", "message": "As the two elves had finally paced through the 'walk of death' they arrived at a dead end where a huge non reflective wall stopped their path along with a couple of equally impressive doors that seemed to have been made from the most impressive craftsmen. Vithkun immediately noticed the writing on the doors that seemed to indicate some kind of puzzle was meant to be solved to open the doors.\"With no locks and the text on the doors I would assume that we have to solve this riddle to make it open. Everything about this door brims of magic enchantments - but not one that I could hope to break with my own inscription I'm afraid.\" he said and briefly glanced back at the statues wondering how many of them had tried to force their way through. Perhaps... Just perhaps if he used the ring he still had in his pocket he might be able to rearrange the composition of the doors and the enchantments to... No, it carried a huge risk and he could feel several layers of magic here that might mean unexpected surprises for both of them. Vithkun leaned in closer to inspect the finely inscripted words. \"I assume that one is drow?\" he said and looked at the slightly more crude writings opposite to the clearly elven ones. \"You can probably read what it says on my side, but I don't recognize what it says there?\" Vithkun admitted hoping Myra might be able to translate it if they were to make sense of it. \"Do you have any idea of what the missing words are all about? Are we supposed to rearrange them or know some kind of code passed down through time?\" he said and looked around for clues to the puzzle that might be just in front of them.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "As the two elves had finally paced through the 'walk of death' they arrived at a dead end where a huge non reflective wall stopped their path along with a couple of equally impressive doors that seemed to have been made from the most impressive craftsmen. Vithkun immediately noticed the writing on the doors that seemed to indicate some kind of puzzle was meant to be solved to open the doors."}, "post-89715": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1554470153000", "message": "\u201cWhen we first met I told you I had seen this place, knew the words that were written, this is what I meant,\u201d wistful in reminiscing about the fact he had not believed her she touched the door without fear. The world here was based on illusion and fantasy. Some things were real and some were not and judging which was which was impossible for her when surrounded by such strong magic. Its presentation was certainly beautiful in the aching hearts of those trapped behind them, \u201cI can read both,\u201d he already assumed such and so she openly said it, \u201cThough it took time to figure out what this word was,\u201d her fingertips brushed the word fail. It. Had been sanded down to but barely a semblance of what it was, \u201cWhen I first arrived I attempted to figure out the gaps in each. I took paper and brushed ink over each. The others were scratched out, but this one, this one I was able to infer the true meaning. The word is fail.\u201dBoth doors loomed, great in height above them and it was true there was no discernible locks. If tried they would open should he pull on his respective side and she had on her last visit. Attempted at least and it had budged but fear of the words upon it made her stop something frightening in the unknown and the sudden chill that ran down her spine. The little it had moved there was no light, but shadow, that came from the opening. Stretching like a hand, reaching, asking for release it seemed. Slamming it back into place and leaning against it she almost believed she\u2019d seen one of the figures before her move but passed it off quickly when neither did again. Informing Vithkun of this not to frighten him but to reassure him that it would take the two of them to dispel whatever lay behind it. \u201cThey match one another,\u201d she finally told him backing up a step for a clear view, \u201cIt took me a time to understand it but where there are gaps on the left they are filled on the right, some words are the same as well. To the best of my knowledge it says, \u201cEnter friend and find that which you seek. For if you are worthy it shall be yours. Weary be, for alone you fail, together you rise.\u201d", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\u201cWhen we first met I told you I had seen this place, knew the words that were written, this is what I meant,\u201d wistful in reminiscing about the fact he had not believed her she touched the door without fear. "}, "post-89716": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1554496310000", "message": "Vithkun carefully traced her words about the doors and put his own hand on the door slowly wrapping his fingers around the handle only to feel as if a shadow simultaneously gripped a handle on the other side wanting him to open - wanting him to step into his doom. He quickly released the handle.\"This is a foul enchantment..!\" he exclaimed and unconsciously took a step back. While Myra explained how the two texts matched Vithkun nodded and in some way the simplicity of this puzzle was also its beauty.\"So this is the proof that elf and drow most work together in order to be able to enter safely. Two incomplete sentences that complete each other when put together.\" he said while a faint smile acknowledged the brilliance of the maker of this riddle - but also slightly loathed what the consequence failure would present them. \"How would you go about it? Do we speak the sentences together and then open the doors in unison?\" he asked thinking perhaps it did not have to be much more difficult than that. Or perhaps it was.  ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Vithkun carefully traced her words about the doors and put his own hand on the door slowly wrapping his fingers around the handle only to feel as if a shadow simultaneously gripped a handle on the other side wanting him to open - wanting him to step into his doom. He quickly released the handle."}, "post-89718": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1554525406000", "message": "\u201cThe enchantment I believe is the test, most of our kinds are susceptible to feeling that sensation,\u201d a chill still ran down her spine even when he touched the handle as if to pull, \u201cI do not believe that we have to speak it,\u201d drawing back a step she looked up to the horizon of the door, \u201cIf it is truly about understanding the others speech perhaps we have to open the opposite door?\u201dThe statues behind them told a story of failure. Perhaps with this door, perhaps with the next, perhaps with the failure of not understanding and simply waiting long enough for something to slink past the door that could be harmful in its very nature. Myra had been here for some time and never attempted to open them other than once. It had been enough to deter her from doing so again. \u201cThe simplicity of the problem was only the start, making two work together that generally despised one another was the true trick to it,\u201d wistful again she touched his shoulder and said, \u201cBut we did not come this far to back down now. Together?\u201d If he was prepared she would move to the elven door. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\u201cThe enchantment I believe is the test, most of our kinds are susceptible to feeling that sensation,\u201d a chill still ran down her spine even when he touched the handle as if to pull, \u201cI do not believe that we have to speak it,\u201d drawing back a step she looked up to the horizon of the door, \u201cIf it is truly about understanding the others speech perhaps we have to open the opposite door?\u201d"}, "post-89719": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1554558037000", "message": "Vithkun stroked his chin looking to the other door. Myra was making sense, but how could they know, that they were to open the opposite door?\"So just opening the opposite door? It seems awfully risky...\" Vithkun declared looking twice at Myra. Was she prepared to take such risks to get the jewel or... were there other reasons he didn't know about?\"Well if you're prepared to try it, I am too.\" Vithkun said determined smiling as she touched his shoulder and switched sides with Myra. He put his hand firmly on the handle trying to feel whatever magic may be behind the door - but this time nothing revealed itself to him. This might be both a good or a bad thing. Locking eyes with Myra Vithkun nodded and gave her a tense smile. \"Let's do it...\" he said and continued his sentence silently '...right.' as he would pull the handle at the same time as Myra.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Vithkun stroked his chin looking to the other door. Myra was making sense, but how could they know, that they were to open the opposite door?"}, "post-89720": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1554571637000", "message": "\u201cNothing comes without risks,\u201d she echoed his word back to him surprised at his determination for it was only a moment of hesitation that he showed before switching her sides. Whatever lie in wait they would face it together and though her reasons were no longer clear nor were they in the forefront of her mind. Only the next task. Gripping the handle it was chilled from the air but not as cold as the portal. Both hands required the wait for him to declare it was time had them both yanking back perhaps harder than necessary. The door was easy to open, it slid forth as if the invisible hinges were well oiled and what was revealed was nothing. At first. It was pitch black. Then it blew out the door in a torrent. Like black sand within the air swirling and surrounding them and flying through the poses of the others covering the light of the flames that they held aloft. It wrapped around the nape of both of them like tendrils soft and sweet caressing the hair and tugging on it lightly, covering their ears. Never invading their lungs they could breath, and it shifted away from their mouths to allow them to do so. Both would be unable to see the other as it occurred but they could hear whispers. Whispers that sounded as if they came from all directions surrounding Vithkun and Myra separately. They spoke as if they were the sand, silted and sweet, drawing in as if attempting to sound alluring, \u201cLittle Prince,\u201d they whispered in his ears, \u201cYou seek to challenge us but what right do you have... you sit second for the throne and yet you whisper deceit to yourself claiming it will be yours. Wanting something you shall never have and denying your other desires in order to seek a falsehood. You break tradition by ignorance of what fate has in store for you Little Prince...\u201d If he tried to speak it would swallow his words, no sound emerging, but laughter in his ear, the cold cackling making his blood burn hot instead of cold, attempting to get a rise out of him, \u201cDo you think you will succeed? Perhaps you shall but you will lose that which matters most and yet you cannot admit that it matters even a little. You lie to yourself and replace your mask even as it cracks around you. Put your lies on the line Little Prince, see how far they take you...\u201d ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\u201cNothing comes without risks,\u201d she echoed his word back to him surprised at his determination for it was only a moment of hesitation that he showed before switching her sides. Whatever lie in wait they would face it together and though her reasons were no longer clear nor were they in the forefront of her mind. Only the next task. "}, "post-89725": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1554624589000", "message": "\"True, risks are what's needed when trying to move things forward.\" he chimed bracing himself as he pulled the handle. The door slid open in an almost welcoming manner although what lay behind it could hardly be described as such. An obsidian black space of nothingness awaited Vithkun's gaze and as he turned his head towards Myra to ask what to do now, suddenly it seemed like it was animated into life. Black dust and crumbs came towards the elf like a gale and he instinctively raised both arms to shield his himself from whatever harm it meant to put on the elf. Only a few moments after when he realized that it would not invade neither mouth nor eyes he saw that Myra was enveloped in the exact same way and he instinctively stretched out his arm towards her. \"Myra..!\" he cried out but at that point it was already too late and the darkness had completely enveloped him leaving him with nothing but throbbing silence. The thoughts raced through his head. Had they misinterpreted the puzzle? Was this how it was like being turned to stone? Of course it was, there was no way that they were smarter than the hundred or so others that had tried gaining entry - what had they been thinking? But as everything happened so quickly the whispers started to emerge - sweet little voices - but their words as venomous as Vithkun remembered the sirens being. \"...!\" Vithkun tried to open his mouth and retaliate as it spoke about his right to covet the throne but his very words were suppressed. He wanted to shout out that it was indeed his and that he had more right than anyone else - he just needed the jewel to make it happen. The voices in his head seemed to persist in its mockery of the elf. At least he interpreted it as such although the words most painful were the ones his heart knew had truth to them. Trying once again to shout out with all the power he had he was unsuccessful and his voice was smothered like a drop in the lake. Yes he was going to get the crimson ascend and with that he was going to become king for sure, discard his scars and... and... Sit on the throne reigning... - and then he saw the dream from last night that had been so blurry and made him restless. Him on a throne of ice holding the Crimson Ascend while the ice was slowly making its way through his limbs and towards... his heart. Vithkun opened his eyes wide as now it was painfully clear what his vision did not contain - it was his love. \"Myraaa!!!\" he tried to shout out as a tear ran down his cheek. 'To hell with the jewel, the scars, the throne..! What I can't afford to lose is what I had all a long. You idiot elf!' he thought to himself the words inside his head burning strong and firm knowing that no matter how his ended he could not let it end in such a way that he lost Myra. She was the center, she was what was truly precious to Vithkun and had managed to do so in just the very few weeks they had been on their journey. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"True, risks are what's needed when trying to move things forward.\" he chimed bracing himself as he pulled the handle. The door slid open in an almost welcoming manner although what lay behind it could hardly be described as such. An obsidian black space of nothingness awaited Vithkun's gaze and as he turned his head towards Myra to ask what to do now, suddenly it seemed like it was animated into life. "}, "post-89728": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1554656649000", "message": "Encased within the sands they slid across his skin like a lovers caress the sweet nothings it whispered fading, but not by his own design and when he spoke her name it came from his lips clearly. Ringing and reaching out in order to guide her. The hand outstretched was met fingertips reaching and slipping on the bottom of his hand until they grasped his wrist. The instant that it made contact the sand collapsed like a sheet blanketing the ground in its pitch the depth of the black broken by shimmering ones of white the mixture to where it sparkled like the stars themselves. The flames reappeared within hand  and torch and they were left standing before the open doors, her clinging to his arm with her own a mixture of fear mingled with the somber realizations the sand had whispered to her captured in her eyes. Her failure had caused such a realization to come over him from its whispers. He had immediately reached for her, stretched forth and attempted to protect her, and she had drawn inward. Caving in like a sinkhole her first instinct had been to go to Vith but the darkness frightened her. Not of her own creation, its appearance reminded her of Annonai and she shrank back like the little mouse she\u2019d killed so long ago. Tears stained the edges of her eyes the pale blue iris being drawn upon by white making it appear as if it were jagged instead of smooth and round. It whispered such things and while his intentions became known to him hers were thrown into disarray. He was now her lifeline as they stood clear of the sand, which did not remain in the doorway. It had fallen and shrank back leaving the pathway clear into the room and behind them. The doors now open they could peer inside but still there was nothing. Vithkun would not be able to see in the pure sheet of night but Myra could. It was an odd presentation to be sure, as the hall seemed to be lit by sconces along one wall and it was oddly straight. The walls of dark rock and the floor of the same hollowed stones that presented like the walk to a dungeon. Glancing downward the stones were laid flat but in them was carved symbols. Not all, but enough that they formed a pathway in a zigzag pattern. They were the symbols of the citadel, for she recognized them, but some next to one another were not in the right order for the climb. If one followed the path as far as she could see you could take them as they came in succession within the citadel itself. Shooken by the third task presented she did not immediately share the sight, nor tear her eyes from Vithkun. No words came from her mouth though it opened and shut quickly a wavering in her form and her confidence shaken. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Encased within the sands they slid across his skin like a lovers caress the sweet nothings it whispered fading, but not by his own design and when he spoke her name it came from his lips clearly. Ringing and reaching out in order to guide her. The hand outstretched was met fingertips reaching and slipping on the bottom of his hand until they grasped his wrist. The instant that it made contact the sand collapsed like a sheet blanketing the ground in its pitch the depth of the black broken by shimmering ones of white the mixture to where it sparkled like the stars themselves. The flames reappeared within hand  and torch and they were left standing before the open doors, her clinging to his arm with her own a mixture of fear mingled with the somber realizations the sand had whispered to her captured in her eyes. "}, "post-89729": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1554663267000", "message": "His last cry for Myra's name had had Vithkun stretching out his arm again, this time even further searching for whatever lay in the dark - and by some miracle it found what it had looked for. The warmth and strength of Myra's hand was impossible to confuse and as soon as they clenched around each other the black dust fell and the sly voices quieted as if they had never been there. Vithkun looked at Myra catching her gaze.\"Myra... Are you alright?\" he asked concerned still feeling what his heart had answered him just moments ago but seeing her face saddened him. \"What did those foul voices speak of lies?\" Vithkun asked and clenched her hand tighter but knew he was unable to ease her tormented soul and instinctively embraced Myra and a tight hug when seeing the tears in her eyes. \"We're going to make it..! And if not, I know I already I have.\" Vithkun said and released his embrace placing his hands on her shoulders as he gazed inside the doors seeing nothing but eternal night - although she might. Myra's frightened expression left Vithkun nervous about what she could see but he couldn't. \"We will go in there together and make it through.\" he said trying to rebuild her confidence, knowing that he must succeed if he was to keep his own promise. \"What do you see in there? We need your eyes for this.\" he said softly stroking her cheek with a smile. He might not say it out loud right now, but being strong was a lot easier when he was being strong for her and not for his own lofty vision about becoming king. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "His last cry for Myra's name had had Vithkun stretching out his arm again, this time even further searching for whatever lay in the dark - and by some miracle it found what it had looked for. The warmth and strength of Myra's hand was impossible to confuse and as soon as they clenched around each other the black dust fell and the sly voices quieted as if they had never been there. Vithkun looked at Myra catching her gaze."}, "post-89730": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1554664023000", "message": "Lies? Had they spoken lies to her when they spoke such idealism within Vith as they poured hatred into the seething depths of his heart. Their attempt to disuade him only strengthen the resolve of his own heart while it broke her in part. Her childhood had been one of deprevation and want and here she was attempting to help a man who sought the jewel in order to rule a kingdom. The price of her freedom was his happiness and while she chose it, and freely, it could not be overstated how much turmoil truly existed beneath the surface. He drew her in taking her within his arms stifling whatever sob might have come through her mouth. Answering him now would mean admitting that this, that they, were not alright and as impossible as it was to suffer his comfort for fear of losing it she obliged his reaching arms his kindness washing over her. \u201cAlready have?\u201d Questioning him he sealed her resolve as he\u2019d hoped his consistent optimism driving them forward no matter the obstacle. Stubbornness abated them both to the task and with her shoulders released she would straighten them and speak, \u201cWe will make it.\u201d Observing the room she was quick to draw conclusions but not quick enough to simply step forward. Therefore describing it she put forth an idea, \u201cThe doors spoke of rising and I recognize the symbols. They mark the steps upon the Citadel. Each one showing the progress of your journey. There are some of out of place, too early or too late, but there is a way to walk them in the very order that they should be taken.\u201d ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Lies? Had they spoken lies to her when they spoke such idealism within Vith as they poured hatred into the seething depths of his heart. Their attempt to disuade him only strengthen the resolve of his own heart while it broke her in part. Her childhood had been one of deprevation and want and here she was attempting to help a man who sought the jewel in order to rule a kingdom. The price of her freedom was his happiness and while she chose it, and freely, it could not be overstated how much turmoil truly existed beneath the surface. He drew her in taking her within his arms stifling whatever sob might have come through her mouth. Answering him now would mean admitting that this, that they, were not alright and as impossible as it was to suffer his comfort for fear of losing it she obliged his reaching arms his kindness washing over her. "}, "post-89731": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1554665164000", "message": "Vithkun knew that he would get no answer from his question about the voices but he did not present the question as something to necessarily answer but more of showing his concern. It was alright that she kept it to herself for now as he knew very well what struggles she might have been face to face with. They were not easily consoled. \"Yes, already have.\" Vithkun repeated without elaborating further. His clear heart was going to shield Myra of these troubles as long as he was able to and even unspoken he would now know what he felt for her and carry it with him. \"Good, that posture is much better!\" Vithkun praised Myra. \"I... know nothing about those marks. What do you think we should do?\" he asked believing that the wisdom she held would guide them to the end and beyond. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Vithkun knew that he would get no answer from his question about the voices but he did not present the question as something to necessarily answer but more of showing his concern. It was alright that she kept it to herself for now as he knew very well what struggles she might have been face to face with. They were not easily consoled. "}, "post-89732": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1554665753000", "message": "A wry smile was won from her lips as he commented upon her very posture as it straightened. His sight was taken from him throughout the room but his humor remained as he lightheartedly gave way to force her resolve to further strengthen. If he was not frightened and trusted her than what more could she hope for. \u201cI have an idea,\u201d Glancing back into the main area that they had come from, there was not much in the way of rubble other than the sand but she needed something as heavy as one of them. The crystals above them might be suitable but with the mace not within her grasp she could not swing at them. Therefore she would have to test her theory with something much lighter but something they could put force in to.\u201cI need your sword, please,\u201d given that he gave it to her she would hold her hilt with the blade facing downward towards the ground. Standing at the entrance she would place it on the symbol for the Citadel itself. It was after all where one began. Testing the leverage she placed weight while remaining out of the hall. The floor did not budge. Moving it slightly to the side to the wrong symbol she did the same, but began to feel it shift. Releasing pressure immediately there was a creaking sound down the hall but nothing pounced or moved yet, \u201cDo not step with me, let me test the next.\u201d Stepping onto the Citadel stone she tested what should be the next in the sequence. It held to pressure, \u201cIn order it is then,\u201d she told him handing his sword back with the hilt his direction, \u201cI do not know by what magic you cannot see for the same flames out there exist here in my eyes but I can guide you with my own sight.\u201d ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "A wry smile was won from her lips as he commented upon her very posture as it straightened. His sight was taken from him throughout the room but his humor remained as he lightheartedly gave way to force her resolve to further strengthen. If he was not frightened and trusted her than what more could she hope for. "}, "post-89736": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1554706112000", "message": "\"An idea?\" he said mirroring her wry smile but pausing just a brief moment when she asked for his sword before unsheathing it and passing her the hilt. He was passing his sword to a drow, a gesture unheard of in generations but of course he knew that Myra was not just any drow and in her he sensed the fire burning that could perhaps turn the tides for her own people. She was more than worthy - not just to hold - but also to wield and own a blade like this. \"Here.\" Vithkun said as he passed it to Myra. He was not able to see very much in regards to what she was doing with the sword inside the darkness. \"I can't see anything in there, what is going on?\" he asked Myra slightly nervous about the creaking sounds that came from in there. Vithkun stepped all the way close to the darkness with his toes barely touching the obsidian wall of nothing. \"Where do I start?\" Vithkun asked readily as he had come to trust Myra almost completely. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"An idea?\" he said mirroring her wry smile but pausing just a brief moment when she asked for his sword before unsheathing it and passing her the hilt. He was passing his sword to a drow, a gesture unheard of in generations but of course he knew that Myra was not just any drow and in her he sensed the fire burning that could perhaps turn the tides for her own people. She was more than worthy - not just to hold - but also to wield and own a blade like this. "}, "post-89737": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1554724857000", "message": "The hilt reappeared in the light as she handed it back to him and so did her hand in the next instant in which to guide him with, \"It's a pressure system,\" she explained, \"There are markers within the stones that match that of the Citadel. When I tested the correct sequence there was no give to them. I used your blade in order to test the others and they give way when you move off of the path.\" That path certainly not being straight and a difficult thing to lead him through no matter the circumstances behind the amount of trust they placed within one another. It was odd to think that the Citadel was represented here of all places. It was uniquely Drow as far as her knowledge went their lands separated long ago. Their capital city was once one of the brightest Elven palaces but the influence of their design was lost upon the younger of their kind. If Myra ever saw High Haven she would see the resemblance and the planners want to mimic the dwarves harsher style. A city built of progression it involved all races. The Citadel was another story. Once it was like the Tower, a moving monument to ingenuity but through magic it was now held in place. If he took her hand she'd draw him onto the first step. The instant that he stepped through the barrier he would suddenly be able to see within the darkness. The sconces were a dimmer light but enough that he was not completely blinded. It appeared that they relied more on trust in making that first step than a continued commitment to it in this section of their journey. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The hilt reappeared in the light as she handed it back to him and so did her hand in the next instant in which to guide him with, \"It's a pressure system,\" she explained, \"There are markers within the stones that match that of the Citadel. When I tested the correct sequence there was no give to them. I used your blade in order to test the others and they give way when you move off of the path.\" "}, "post-89740": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1554792162000", "message": "\"So basically we just need to step on the right stones? That's basic child's play were it not for the debilitating darkness.\" Vithkun deducted slightly sarcastic having taken the sword and sheathed it again before the elf took the hand of the drow. It took a deep breath of concentration for Vithkun to take the first step but Myra guiding him made him feel more sure of it. Putting down his foot he suddenly realized that the all encompassing darkness did now allow him to see - dimly. It seemed like a little bit of acclimatizing his eyes would make him able to navigate just fine. \"So this is how it looks from your side?\" he said with a smirk. \"I could have done that too.\" he jested and gazed at the steps she mentioned. \"We just follow these I presume?\"", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"So basically we just need to step on the right stones? That's basic child's play were it not for the debilitating darkness.\" Vithkun deducted slightly sarcastic having taken the sword and sheathed it again before the elf took the hand of the drow. It took a deep breath of concentration for Vithkun to take the first step but Myra guiding him made him feel more sure of it. "}, "post-89742": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1554856549000", "message": "His jest was met with a light slap on his upper arm and a grin that was hidden by her turning away to the path before them. His eyes would adjust soon enough and he would see that which she described and the symbols that paved the pathway. It was meant to be a test of trust and knowledge but of who\u2019s remained to the seen. Not many traveled the Citadel nor would they recognize the symbols upon it. Even Myra knew them now but paid it no heed for she was too busy making sure she found the right one to realize the text was elvish, old elvish, but elvish none the less. Had she not been through the Citadel than it would have been up to the Drow to describe the path before them with great detail. Describing the symbols and the order the elf would have ascertained it to be a tale of old. The first step was crucial and timed even if they did not know it. Should she had been lucky and left him behind it would have resulted in disaster. It still could.\u201cI believe so,\u201d she answered on the stones, \u201cIt seems childish in a way but everything was set for a reason. Every test is meant to prove something or another for worth. The stone was once a symbol of the friendship of our races, perhaps this is simply one meant to see if you would follow blindly, at least at first.\u201d", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "His jest was met with a light slap on his upper arm and a grin that was hidden by her turning away to the path before them. His eyes would adjust soon enough and he would see that which she described and the symbols that paved the pathway. It was meant to be a test of trust and knowledge but of who\u2019s remained to the seen. Not many traveled the Citadel nor would they recognize the symbols upon it. Even Myra knew them now but paid it no heed for she was too busy making sure she found the right one to realize the text was elvish, old elvish, but elvish none the less. Had she not been through the Citadel than it would have been up to the Drow to describe the path before them with great detail. Describing the symbols and the order the elf would have ascertained it to be a tale of old. The first step was crucial and timed even if they did not know it. Should she had been lucky and left him behind it would have resulted in disaster. It still could."}, "post-89748": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1554927661000", "message": "Vithkun started to notice the tiles they were stepping on and the fact, that some tiles had different - yet recognizable - markings. He could read it very well despite it being old elvish and he lifted a brow as a smile crept up his cheek. He hadn't expected this, but then again there was a lot here he hadn't expected and that had come to pass.\"It's old elvish for sure.\" he said with a slight chuckle. \"But who would have thought they would have done that..? 'Childish' is the right word at least.\" he said diverting his gaze towards Myra just slightly before pointing surprised at the tile. \"It's the start of an old elven lullaby about the stars and how their twinkling play a tune of light and barely comprehensible sound as they lull the sun to sleep.\" Vithkun said with a warm. My mother used to sing this for me when I was very young - and in fact I don't think there is a single elf in all of High Haven that don't know this. I feel tired just thinking about it!\" he said and laughed although a part of him feeling tired could also by the restless night he had spent on the hard rock floor. \"Look! It continues over there!\" he said and pointed to the next tile in line where the lullaby continued. \"I'm surprised that a drow would know of this unless... of course he was part of High Haven, but that's rather unlikely!\" Vithkun said with a dismissive grin.\"Yes, and I'm pleased that you were right! So if trust is already build, then what might come next?\" Vithkun pondered as they stood there. \"Do you think, that like pulling one's opposite door, that we are meant to step into each other's footsteps by drow using elven tiles and vice versa?\" Vithkun suggested. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Vithkun started to notice the tiles they were stepping on and the fact, that some tiles had different - yet recognizable - markings. He could read it very well despite it being old elvish and he lifted a brow as a smile crept up his cheek. He hadn't expected this, but then again there was a lot here he hadn't expected and that had come to pass."}, "post-89749": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1554941948000", "message": "\u201cA Drow would have known because of the Citadel,\u201d a symbol of Drow perfection in their eyes to see it here was surprising because not many had gone up the steps to start but one of his caliber certainly would have, looking back to Vithkun as he spoke so warmly of his mother she recognized the symbols but never connected them. Even now they were familiar but not completely translatable to the more common colloquiums and how it had changed over time. Of course one of the royal family would know of it. \u201cA better question is why would such a thing would be so far situated within the Drow lands,\u201d smiling as he laughed about the lullaby his mother seemed the sort to have been quite consistent with his bedtime routine. Still her smile was wistful in a way as she had never experienced such a thing but if she ever had children they would certainly know that they were loved in such a way. He suggested what might come next but she doubted that each task would be so clear, \u201cI\u2019m not sure. The doors were opposite but this is something we share even if one might not have traveled up the steps personally.\u201dFollowing along the song did not repeat but there was a break in the floor, a thick line of black sand that separated it from a second section that carried the same stone. The sand itself carried on for several feet. Something they may have been able to leap over but not without risking landing even on the edge of it. Bending down upon the piece she was perched on Myra did not touch it but put her hand over it. The air was colder above the sand itself and beyond it was the same sort of stones as before but unlabeled. \u201cThis looks like the same as the first doors.\u201d Hesitant to simply step over it for what it did before had frightened her off. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\u201cA Drow would have known because of the Citadel,\u201d a symbol of Drow perfection in their eyes to see it here was surprising because not many had gone up the steps to start but one of his caliber certainly would have, looking back to Vithkun as he spoke so warmly of his mother she recognized the symbols but never connected them. Even now they were familiar but not completely translatable to the more common colloquiums and how it had changed over time. Of course one of the royal family would know of it. "}, "post-89753": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1555066411000", "message": "Vithkun nodded and followed Myra along the steps of the lullaby while with a low voice he hummed the tune - there was something about it both being nostalgic and awakening hope within him. However it seemed as if the path wasn't going to be that easy and a wide spand of sand seemed to cover the ground a little further ahead. Stopping at the sand Myra clearly seemed hesitant to just jump it and to see what happened - indeed it seemed like there were no easy solutions around here. \"This is definitely the same we encountered before. It seems still as it lays there but who knows what trappings it contains?\" Vithkun said and put his hand gently on her shoulder before speaking the next words while letting his hand slide down to hers clenching it softly. \"We'll take a step together this time - if this path is truly one we share, we will make it through.\" he said and smiled to the drow redy to take the step when she was. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Vithkun nodded and followed Myra along the steps of the lullaby while with a low voice he hummed the tune - there was something about it both being nostalgic and awakening hope within him. However it seemed as if the path wasn't going to be that easy and a wide spand of sand seemed to cover the ground a little further ahead. Stopping at the sand Myra clearly seemed hesitant to just jump it and to see what happened - indeed it seemed like there were no easy solutions around here. "}, "post-89757": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1555261915000", "message": "Rising upward to a standing position as he spoke no lullaby might soothe the jolted nerves that his observation matched her own. The demonic whispers were worse than that of the dagger before. The dagger had been haunting, a soul lost, but this was a different animal. It felt nothing, was touched by nothing, when she attempted to back away earlier it had hounded her like a swarm of wasps. Stinging mercilessly and destroying what confidence she felt at figuring out the inscription of the door to start. Now the man beside her, who she had trusted beyond measure, was reassuring her that stepping together into the pit was the right plan. Only she could not bring herself to do so. He took her hand but hers was flaccid. Her legs ached to step back instead of forward. Wished to run instead of leap into the unknown. What whispers had it given her before? What lies did it make her believe. I can\u2019t, she wished to say the words but they were not true. He needed her to step into the abyss of the sand and as her gaze slid to him, hollow and uncertain, she knew she would do as he asked. Follow him anywhere. What sort of dastardly trick of fate brought them together and split them apart so quickly. He was destined for greatness while she would return to the ashen lands of Annonai\u2019s design. \u201cI am frightened of it,\u201d admitting it aloud she had never seemed so before. Even when faced with a hundred demons she\u2019d held up her mace and challenged them without fear in her eyes but this was not the same. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Rising upward to a standing position as he spoke no lullaby might soothe the jolted nerves that his observation matched her own. The demonic whispers were worse than that of the dagger before. The dagger had been haunting, a soul lost, but this was a different animal. It felt nothing, was touched by nothing, when she attempted to back away earlier it had hounded her like a swarm of wasps. Stinging mercilessly and destroying what confidence she felt at figuring out the inscription of the door to start. Now the man beside her, who she had trusted beyond measure, was reassuring her that stepping together into the pit was the right plan. Only she could not bring herself to do so. He took her hand but hers was flaccid. Her legs ached to step back instead of forward. Wished to run instead of leap into the unknown. What whispers had it given her before? What lies did it make her believe. I can\u2019t, she wished to say the words but they were not true. He needed her to step into the abyss of the sand and as her gaze slid to him, hollow and uncertain, she knew she would do as he asked. Follow him anywhere. What sort of dastardly trick of fate brought them together and split them apart so quickly. He was destined for greatness while she would return to the ashen lands of Annonai\u2019s design. "}, "post-89759": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1555310228000", "message": "Looking at the haunted face of Myra Vithkun couldn't but feel a little bit frightened too remembering all too well the words that had been spoken to him last time fra the sand - but he was damned if the demonic sand was going to keep them from moving forwards. Of course this wasn't Myra's fault, she had faced demonic hordes and the likes without wavering so what she had been told there must have been dreadful to a point Vithkun couldn't even imagine. Who was to say that both elves had received an equal share of the pain anyway? Her hand might have been flaccid but Vithkun was still holding onto it now clenching it even firmer as he turned to her and put the other hand on her opposite shoulder while gazing straight into her eyes. \"So am I!\" he said with conviction. \"But you remember what happened at the gate when my arm touched yours? The voices calmed to silence and the sand fell immediately. We share this path and will make it through this path - if we hold together!\" he said determined though there was a soft and loving tone to his voice while the light from his eyes shone brightly. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Looking at the haunted face of Myra Vithkun couldn't but feel a little bit frightened too remembering all too well the words that had been spoken to him last time fra the sand - but he was damned if the demonic sand was going to keep them from moving forwards. Of course this wasn't Myra's fault, she had faced demonic hordes and the likes without wavering so what she had been told there must have been dreadful to a point Vithkun couldn't even imagine. Who was to say that both elves had received an equal share of the pain anyway? "}, "post-89760": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1555383786000", "message": "His strength bolstered her own and returning the grip he so evenly placed across her palm there was a long deep breath that she released that she had not been aware she was holding. His tone was sweet, careful in the way he spoke and the exciting tremor that ran through it of conviction was certainly a character trait that she\u2019d found amusing before but now she was grateful. \u201cTogether.\u201d The first step revealed nothing within the sand, it shifted beneath their soles but did not rise to the occasion as before. It remained solid beneath their feet but the expanse was greater than previously thought for every step they took it seemed to be growing in length. \u201cIt seems the surprises do not end.\u201d Looking behind them they had traveled a few meters, and the distance before them was a few meters until they took one more step and they could see the sand rolling up over the edges. Myra did not release his hand but crouched downward. Brushing aside the sand it was not deep and shifted easily revealing the floor beneath it. Unlike the smooth slate stone of before it was like glass with a light shining through. Hitting her in the eyes she squinted at the sight of it the pure white blinding.\u00a0If Vithkun looked down he would see clearly his eyes adjusting in the sharpness of the light. Beneath the sands was a cavern. The small opening that was revealed by the sands showed deposits of limestone and talc, glittering and white with droplets of water coming down the edges. His angle was of the side of the cavern itself so he saw only the walls.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "His strength bolstered her own and returning the grip he so evenly placed across her palm there was a long deep breath that she released that she had not been aware she was holding. His tone was sweet, careful in the way he spoke and the exciting tremor that ran through it of conviction was certainly a character trait that she\u2019d found amusing before but now she was grateful. "}, "post-89761": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1555426758000", "message": "Uplifted by being able to bolster the confidence of Myra he took a brief smile upon his face but had settled himself for concentration as he moved into the sand along with Myra. The first step did not rouse the sand and neither did the second as Vithkun let out a relieved sigh although he knew it might have been too early to do such a reckless thing. It seemed the more they scaled the more was left for them to scale - or more accurately: The distance remained the same.\"Yes, this was not as simple as I thought.\" Vithkun said and rubbed his chin while Myra bowed down and brushed away some of the sand. The sharp white light immediately penetrated the floor and it was only because of the elf's natural attunement to the rays of the sun and the bright pure light they valued so highly, that he did not immediately reach to block his eyes. \"This is curious..!\" Vithkun said surprised as he sat down where Myra had removed some of the sand and brushed away more it to see that the glass floor they were standing on was apparently situated right on top of a cave that held a room that, in his eyes, looked exactly similar to the one, they had just passed through - only with no statues. \"It seems like we're just above the same room where we came from, only without the statues! What should we make of this? With all this happening it is hardly a coincidence.\" Vithkun said and looked at Myra for advice. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Uplifted by being able to bolster the confidence of Myra he took a brief smile upon his face but had settled himself for concentration as he moved into the sand along with Myra. The first step did not rouse the sand and neither did the second as Vithkun let out a relieved sigh although he knew it might have been too early to do such a reckless thing. It seemed the more they scaled the more was left for them to scale - or more accurately: The distance remained the same."}, "post-89762": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1555428821000", "message": "\u201cHardly,\u201d unable to see through the floor he was sitting and she crouched but her gaze was verily avoiding the hole that was increasing with his hand moving the sand. HIs blindness in the darkness was nothing compared to the bright flooding that came through the floor. He may not have been able to see but it was phyiscally painful for her to look down below at it, \u201cBut the mirroring is strange. Darkness and light, but not above or below one another. Perhaps we are still in the same cave and everything is but an illusion.\u201dSlightly saracastic with her last statement she looked up to the ceiling where her gaze could be unhindered, \u201cBut if there is some challenge to this I cannot think of what it might be other than curiosity at the entrapment.\u201d He would feel the draw first around the edges of his legs. The sand pulling towards them and the opening which one moment was solid and the next dipped downward like the flute of a vase until it began to pour. Hourglass like in effect the area around them was quickly being drawn under and Myra was unable to look down to see the effect. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\u201cHardly,\u201d unable to see through the floor he was sitting and she crouched but her gaze was verily avoiding the hole that was increasing with his hand moving the sand. HIs blindness in the darkness was nothing compared to the bright flooding that came through the floor. He may not have been able to see but it was phyiscally painful for her to look down below at it, \u201cBut the mirroring is strange. Darkness and light, but not above or below one another. Perhaps we are still in the same cave and everything is but an illusion.\u201d"}, "post-89763": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1555433964000", "message": "\"Everything an illusion..?\" Vithkun asked surprised though it seemed like Myra was right, the projection of light and the merging with the darkness blending oddly and appearing sometimes at will. \"If this is true, the illusionist would be even more formidable than even Annonai. I shiver at the tho...\" Vithkun said although suddenly the sand seemed to rouse and gather around his ankles and although first being a small annoyance he tried to kick away it persisted and soon he found himself and what appeared to be a maelstrom of sand pulling them downwards. Looking at Myra she was unable to look down due to the sharp light emerging from the floor and Vithkun, knowing that they wouldn't likely escape this predicament without going through the floor, reached for Myra to her in holding her from behind his arms wrapping firmly around her. \"Just hold on, I think we're going through - hopefully this is the right way!\" Vithkun said and silently cursed the drow that had conjured up these strange and almost torturous contraptions. How long would they have to suffer them?", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Everything an illusion..?\" Vithkun asked surprised though it seemed like Myra was right, the projection of light and the merging with the darkness blending oddly and appearing sometimes at will. \"If this is true, the illusionist would be even more formidable than even Annonai. I shiver at the tho...\" Vithkun said although suddenly the sand seemed to rouse and gather around his ankles and although first being a small annoyance he tried to kick away it persisted and soon he found himself and what appeared to be a maelstrom of sand pulling them downwards. "}, "post-89764": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1555465323000", "message": "Ripples flowed though the sand, small and large like waves cascading over the opening. Able to look the other direction Myra felt the rush, saw it in the distance of the room where the never ending rain of the substance poured over. Illusion or not it felt completely real as it swept over them. \u201cVith,\u201d the same fright that she had admitted to just before approaching the sand was in her voice,  there was no helping it for to be taken under and into a place she could not see worried her. He rose and she clung, as best as she was able arms wrapped around his waist and her eyes closed, nose against the crook of his neck, to keep it from appearing through the slight translucency of her eyelids.As the floor ebbed away they fell, not a hard fall, gentle as if the sand were their feathers and it would deposit them onto the ground. It seeped into it there absorbed like rainwater into the hard rock leaving them in a long cavern mimicking the one before but instead of being bathed in darkness it was cast in light. A mirror image but without statues they stood where there was no entrance but there were doors at the end. These white and gilded with gold. They stood on solid ground now and all but a small portion of the sand had disappeared, some remaining under the feet of the Drow but not beneath Vithkun\u2019s. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Ripples flowed though the sand, small and large like waves cascading over the opening. Able to look the other direction Myra felt the rush, saw it in the distance of the room where the never ending rain of the substance poured over. Illusion or not it felt completely real as it swept over them. \u201cVith,\u201d the same fright that she had admitted to just before approaching the sand was in her voice,  there was no helping it for to be taken under and into a place she could not see worried her. He rose and she clung, as best as she was able arms wrapped around his waist and her eyes closed, nose against the crook of his neck, to keep it from appearing through the slight translucency of her eyelids."}, "post-89765": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1555481986000", "message": "\"Just, hold on..!\" Vithkun said as he held her tightly as they slowly seeped through the floor along with the peculiar sand. Vithkun wasn't sure what kind of landing they would receive - or if they were going to land at all or simply become engulfed in the sand like this. A slightly content smile crept up his cheeks as he thought that there was indeed worse way to go than this - his feelings for the drow intensifying in this very moment as they stood all close to each other. However there was not reckoning for the two yet as they landed safely on the floor of the cave Vithkun had seen underneath them. Looking down as soon as he felt his legs free the elf landed on both feet doing his utmost to take the impact out of the landing for Myra's sake who would likely have her landing obstructed by not being able to see well in the light. Vithkun landed surprisingly gently and didn't even have to bend his knees very much to absorb the impact. Looking around the sharp light seemingly came from nowhere in particular but lit up every corner of the room. \"Can you see down here with this sharp light all over the place?\" he asked Myra concerned. \"Anyway we must continue forwards, there are doors at the end of the room and then I hope this illusion or... shaping of reality will soon come to an end.\" Vithkun said and took a step towards the doors at the end of the room leading Myra along with his hand on her waist. If there was one thing he wasn't going to do right now, it was to let her go. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Just, hold on..!\" Vithkun said as he held her tightly as they slowly seeped through the floor along with the peculiar sand. Vithkun wasn't sure what kind of landing they would receive - or if they were going to land at all or simply become engulfed in the sand like this. A slightly content smile crept up his cheeks as he thought that there was indeed worse way to go than this - his feelings for the drow intensifying in this very moment as they stood all close to each other. "}, "post-89766": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1555507376000", "message": "No intention of releasing him without her sight he was her guide. It meant complete trust in him and despite her romantic interests that put a shade of grey upon it she did so. Needing him in that instant it only solidified the fact that his absence was the greatest bandaid that she\u2019d ever have to rip off. Even then the wound might never heal. How had he changed her opinion so quickly over the course of what was barely a month? Landing feet first the cushiony landing was surprising. The statues had obviously failed in their task which led her to believe whoever designed this cared very little for the outcome of those attempting to pass it. Perhaps it meant it was the correct task. Bringing her face upward but remaining next to him she attempted to squint but immediately closed her eyes, \u201cI cannot,\u201d she informed him using her right hand to cover her eyes further and her left remained locked around his waist. He did not wish to let her go and in that instant she clung to him for safety and help. He stepped forward, and so did she, but the rock beneath her feet began to crack small fissures growing around the edges of her boots while Vith\u2019s remained solid beneath his feet, \u201cI feel as if the ground his shifting,\u201d she told him her chin down slightly towards the floor but her stance solid none-the-less. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "No intention of releasing him without her sight he was her guide. It meant complete trust in him and despite her romantic interests that put a shade of grey upon it she did so. Needing him in that instant it only solidified the fact that his absence was the greatest bandaid that she\u2019d ever have to rip off. Even then the wound might never heal. How had he changed her opinion so quickly over the course of what was barely a month? "}, "post-89767": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1555520710000", "message": "The creaking rock beneath Myra's foot made Vithkun worried - and so did the sand that by some coincidence was still gathered beneath her feet. The fissures starting to show and Vithkun didn't hesitate as he knelt down and put his arms underneath her picking her up no questions asked.\"It is shifting but I'm sure it won't while I'm holding you!\" Vithkun said determined and lifted her up with arms under legs and back so she could throw an arm around him. \"Let's see if we can reach the doors in the end of the room.\" Vithkun said as he started striding towards the white doors hoping the sand wouldn't follow his steps now. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The creaking rock beneath Myra's foot made Vithkun worried - and so did the sand that by some coincidence was still gathered beneath her feet. The fissures starting to show and Vithkun didn't hesitate as he knelt down and put his arms underneath her picking her up no questions asked."}, "post-89768": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1555526022000", "message": "Vith gave her absolutely no warning that he was picking her up as he swept her Romeo and Juliet style into his arms. Brought against him rather quickly she almost smacked him in the head attempting to bring and arm over in her panic. Thankfully it was avoided but with her eyes closed and scrunched the way the ground cracked had been unknown to her other than the unsteadiness. He explained it while she was settled but she was already blushing as she was pressed fully against him. Her forehead hit his cheek gently before she drew back slightly. Her right hand splayed against his chest she made a wry comment, \u201cI never imagined the tasks involving this.\u201dHe set off and he was allowed to pass without issue now til he reached the door. This one had no inscription nor any handles but it opened on its own the hall too dark beyond it for him to see immediately his eyes needing to adjust. As they did he saw a lit hall. Grey stone and sconces with pure fire, red and yellow flickering and providing a warm light. Nothing threatening in sight there were no farther inscriptions. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Vith gave her absolutely no warning that he was picking her up as he swept her Romeo and Juliet style into his arms. Brought against him rather quickly she almost smacked him in the head attempting to bring and arm over in her panic. Thankfully it was avoided but with her eyes closed and scrunched the way the ground cracked had been unknown to her other than the unsteadiness. He explained it while she was settled but she was already blushing as she was pressed fully against him. Her forehead hit his cheek gently before she drew back slightly. Her right hand splayed against his chest she made a wry comment, \u201cI never imagined the tasks involving this.\u201d"}, "post-89769": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1555585862000", "message": "\"Well neither did I, but here we are..!\" Vithkun answered quickly as he moved ahead. Myra would notice how, even when he carried her, his trot was still light and elegant and laying there in his arms would be more akin to a ride in a boat than in a wagon as she was carried with silky smooth movements. Approaching the doors it seemed like they were paving the way for the two elves as they opened by themselves, although deep in his mind he feared another issue of trash talking sand - but nothing happened and Vithkun gently put Myra down after taking a single step in the grey stoned hall. \"Finally it seems like we're allowed a little bit of progress huh?\" he said and looked around. \"This has another feel to it, doesn't it?\" Vithkun commented seeing the much more mundane lighting inside this hall that resembled any hall og keep a human could build. \"How about we see what we can find in here?\" he said to Myra with a faint smile and started moving along the hall his steps carrying no hurry in their wake but his head and eyes taking in the visual impressions of this place. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Well neither did I, but here we are..!\" Vithkun answered quickly as he moved ahead. Myra would notice how, even when he carried her, his trot was still light and elegant and laying there in his arms would be more akin to a ride in a boat than in a wagon as she was carried with silky smooth movements. Approaching the doors it seemed like they were paving the way for the two elves as they opened by themselves, although deep in his mind he feared another issue of trash talking sand - but nothing happened and Vithkun gently put Myra down after taking a single step in the grey stoned hall. "}, "post-89770": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1555618246000", "message": "The flooding of intense light gone from her sight she opened her eyes to see the hall instead. Had he not placed her down she might have said something more regrettable but with her feet firmly placed so was her mind level again. Moving freely on her own there were times when she forgot the grace of Elves and Drow. Both moved with a fluidity almost unheard of and after visiting dwarves and humans and demons alike it was easy to see the difference. As he had carried her it was without effort, his strength greater than hers but not by far, but their grace was slightly exceeded by her. Females, after all, should be the fairer of the two. Myra was stockier than their lithe brethren, built for defense, but not lacking in the way they moved. Making her way down the hall one hand on the outer walls she wondered if this was perhaps another illusion. The instant that she touched them they shrank back, as if light was rising upon the horizon so did they slip back from the center of the floor revealing a more courtyard like path. It was in pale colors of normal sand rising up to pillars on the outside and occasionally halls leading off. It would be familiar to Vithkun because it was reminiscent of the outside halls leading into gardens. Vines rolling around the edges of the pillars where the sconces had been the room was lit, by an unknown source, like mid-morning. Not too bright to see for Myra and an easy level of ambient light to Vith. Glancing back at the man in question they had no guidance on their path at first. Out of the corner of either\u2019s eye there came a creature down one of the adjoining halls. A deer, a beautiful albino creature of pure white with horns of deep brown and eyes of the same. A stag with ornamentation across its antlers there were crystals that dripped down from silver thread that while he moved chimed musically. Myra was taken with the creature upon first sight but blind trust was rarely a good thing to have given to anything and even she stepped back as it appeared. If either approached it would bow its head slightly but if one attempted to touch it the deer would step back intelligent eyes shimmering in the brighter light. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The flooding of intense light gone from her sight she opened her eyes to see the hall instead. Had he not placed her down she might have said something more regrettable but with her feet firmly placed so was her mind level again. Moving freely on her own there were times when she forgot the grace of Elves and Drow. Both moved with a fluidity almost unheard of and after visiting dwarves and humans and demons alike it was easy to see the difference. As he had carried her it was without effort, his strength greater than hers but not by far, but their grace was slightly exceeded by her. Females, after all, should be the fairer of the two. Myra was stockier than their lithe brethren, built for defense, but not lacking in the way they moved. "}, "post-89772": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1555674025000", "message": "However the elf had only just spoken his words as he had to eat them again when the room started shifting as soon as Myra touched the. Without quaking the pillars with vines climbing them along rose to form what looked like a courtyard and Vithkun gazed around astounded by the sudden shift even though he should have hardly been surprised by the continuing mystery that this place was. At least there were no obvious interference or hazard towards their lives still. But just then a pure white stag came galloping with a beauty that was nothing sort of breathtaking - even by elven standards. With its crystals chiming from silver threads and and impressive horns and deep auburn colored eyes it was as if light and nature had in unison breathed life into a being and made it its holy guardian, such was Vithkun's impression. Myra however stepped back from the white deer however and Vithkun turned towards the drow.\"You think it is another illusion to test us?\" Vithkun asked Myra considering their options and acknowledging that it might be. \"There is only one way to find out.\" Vithkun said and slowly approached the stag with palm facing upwards as if he had something in there to offer it - and he had. \"I can offer you my trust if you offer us your help. What is it, that we must do to proceed, Great Guardian?\" he asked the stag believing its gaze to hide an intelligence that was not inferior to that of elves - and perhaps even greater. Vithkun turned to Myra keeping his hand there and smiled. \"I think you need not worry. Just approach and let us connect with it if it is willing.\" he suggested to the Myra. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "However the elf had only just spoken his words as he had to eat them again when the room started shifting as soon as Myra touched the. Without quaking the pillars with vines climbing them along rose to form what looked like a courtyard and Vithkun gazed around astounded by the sudden shift even though he should have hardly been surprised by the continuing mystery that this place was. At least there were no obvious interference or hazard towards their lives still. "}, "post-89773": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1555675662000", "message": "Hammer met nail in his quick assessment of her reasons to step back. Nothing so far had been straightforward and why was one to assume that this deer, beautiful as it was, was not some sort of trick when the dreary hall transformed itself. The trickery presented thus far was meant to elude to greater things each task testing resolve and trust and each one they passed. Perhaps by only the skin of their teeth when the sands hit but passed none-the-less. Vithkun may have sorted things within his mind but the sand did not invade his personal space to that degree. It knew not what he thought and therefore more tests were necessary. Myra had not spoken aloud then for fear of agreeing with the voice for her worth was lesser than others in her mind. Even now this deer was certainly above her in stature and rank for what sort of creature held such grace other than their own. The deer in question would snort at the offer of the elf and for a reason unexplainable to any of them Myra found it immensely funny. So much so that she started to laugh at its reaction. Antlers turning and head tilting it chimed away and the deer raised it\u2019s head something in the way it nodded its head in agreeance with the Drow for its gaze had fallen solemnly on her. Myra stepped forth to stand beside her companion, \u201cI do not know if this is a test but his appearance seems purposeful at the very least. Will you guide us?\u201d Asking it of the deer it took not but a moment for it to turn heading down the hall it came taking an easy pace where they did not have to rush to keep up with its long legs nor its graceful stride. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Hammer met nail in his quick assessment of her reasons to step back. Nothing so far had been straightforward and why was one to assume that this deer, beautiful as it was, was not some sort of trick when the dreary hall transformed itself. The trickery presented thus far was meant to elude to greater things each task testing resolve and trust and each one they passed. Perhaps by only the skin of their teeth when the sands hit but passed none-the-less. Vithkun may have sorted things within his mind but the sand did not invade his personal space to that degree. It knew not what he thought and therefore more tests were necessary. Myra had not spoken aloud then for fear of agreeing with the voice for her worth was lesser than others in her mind. Even now this deer was certainly above her in stature and rank for what sort of creature held such grace other than their own. "}, "post-89774": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1555678662000", "message": "Looking at the deer with an expectant smirk Vithkun frowned as his gesture of trust didn't quite receive the kind of recognition he had imagined and swiftly withdrew his inviting palm to the side of his body. \"Well it certainly isn't the pure guardian of nature and light I had antic... Myra..? Why are you laughing?\" Vithkun asked Myra his pride somewhat dented when it turned from the pure elf and instead seemed to show the drow its respect by listening to what Myra had to say. Sighing Vithkun crossed his arms and observed Myra as she communicated with the stag.\"Purposeful? I'm no longer sure of anything about this place - I just know that had it been a real guardian of good, it wouldn't have snorted so easily at my proposal of trust...\" Vithkun concluded still trying to figure where he had gone wrong in his handling of the creature. However it seemed like the stag led them somewhere and Vithkun followed it slightly reluctantly. \"Well at least it seems like it likes you.\" Vithkun said though he came to think that the was perhaps being a little unreasonable. \"Well not because you would in any way be unlikable - at all!\" Vithkun said and paused briefly. \"Quite the contrary actually...\" he added a bit more softly intoned. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Looking at the deer with an expectant smirk Vithkun frowned as his gesture of trust didn't quite receive the kind of recognition he had imagined and swiftly withdrew his inviting palm to the side of his body. "}, "post-89775": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1555701160000", "message": "Unable to answer his query on why she was laughing she\u2019d brushed it off with a soft touch to his shoulder to reassure him she meant no harm in the gesture, only that it had been intended in the best way. Besides with the stress placed upon them throughout the trials and tribulations they had thus far scene it was but a bit of kindness he gave her in allowing her termporarily to put it behind. \u201cPerhaps he is not trusting of men?\u201d Attempting to give some answer to appease his worries the buck ignoring his offer had hit home and he continued to worsen the thought of it by opening his big mouth farther, \u201cQuite the contrary?\u201d It was a good thing she\u2019d heard that last part and that her smile was genuine, \u201cDid I finally grow on you?\u201dIt was fair enough he had grown on her as well. Walking side by side they were in for quite a walk it seemed, and a maze of tunnels. Each when they turned to it would appear as dimly lit as before until Myra touched the wall. The transformations seemed endless but the brightness was most welcome after being blinded before. The deer would turn before them and wait for her to do so, as if hesitating to take the path without it transformed. It would glance back each time its antlers speaking of music.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Unable to answer his query on why she was laughing she\u2019d brushed it off with a soft touch to his shoulder to reassure him she meant no harm in the gesture, only that it had been intended in the best way. Besides with the stress placed upon them throughout the trials and tribulations they had thus far scene it was but a bit of kindness he gave her in allowing her termporarily to put it behind. "}, "post-89788": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1555840129000", "message": "Vithkun softened up feeling Myra's light touch on his shoulder and felt compelled return it, although a caring smile was the only appropriate response he could conjure at the moment. \"Not trusting of men, but I'm an elf..?\" Vithkun said almost insulted gesticulating towards himself. \"Oh... gender wise, I see.\" Vithkun quickly replied to his own query as he glanced towards the deer. \"You know it's the drow right there who is the dangerous one of us..!\" he said jestingly towards the stag although he did not expect much in the way of an answer - but perhaps from the drow, as he gave her a sidelong glance slightly wary of her fist coming his way.  Well he didn't really expect it to happen like that, but his respect of Myra was that of at least knowing it could happen. \"Well I hope it didn't come as a surprise.\" he replied to Myra asking if he had started changing his opinion about him but didn't want to elaborate to much about it right now. \"Let's just say you have stop calling me 'Your Highness', alright?\" he said and chuckled. After this they walked through a maze of tunnels with the stag leading on. Ever so often they stopped and Myra touched one of the walls causing the dimness to recede for the illumination of the path so they could proceed again. Vithkun was slightly taken aback by this but was not as such spooked by it. \"What is happening when you do that?\" Vithkun asked Myra curious to if she did or feel anything special.\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Vithkun softened up feeling Myra's light touch on his shoulder and felt compelled return it, although a caring smile was the only appropriate response he could conjure at the moment. \"Not trusting of men, but I'm an elf..?\" Vithkun said almost insulted gesticulating towards himself. \"Oh... gender wise, I see.\" Vithkun quickly replied to his own query as he glanced towards the deer. \"You know it's the drow right there who is the dangerous one of us..!\" he said jestingly towards the stag although he did not expect much in the way of an answer - but perhaps from the drow, as he gave her a sidelong glance slightly wary of her fist coming his way.  "}, "post-89790": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1555852161000", "message": "Much had changed since that day in the bar where she\u2019d declared, at least in her mind, that she would call him his highness until their business was complete. Broken several times throughout the course of their journey, mainly at the end, it had been in times of stress or true worry for his safety... and the night before when she stopped him from making another mistake in her mind for he desired the throne and one night of pleasure for pleasures sake might ruin his ascension. Elves seemed to be able to smell like blood hounds and though she smelled of lilac and the breeze they would still know it to be Drow upon him should he have gone so far. \u201cIf you wanted to test who of us was truly more dangerous it would be quite the contest but I fear we would find no true winner,\u201d more solemn in her response the deer had actually paused glancing back to wait and hear what she had to say. It showed intelligence earlier, and even more so now as its head craned to also look at Vith who had been joking. Perhaps the deer was just not fond of humor. It lowered its snout slightly as if pondering something before turning back and continueing to lead them down the pathways. Myra was keeping track but around the tenth turn they came to a hall that had was already swathed in the brightness of purer light. Circles, she finally knew but did not say aloud, he was taking them in circles but perhaps that was what was necessary. \u201cBut you are a highness,\u201d she would have rather said that it had a nice ring to it, given him what he wanted in a joking manner but she could not. For the word was not biting on her tongue than anything as a reminder of their fates and how the did not align past the next task they might come to. She\u2019d been openly looking, laughing, and playing with him as they walked and thus far but her gaze went to the ground as they moved now. She could speak nothing but the truth and now it shamed her into the realization that she should have never been as open. She would help Annonai and when her time was finished there she would find a boat, and sail to wherever she could find so she might have the true freedom to look upon the stars with the expanse of the ocean around her.He seemed well and truly good at distracting her asking a question that brought her from her silence, \u201cIt\u2019s as if I have touched cool glass on a winters morning. There is frost beneath my fingers that gives way to the warmth of the rays of the sun. Almost instantaneously. I feel magic but I cannot pinpoint the source but I figured you might prefer your halls to the ones of the lower tunnels of my own.\u201d", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Much had changed since that day in the bar where she\u2019d declared, at least in her mind, that she would call him his highness until their business was complete. Broken several times throughout the course of their journey, mainly at the end, it had been in times of stress or true worry for his safety... and the night before when she stopped him from making another mistake in her mind for he desired the throne and one night of pleasure for pleasures sake might ruin his ascension. Elves seemed to be able to smell like blood hounds and though she smelled of lilac and the breeze they would still know it to be Drow upon him should he have gone so far. "}, "post-89791": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1555857436000", "message": "\"If... and I'm only saying 'if' very carefully here... that we were to engage in such a pitiful display, I'm sure there would be no winners on that day.\" Vithkun said his voice tainted with slight melancholy which origins seemed was hard to explain. \"I would surely prefer to face in you a fist fight, because in that way the end result would be so clear that you wouldn't even have to strike me very hard!\" Vithkun said and laughed altohugh it echoed emptily in the vicinity of the stag. The deer did not respond Vithkun's jokes but for subtle nods and turns of the head - as he had anticipated - but could it cheer up Myra and himself, it would be of no consequence. Vithkun glanced away for a moment as she answered him. \"I had hoped... that I would have been a little more to you after these months.\" he said muted but then smile softly. \"At the very least I don't contrast you to that title - or your would officially be 'your lowliness'.\" He said with a wry smile. He could accept that Myra would not go further after what she had done yesterday, but his feelings were still unshakable from what he found in the pond yesterday. How on earth would he ever be able to let her go back to Host without the jewel - such an unfair prince deserved not the title of king but that of a tyrant.Vithkun nodded and smiled at her explanation. \"I certainly do, I was more concerned with how it seems like you're doing that so intuitively. Which degree of control do you hold over that?\" he asked and tried to put his own hand on one of the dimly lighted walls to see if his touch had any effect at all or if he could sense the source of the magic better than Myra. \"Also, this place seemed to be already lit..?\" ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"If... and I'm only saying 'if' very carefully here... that we were to engage in such a pitiful display, I'm sure there would be no winners on that day.\" Vithkun said his voice tainted with slight melancholy which origins seemed was hard to explain. \"I would surely prefer to face in you a fist fight, because in that way the end result would be so clear that you wouldn't even have to strike me very hard!\" Vithkun said and laughed altohugh it echoed emptily in the vicinity of the stag. The deer did not respond Vithkun's jokes but for subtle nods and turns of the head - as he had anticipated - but could it cheer up Myra and himself, it would be of no consequence. "}, "post-89792": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1555858739000", "message": "\u201cI am sure you might hold you own if you saw it coming,\u201d amused by the thought of them fighting openly and with good form it would be quite the contest. It lasted but moments as he commented wryly on her other words and the peal of laughter faded ground into dust.\u00a0\u201cI am ashborn,\u201d she resoundedly shot back his words hitting a sore spot instead of the intended cheerfulness he intended on giving her, \u201cNor did I say that you meant so little to me that I would call you such without it being necessity,\u201d it appeared that he had sparked her own irritation at the playfulness that had occurred within the water yesterday. So open had they been beneath the cavernous walls that they forgot their place and she was here to remind him even if she remembered the way his arms held her, even carried her but moments ago, \u201cYou are-\u201cRefusing to continue that sentence for lack of better terms in which to refer to him that did not betray her true feelings she instead focused on the wall. For the instant that he touched it the light faded spreading outward from his fingertips and returning it to the drab dreary hall it was before she had laid hands on it. He had no control over the matter, but could feel a tremor of magic like a ripple that traveled up his arm but did not quite reach up to his heart only leaving it. Myra allowed curiosity to get the better of her and she touched her side to the same effect in reverse. It appeared they had the opposite effect upon the walls. The deer had fully turned, quite a feat for his large antlers within the hall but he stood facing them. His crystals chiming as he raised his head high. They had struck something, it seemed, and he was patiently waiting for them to figure out the true meaning or to argue further as had been begun by Myra. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\u201cI am sure you might hold you own if you saw it coming,\u201d amused by the thought of them fighting openly and with good form it would be quite the contest. It lasted but moments as he commented wryly on her other words and the peal of laughter faded ground into dust.\u00a0"}, "post-89797": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1555937124000", "message": "\"You're saying that with such incredible conviction and yet it seems like those same words hurt you the more you speak of your heritage.\" Vithkun snapped back at Myra who refused to claim his cheerfulness. He sighed and bowed his head slightly his hands resting on his hip turning his head a bit towards Myra. \"I am what..?\" he asked and raised a brow. \"You wanted to say, that I am a king, right? But no one has been crowned anything yet.\" he said assertively feeling his frustrations about his own clear feelings being challenged by the way Myra seemed to push him away. The feeling when he lay his hand on the wall was that of subtle magic, but there was nothing indicating the source and nothing he could do to control these 'powers'. \"It does the opposite of your touch..?\" he said surprised and turned to the deer with an inquisitive glance. \"Are you not going to reveal anything?\" he asked jestingly. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"You're saying that with such incredible conviction and yet it seems like those same words hurt you the more you speak of your heritage.\" Vithkun snapped back at Myra who refused to claim his cheerfulness. He sighed and bowed his head slightly his hands resting on his hip turning his head a bit towards Myra. \"I am what..?\" he asked and raised a brow. \"You wanted to say, that I am a king, right? But no one has been crowned anything yet.\" he said assertively feeling his frustrations about his own clear feelings being challenged by the way Myra seemed to push him away. "}, "post-89804": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1556026338000", "message": "\u201cDo not put words into my mouth your highness, you will find they are wrong,\u201d their argument was not finished as he continued to provoke her into making sure she was the one to do so. Despite wishing to end it the way her voice carried none of the severity of prior ones spoke of her heart relinquishing to it. Carrying on in such a manner was beneath either of them and yet heartache and anger at the very position both were placed in begged of her to continue, \u201cI agreed to aid you because I believe you will be a King who brings back a time of prosperity and understanding. Even now I have accepted that I will never return to my own homeland in order to see you placed upon a throne in which you will have the power to prove me right. It does not mean that my own wishes coincide with what I do now.\u201d The deer who was simply staring at them was about to receive her wrath as Vith joked but she rather hastily turned to it giving it slight, \u201cAre you here to play more games? You have guided us in circles and revealed nothing other than cruel jokes. I refuse to be subject to more of these tests to prove that either of us are worthy.\u201d There was a flaring muscle in her cheek and her tone while deservedly angry was withheld from being the tone she\u2019d first administered upon Vithkun, she was holding back, and frankly it was taking all of her effort. Blinded before and tricked again she refused to continue on such a path. The deer did not seem insulted, just the opposite. It raised its snout to both of them and tipped its head to the side touching the wall beside it. The stones seemed to crumble loose of the wall. Degrading and falling before their very eyes to form a passageway big enough for the antlers of the deer and tall enough for them to walk through easily. Through it poured moonlight. The deer stepped through without waiting and as the others came to the opening they would see the beginning of a valley. The moon was risen high in the sky surrounded by brighter and clearer stars than either had ever seen before. No portal existed here that they might pass through only the cooler night air that beset upon them. It was not land either would be familiar with. Long blades of grass began a footpath to the edge of a lake. Mountains loomed in the distance and flowers bloomed along the edges of where it had been set upon they might walk. Beautiful blossoms of reds, blues, and shades that neither had laid eyes on before in the form of wildflowers that went on for miles. The lake itself was but a few hundred meters. An inlet of approximately twenty feet in width and depth revealed that which they searched for. Upon a pedestal within the center was a stone that shone so brightly in the surrounding light that it was made of magic there could be no argument. Wherever the portal had taken them initially it was certainly not apart of any place of their world they had visited and perhaps it was not a part of it at all. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\u201cDo not put words into my mouth your highness, you will find they are wrong,\u201d their argument was not finished as he continued to provoke her into making sure she was the one to do so. Despite wishing to end it the way her voice carried none of the severity of prior ones spoke of her heart relinquishing to it. Carrying on in such a manner was beneath either of them and yet heartache and anger at the very position both were placed in begged of her to continue, \u201cI agreed to aid you because I believe you will be a King who brings back a time of prosperity and understanding. Even now I have accepted that I will never return to my own homeland in order to see you placed upon a throne in which you will have the power to prove me right. It does not mean that my own wishes coincide with what I do now.\u201d "}, "post-89806": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1556032013000", "message": "\"Wrong... or bitter to the taste...\" Vithkun commented in a hushed voice finding that it might not only be her ability to speak truth that had been sealed, but also her ability to see truth. He did not intend her to hear those words as he didn't hope to continue their feud either - but her next words begged an answer. \"Why do you put such a burden on my shoulders?!? Even if I can change what you believe is wrong, it might take hundreds of years to change the course we have set for an equal long time!\" Vithkun said raising his voice assertively wishing that she could experience the climate in High Haven herself. \"I only want to be king, because there is no other way for me to lose my inborn curse. No one has ever wanted to be king of High Haven if they truly had their own free will...\" Vithkun ended his answer as Myra was also directing her anger towards the stag along with his own - but perhaps this was what was needed. The deer's reaction surprised Vithkun as it touched the stone wall beside it and he witnessed another transformation - one that put an end to the maze and presented them with a clear pathway to proceed through. Whether Myra would go on with their discussion Vithkun would follow the deer halfway expecting them to fall through another pit or end up in some eternal hallway with the ending always just in sight but equally out of reach. However it did not happen and filling his lungs with the clearest of air they came to a valley bathed in moonlight and as the stag stopped Vithkun took a few curious steps into the soft grass. \"This is clearly not the demon wastes we came from...\" he commented surprised their rout from before almost forgotten by this odd phenomenon. Blooming flowers adorned the place and mighty stood the mountains in the distance. \"This can only be elven made, but it has a very different style to it than our kin practices... Does this kind of beauty exist in the nation of drows?\" Vithkun asked surprised that it might be of drow make. He had to admit that in his mind he did not find them capable of creating something of equal beauty to the pure elves. They either tried too hard and ended up mocking the natural beauty of things or contorted reality to their own twisted minds' liking. But this was just right although the mood was decidedly more somber and less expressive but more in tune with nature's unchecked beauty than his own kin had the habit of creating - and he liked it so much that he found a subtle relaxation within his heart and a content smile appeared on his lips. However the beauty of the place came in second as he finally saw what he had been searching so voraciously for in years and a quick glance of amazement was sent Myra's way, jaw dropping and knees almost bending in the light of this extreme beauty. \"The Crescent Ascend!\" he pointed. \"Come, let's approach it!\" Vithkun said to Myra as he found new strength in his legs and stopped a good thirty feet in front of it. There it was - he had dreamed of it for so long, but now that he stood so close to it, he couldn't but be overwhelmed with sadness knowing that Myra had coveted the jewel at least as much as him but apparently had chosen to let him have it in the few weeks that they had traveled together, but where would this leave her? Right now not many words formed from his lips - only a vague glance in her direction told of his deep felt doubt.  ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Wrong... or bitter to the taste...\" Vithkun commented in a hushed voice finding that it might not only be her ability to speak truth that had been sealed, but also her ability to see truth. He did not intend her to hear those words as he didn't hope to continue their feud either - but her next words begged an answer. "}, "post-89807": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1556034717000", "message": "\u201cWhat I believe is wrong?!\u201d The door opening was a distraction, surely, but their conversation was not quite yet finished. She had not heard his first words, or else it might have been a worse reply, \u201cSurely you have realized that I can see through the front that you placed when we first met. You have cloaked yourself in your lies and finery so you forget the injustice of the world around you. If you truly believe that your home is perfect than you have fallen so truly I would have no faith for you.\u201dHer words had been spoken before they went through the opening, and she followed him pausing at the entrance as well. This reminded her of the fields, the flowers while not all Drow there were some mixed in and others she had not seen in some time. Others were from books where they were shown to be either endangered or forgotten of their own lands. Overwhelmed by the sight it was too close to home, enough that when he asked of her if it was akin to her own lands he wouldn\u2019t have to ask again. Such a forlorn sight was upon her features and such an uncertainty in the sight before them she did not immediately answer. This quelled their argument if only for an instant because she spoke in but barely above a whisper, \u201cIt is not unlike home.\u201d He glanced to her for reassurance and despite herself she did the same trailing but a moment behind him as her hands had found the opportunity to touch some of the soft petals quite unresistable. Reaching downward the stag had paused at the inlet waiting for both of them to pass beside him. Standing beside the two Vith seemed quite confident not only in recognition of the jewel itself but in his wish to go to it. Myra on the other hand knew that once he obtained it their journey would be at an end. That journey while short had began a change within her that would last lifetimes of others and certainly demand of her that this task end with him taking the jewel. He may not have wanted the role of King but he would take it. \u201cPerhaps there is more to your curse than you may ever know. If being crowned is all it takes to rid you of it I do believe your ancestor lacked much in the way of understanding of what this world should be. However, if it is necessary I will see it done. The jewel is yours.\u201d Standing beside the deer she crossed her arms beneath her chest in a manner of defensive positioning but her expression still carried the forlorn uncertainty. Not because the view had swayed her mind or that she did not truly believe her words, for they were uttered with the finality of truth that she could not change, but because somehow and someway she would miss arguing with him more than she cared to admit.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\u201cWhat I believe is wrong?!\u201d The door opening was a distraction, surely, but their conversation was not quite yet finished. She had not heard his first words, or else it might have been a worse reply, \u201cSurely you have realized that I can see through the front that you placed when we first met. You have cloaked yourself in your lies and finery so you forget the injustice of the world around you. If you truly believe that your home is perfect than you have fallen so truly I would have no faith for you.\u201d"}, "post-89820": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1556139822000", "message": "\"Perfect..? Who said it was perf..?\" Vithkun said when their discussion seemed to be ended by the sight they stepped into. Picturesque and near perfect it seemed hard to continue to sneer at each other although it was quite certain that the last word had not be uttered in that regard. Standing at the brink of victory over demons, dwarves and tricky grains of sand it felt as if the jewel did not belong to him - as if there was something wrong with just walking over and grabbing it for himself. And at the same time he knew Myra's words were true, simply obtaining the jewel would not release him from his curse and neither would being crowned king.\"Your words are true. Who am I to know what will undo my curse... That is the torture I endure every day.\" Vithkun said and sighed. \"Thank you...\" Vithkun said and nodded to Myra as he walked with heavy steps over to the Crimson Ascend. Such beauty was a true marvel to behold at that close range - almost dauntingly beautiful, or perhaps this was just what Vithkun felt about the task at hand, but he had decided about it and it could not be any different. With both hands he gently grasped the jewel and held it and there was no doubt that it held immense magical power - and then some. Even Vith wasn't able to deduct even a small portion of this jewel's mastery over magic and in some way it was as if it was hiding half of it from him as if it was both containing some other intelligence but at the same time was also a mirror of himself. Vithkun turned towards Myra holding the jewel for her to see and walked over to her. \"It's so light.\" he said and released a relieved smile to Myra. \"At least it feels light in my hands right now.\" he said and reached for Myra's right hand with his left placing the jewel in her palm gently but firmly closing her fingers around it giving her a glance that was serious yet full of compassion and determination. \"If you truly believe I will become a king and achieve great things then I will ask you to come back with me to High Haven and safeguard this jewel while reminding me what I must do.\" Vithkun asked her. \"You're the only elf I know who would never misuse this power or misplace her heart while trying to wield it!\" he said assertively his deep blue eyes finding it to be a long long lost joy to give such a gift to one he so dearly loved.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"Perfect..? Who said it was perf..?\" Vithkun said when their discussion seemed to be ended by the sight they stepped into. Picturesque and near perfect it seemed hard to continue to sneer at each other although it was quite certain that the last word had not be uttered in that regard. "}, "post-89821": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1556152738000", "message": "The greatest strength was admitting weakness and the way that he accepted her truth for his own in one moment gave her clarity. Even if it was to decide that seeing him succeed because of his ability to do so was the right path. Perhaps not for the beating wreck inside of her chest that gave way to emotional needs but to the logical one that saw the world needed his heart. His own beating that followed a rhythm no one else possessed. Here in this land of beauty she might have stayed forever, swayed to her own music and come to the realization that the stag was much more than he appeared. \"Most things that are truly heavy do not seem so at first,\" she commented on the jewel as he walked towards her, \"I should not have spoken so rashly,\" seeking forgiveness she had but little time to contemplate a full apology as he reached forth grasping her hand. Brows furrowing in curiosity at the gesture it took but a moment for the realization to dawn upon her as he settled the jewel within her fingers. He was right, it was incredibly light in weight but heavier in terms of magic. The instant it made contact with her skin it was as if it was searing the very outer layers of it but not in a painful way but peircing and indescriable. It stunned her to silence allowing him to speak without interference from her as she sought his eyes with her own. Two pairs of shaded blue drawing upon the strength of a bond not yet fully established. Refusing him meant he would take it on his own, that they would part amicably but with unresolved business lingering between them. It meant she might never see High Haven nor feel the wrath of its occupants. It was the smart choice, the only choice, the one she needed to make above all others because it would be disasterous for her to enter such a place of light with her darkness. Yet it wasn't what she did. She nodded once, fingers curling around the edge of the jewel. \"If I did not believe the very same of you I would not have urged you to take it in such a manner.\" ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The greatest strength was admitting weakness and the way that he accepted her truth for his own in one moment gave her clarity. Even if it was to decide that seeing him succeed because of his ability to do so was the right path. Perhaps not for the beating wreck inside of her chest that gave way to emotional needs but to the logical one that saw the world needed his heart. His own beating that followed a rhythm no one else possessed. Here in this land of beauty she might have stayed forever, swayed to her own music and come to the realization that the stag was much more than he appeared. "}, "post-89828": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1556310653000", "message": "Myra had spoken rashly indeed and so had Vithkun - many spiky words han been uttered yet what he had asked of Myra did not have a shred of harsh words. The moments that went between him asking her and the answer were breathless and he could hardly keep his gaze fixed on her. Her nod and following words had Vithkun flash a wide and relieved grin at her answer. Extending both his arms putting them on her shoulders his happiness was like a river and he couldn't hardly contain herself from giving her a long and deep hug, still he stopped himself knowing that when arriving in High Haven - unless he wanted to stir more trouble than even he could handle - he would have to control his emotions even on these occasions. But even so the realization hit Vihtkun.\"Although... I don't know how to explain this when we get there...\" he said and looked away trying to figure out something on the spot. \"Alright! I will explain that since you let me have it, letting you come back to High Haven as an honored guest was the least I could do!\" Vithkun said self confidently although he was far from it as the explanation would immediately prompt questions as of why she would give him it and why she should carry it when she had given it to him. Also there was the thing about his fiancee expecting to get the jewel as a wedding gift...One thing was certain and that was that Vithkun was required to use a lot of his speech craft and even cash in a few favors to make this happen - and then he didn't even consider that Myra might add to the problems with her slightly rugged drow attitude that might not be well suited for High Haven. \"Alright but there are a few things you should know about High Haven...\" he said and paused for a moment rubbing his chin. \"It's a beautiful place...\" he said and paused yet again. \"But there are a lot of politics and if in doubt one is best off not answering a question at all.\" Vithkun warned Myra, but despite this he was looking forward to showing her his homeland and the wonders it contained - and teach her the subtler ways of mingling with nobles as they went. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Myra had spoken rashly indeed and so had Vithkun - many spiky words han been uttered yet what he had asked of Myra did not have a shred of harsh words. The moments that went between him asking her and the answer were breathless and he could hardly keep his gaze fixed on her. Her nod and following words had Vithkun flash a wide and relieved grin at her answer. Extending both his arms putting them on her shoulders his happiness was like a river and he couldn't hardly contain herself from giving her a long and deep hug, still he stopped himself knowing that when arriving in High Haven - unless he wanted to stir more trouble than even he could handle - he would have to control his emotions even on these occasions. "}, "post-89829": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1556342480000", "message": "Had the man started to pace it would have suited his rather derailed train of thought before he administered a warning that might fall flat rather quickly. Not speaking was really a strong point when it came to her demeanor but not speaking at all was not. Her words were fewer because she needed not the entire repertoire of the languages she had access to in order to express herself. Generally a simple yes or no would suffice. She should have simply said he could have the jewel before but her mouth had ran away with her and now she was committed even further to a task that would surely bring trouble. Holding the jewel within her hands it shone in the light of the sun above them. The multifaceted beauty was unimaginably complex in its arrangement and yet the physical beauty was not all she felt. It held much more within it and now that it was within her hands it was as if it called to her. Wanted her to look deeper. Vithkun had entrusted her with it believing her heart could withstand its pleas and for now it pushed aside its whispers to return to the present. \u201cI do not believe this to be a wise decision but I will attempt to be more careful in how I manage myself,\u201d attempt was the key word and it gave her leeway. Not binding herself to a worse fate was suitable. The stag that stood beside her earlier had moved back a ways looking out to the mountains as if it were truly appreciating their beauty. It lowered its head but it rose a moment later ears flickering and eyes focusing in on a figure that came through the opening in the hall that the other two had passed through not but moments ago. The figure was male and broad shouldered, but not clear at first until he stepped into the light. A Drow, one with the purest of white hair and startlingly blue eyes. He dressed in long robes of black that fluttered around his form as he moved walking towards the back of Myra who Vith stood in front of. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Had the man started to pace it would have suited his rather derailed train of thought before he administered a warning that might fall flat rather quickly. Not speaking was really a strong point when it came to her demeanor but not speaking at all was not. Her words were fewer because she needed not the entire repertoire of the languages she had access to in order to express herself. Generally a simple yes or no would suffice. She should have simply said he could have the jewel before but her mouth had ran away with her and now she was committed even further to a task that would surely bring trouble. "}, "post-89831": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1556358535000", "message": "Vithkun found Myra almost entranced with the Crimson Ascend as she peered into it deeply and Vithkun too felt the pull towards its multifaceted colors. It was as if the colors weren't just multifaceted but if he really let his sight merge with the brilliance of the stone it was as if Vithkun would see every color in one formidable color. He blinked once or twice and he was out of it again - it did not hold him there like an illusion it only presented to the elf what it had. \"It's a marvelous thing huh?\" Vithkun said as it started dawning to him exactly what kind of treasure they had found. \"I cannot remember hearing about a treasure of this value and beauty existing anywhere in the known world - and here we are holding it.\" he said nostalgic. \"You're holding it, Ashborn of Host..!\" Vithkun said with a wry smile meaning that indeed she had come far. \"I did not give it to you merely for safe keeping, but let's keep people thinking that.\" he added softly. Vithkun looked at her with a smirk as she said the words - he was able to deduct when one tried to forge an 'out' in one's answer. Had it been any other elf in High Haven he would have been ruthless in asserting the fact that 'attempting' was about the same as failing. But it was not, it was Myra, the one he held dearest in his heart. \"Then I too will 'attempt' to keep you from being locked up in the deepest dungeons. The more you attempt, the less I have to.\" he said and crossed his arms grinning. However his smile quickly turned to concern seeing a shadow emerge from the entrance to the valley they had passed out of just recently. Brows frowned even more as the figure was obviously a drow - one clad in black robes and with the same kind of white hair as Myra. As he approached Vithkun's thoughts were that of the council Myra had mentioned and putting a hand on her shoulder he stepped past her with the other hand on the hilt of the sword.\"Someone is approaching... a drow..!\" he warned Myra, knowing that he was indeed ready to fight to his death so that they wouldn't claim the jewel. \"Who are you? Speak of your intentions before stepping any further!\" Vithkun spoke with a clear and assertive voice making a slight move to draw the sword so the drow might know that he was serious. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Vithkun found Myra almost entranced with the Crimson Ascend as she peered into it deeply and Vithkun too felt the pull towards its multifaceted colors. It was as if the colors weren't just multifaceted but if he really let his sight merge with the brilliance of the stone it was as if Vithkun would see every color in one formidable color. He blinked once or twice and he was out of it again - it did not hold him there like an illusion it only presented to the elf what it had. "}, "post-89832": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1556386958000", "message": "\u201cYou\u2019re probably going to be working that mouth of yours a lot then,\u201d admitting this as he crossed this arms she had some intention of keeping to herself but where injustice happened she had a tendency to leap without looking. It got them involved with a certain demon who deemed himself a Lord. While the adventure had solidified their position to one another as far as understanding the thought process of each and making certain they worked well together, it had been her fault they\u2019d been cast upon it to start. Not that she\u2019d heard him complaining and it gave her hope in no small way that the changes she saw in him would remain. Just as he had changed her. Tempering her anger was a difficult thing to do but he had done it. Holding the stone in her right hand her fingers curled around it, protecting it from falling by a firm grip, not enough to make her knuckles turn white, but her hand was certainly flexed well around it. The sudden change from witty banter to defensive made her turn with Vithkun even as he spoke the words of a stranger approaching. Her mace was above the ground, left behind where the wolves had accosted them before they leapt into the depths of the cavern. Her other main defense was not one that would work upon the man approaching for he himself was Ashborn. After Annonai it took but a second of recognition. The mans features were dark but his eyes so bright in comparison. Certainly he was more practiced then she at the art but she would give one hell of a fight if it came to it, and it seemed it was going to. Like static electricity in the air she felt the shift in the atmosphere. \u201cNo,\u201d her voice was not firm, but worried, full of an unexpressed sorrow for she felt the drain on the world around them but not on herself. She knew then that his power could not effect her, unless she allowed it, and the instant that the flickering gaze turned to the elf who\u2019s hand was so openly on his sword she reacted. \u201cVith!\u201d Stepping forward her left hand on his shoulder she would go to place herself bodily before him, her right over his sword hand if he would allow her to do so. The instant that she did so, the jewel saddled within the very same hand with no longer a concern placed to keeping it safe, she felt the power relinquish. Not before both felt it, Vith first, and then a sudden stop the instant that Myra stood before him and her own skin showing a pallor that was unmistakable in that she had taken his own suffering upon herself. \u201cYou protect him?\u201d The gentle baritone was not unkind, benign even if one could look past the shock of the initial wonder at her actions. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\u201cYou\u2019re probably going to be working that mouth of yours a lot then,\u201d admitting this as he crossed this arms she had some intention of keeping to herself but where injustice happened she had a tendency to leap without looking. It got them involved with a certain demon who deemed himself a Lord. While the adventure had solidified their position to one another as far as understanding the thought process of each and making certain they worked well together, it had been her fault they\u2019d been cast upon it to start. Not that she\u2019d heard him complaining and it gave her hope in no small way that the changes she saw in him would remain. Just as he had changed her. Tempering her anger was a difficult thing to do but he had done it. "}, "post-89838": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1556443626000", "message": "The drow seemed to have no intention of stopping or explaining who he was and Vithkun braced himself for what seemed like an inevitable confrontation. But there was something else... A dark magic in the air around he couldn't put his finger on before it dawned to him that he was already under the influence of the subtle draining of life that ashborn were able to do. He felt just like then when Myra had freed him from his incarceration but had nearly stifled his life - only to a more subtle extend. Weaving his left hand in front of him the best he could do was to conjure protective spells... No, he would have to summon The Light of Lannegar to cleanse him - and it was a ritual that he could not do that fast. The ring... he reached for his pocket knowing that its powers might aid him greatly here although it might end up undoing himself. Vithkun had stepped in to protect Myra, but Myra stepped in front of Vithkun placing her hand on his sword as Vithkun stopped his actions out of surprise. \"Myra..!\" he said concerned knowing that she had not brought her mace. Was she going to try to stand up to another ashborn? He looked around noticing the catastrophic outcome it would have on this area. \"Don't do it, you'll kill this place. Release your spell!\" he commanded the stranger from behind Myra. But at the same time the stone seemed to touch Vithkun as Myra used the same hand to hold the jewel as she used to stop him from drawing his sword. \"The light..!\" he said surprised as he felt the power of the jewel seep into him in a whole other way than when he was holding it himself. But it was not the touch of The Crimson Ascend lessened the effects that the unknown drow's ashborn abilities had on him. It was Myra who suddenly was taking the pain and damage the drow before them had caused Vithkun.\u00a0Vithkun was both relieved but also angered seeing Myra suffering by his hands.\u00a0\"I mean it! Myra has suffered plenty from your malevolent methods and even if it is only my bones that stand after this I will not tolerate it anymore!\" Vithkun shouted as he weaved the elven letters of fire on the handle before he broke away from Myra's hold on his sword hand and drew his blade a flame more than thrice his size flaring from the edge matching his disgust for the drow.\u00a0", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The drow seemed to have no intention of stopping or explaining who he was and Vithkun braced himself for what seemed like an inevitable confrontation. But there was something else... A dark magic in the air around he couldn't put his finger on before it dawned to him that he was already under the influence of the subtle draining of life that ashborn were able to do. He felt just like then when Myra had freed him from his incarceration but had nearly stifled his life - only to a more subtle extend. "}, "post-89839": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1556463951000", "message": "The immense heat of the sword resting to her side as Vithkun vowed to protect her made her flinch. It was not the heat or the words but the thought of another battle in such a place, of the assurance that should it range across the landscape they would destroy it. Fire would also cause it to fall to ashes and he had quite the way of effecting the landscape with it by swinging his sword. He had to half step as well to avoid her and with her back to the stranger she saw a sight she never expected. From the depths of the lake rose an elven woman. Reminiscent of the lady of the lake rising from the ripples at the edge she was completely dry the instant that she made contact with the air. Her clothes still carried quite the effect of being underwater her long white dress flowing around her from making her appear ethereal. Her hair was black as night the raven locks in deep waves settling over her shoulders and down around her framing chocolate eyes and ruby stained lips. Myra was about to warn Vith of the stranger when their eyes made contact and she was stricken speechless, giving the elf enough time to speak her voice like the warmest spring breeze rolling across them, \u201cThat will not be necessary Vithkun Almear, Prince of the Elves of High Haven. You have proven your strength and your valor in your attempt to reach this place,\u201d her gaze had only left Myra for a second in order to glance at the back of Vith\u2019s head before it returned to the girl, \u201cAnd you Myralthrine of the house of Beleon you carry the mark of those before you. You have started the path of your own destiny.\u201dThe Drow before Vithkun seemed less threatening now in a sense his features softening at the appearance of the elf.The drain either had felt on their bones was gone and in its place they felt bolstered. As if they were risen from those very ashes both brighter for the experience now. He began to circle them, keeping some distance in order to join the newly appeared woman his earlier anger seemingly disappeared and replaced with a softer kindness in his gaze. Myra felt as if both powers were overwhelming, and perhaps they were, these two must have been around the jewel for some time and with its enchanting might giving them its power they were as formidable as the stars themselves. Thankfully she felt no ill will now from either as she had before but the pivot her head was on to look at both of them was painful enough.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "The immense heat of the sword resting to her side as Vithkun vowed to protect her made her flinch. It was not the heat or the words but the thought of another battle in such a place, of the assurance that should it range across the landscape they would destroy it. Fire would also cause it to fall to ashes and he had quite the way of effecting the landscape with it by swinging his sword. He had to half step as well to avoid her and with her back to the stranger she saw a sight she never expected. "}, "post-89840": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1556465773000", "message": "On all accounts Vithkun was ready and he would not be waiting for the drow to launch his attack as he mentally counted down from tree. Tree... Two... o... But before he reached one he sensed Myra looking back and he turned his head expecting another drow but seeing the surface of the water on the small lake stirred, and up rose a raven haired elf. A raven haired pure elf who's beauty and grace was as stunning as her presence - and as if this was not enough she spoke to him with such a charming and soft voice that  had him immediately surrender his anger. The fire extinguished immediately leaving a cool blade in the wake and Vithkun to bow slightly towards the pure elf. \"How... how do you know my name..?\" he asked confounded as he also sensed that the drow's killing intent had settled and that he was no longer threatening their safety. It seemed that the elven lady did also know Myra well enough to have information on her name and house. \"I trust you will do us no harm then..?\" Vithkun said and glanced quickly at the drow too, although it was peculiarly difficult for Vithkun to look away from the elven lady. He sheathed his sword and sighed trying to calm himself again - what was this feeling all of a sudden? It was a kind and comfortable feeling that was even surpassing that of before they stepped in and the drow that had been so menacing before seemed softer and almost fatherly now. But behind this Vithkun sensed a great latent power lingering - and of course it would if these two had had anything to do with building this place. But how could they? It was so long ago that even some of the oldest elves would have died by now. Was it the effect of the jewel?\"I... must apologize if I offended any of you.\" Vithkun said and bowed towards the elf and then the drow. \"I must ask who you are though? I cannot remember having seen or heard of you before miss..?\" he asked the elven lady quite unsure of how to even address them as he discretely sheathed his sword. Were they nobility? Royalty? Or perhaps outcasts by some ill circumstances?", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "On all accounts Vithkun was ready and he would not be waiting for the drow to launch his attack as he mentally counted down from tree. Tree... Two... o... But before he reached one he sensed Myra looking back and he turned his head expecting another drow but seeing the surface of the water on the small lake stirred, and up rose a raven haired elf. A raven haired pure elf who's beauty and grace was as stunning as her presence - and as if this was not enough she spoke to him with such a charming and soft voice that  had him immediately surrender his anger. "}, "post-89841": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1556466715000", "message": "\u201cI know many things your highness,\u201d unlike when Myra spouted off his title she spoke of it with respect for his house was one of the few last remaining ones which she recognized and found to be honorable. Just as she found Myra\u2019s to be so but not with the current placement on the throne who was only a steward for the rightful heir but their denial would never be exstinquished until it was made known throughout both lands that the true ruler knew their place, \u201cYour journey here though short has brought you to new heights, both of you, the dwarves spoke of my presence at their tables once upon a time but I gave them a false name for I did not want my family to seek me within their halls. I am Elena of Baurimont.\u201d Vithkun would recognize it as the secondary royal family, one who was subservient to the first in the past and would be the one to take over should the line have been destroyed. When the monarchy had not had a ruling council to assist she would have been one of the most powerful among their kind and too old to still be in such a state. The Drow would take his turn to answer now, \u201cElena gave her place to join me here, to find herself in my solitude was quite the feat but she assisted me in designing that which would be the tests of the jewel itself. Such power should only fall within the hands of those worthy of discretion in its management. I am Kacien, also of the house of Beleon from which you have descended,\u201d he spoke directly to Myra at that point, \u201cIt cannot be but any other as you carry the lineage of our house in your power.\u201d Myra who had been quiet up to this point was still shocked. They gave her a family name, one she recognized, one she feared, for she could not possibly be of such a house nor abandoned by it if it was truly so. Even still she looked to the Drow with such confusion and a will for his words to be wrong. She even stepped back away from Vith in her denial. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\u201cI know many things your highness,\u201d unlike when Myra spouted off his title she spoke of it with respect for his house was one of the few last remaining ones which she recognized and found to be honorable. Just as she found Myra\u2019s to be so but not with the current placement on the throne who was only a steward for the rightful heir but their denial would never be exstinquished until it was made known throughout both lands that the true ruler knew their place, \u201cYour journey here though short has brought you to new heights, both of you, the dwarves spoke of my presence at their tables once upon a time but I gave them a false name for I did not want my family to seek me within their halls. I am Elena of Baurimont.\u201d "}, "post-89842": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1556468114000", "message": "\"I bet you do...\" Vithkun said respectfully as his eyes lingered in hers trying to see what lay behind them - but nothing was conveyed. \"The dwarves..! So you are..?\" Vithkun said and deducted what had happened. She was quite clearly the elf that had passed through the dwarven halls so long ago - but the name was different and Vithkun smirked as he recognized her noble surname. \"I really liked the dress you wore then - it is as beautiful today as is must have been then.\" He said and looked at Myra with a soft glance before turning back to the drow that now spoke directly to Myra.\"Excuse me? House Beleon?\" Vithkun said and frowned. Elena had said it before but Vithkun had thought it was a mistake on her part - but for him to confirm it so assertively. \"But House Beleon is...\" he said and looked at Myra - the first thing going through his head that she had lied. But very quickly it was clear that she did not know this herself. \"Myra..!\" Vithkun said and looked at her assertively. \"Could this be true?\" he inquired concerned that it might be as House Beleon was not exactly in favor of the Pure Elves of High Haven. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"I bet you do...\" Vithkun said respectfully as his eyes lingered in hers trying to see what lay behind them - but nothing was conveyed. \"The dwarves..! So you are..?\" Vithkun said and deducted what had happened. She was quite clearly the elf that had passed through the dwarven halls so long ago - but the name was different and Vithkun smirked as he recognized her noble surname. \"I really liked the dress you wore then - it is as beautiful today as is must have been then.\" He said and looked at Myra with a soft glance before turning back to the drow that now spoke directly to Myra."}, "post-89843": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1556472008000", "message": "Elena smiled at the compliment of the prince himself. He recognized her family name and her acceptance of his role in the royal family was the highest praise of a house of such lineage itself. They supported them in times of need and at other times had been one of the few to deny their wishes and step in for the people. The checks and balances system was swayed by favoritism in that time but still suitable, \"I am sure she looked as lovely as your memory remembers,\" she would comment upon his words. Reaching to the Drow that approached he took her hand settling himself in by her side just as the other two across from them stood connected but not quite so openly. \"No,\" Myra spoke the denial was strong within her the word firm and frankly not convinced that the Drow was telling the truth himself. She was of Host, an orphan abandoned there to fend for herself among the other small wretches who would claw and fight their way to better standing. It had simply been that her standing was kept lowered due to the shade of her hair and the fear of her abilities. The Drow apparently was not having her refusal, \"You are Ashborn,\" his tone was quite insistent,\"You are of the house of Beleon no matter how you refuse. It is a trait only passed down through that lineage and only possessed by those within the line of Beleon, my mother was the first but not the last, certainly, but it has never been within another female to my knowledge until you.\" ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Elena smiled at the compliment of the prince himself. He recognized her family name and her acceptance of his role in the royal family was the highest praise of a house of such lineage itself. They supported them in times of need and at other times had been one of the few to deny their wishes and step in for the people. The checks and balances system was swayed by favoritism in that time but still suitable, \"I am sure she looked as lovely as your memory remembers,\" she would comment upon his words. Reaching to the Drow that approached he took her hand settling himself in by her side just as the other two across from them stood connected but not quite so openly. "}, "post-89844": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1556478958000", "message": "It was a clear 'no' - but a 'no' in clear denial also. The many years among the court of High Haven had taught Vithkun the inns and outs of the art of reading people behind the facade of their words, and the elf and the drow spoke the truth. It might take a bit of time for Myra to take it all in though - and for Vithkun to digest what to think. Myra was a noble now, and a quite important one too which would carry immense weight either way if he told of her true identity in High Haven. Could he? Should he? There was much to think about but the journey back would luckily be long so he had time. Vithkun turned towards the female elf and gave a wry smile.\"You're not going to tell me I'm an adopted bastard now that we're doing the surprises, are you?\" he jested, his heart quietly hoping she wouldn't suddenly change her demeanor. Vithkun then walked over to Myra putting an arm around her comforting her. \"You're still Myra, I know that. The rest is details right now.\" he said and gave her a soft smile. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "It was a clear 'no' - but a 'no' in clear denial also. The many years among the court of High Haven had taught Vithkun the inns and outs of the art of reading people behind the facade of their words, and the elf and the drow spoke the truth. It might take a bit of time for Myra to take it all in though - and for Vithkun to digest what to think. Myra was a noble now, and a quite important one too which would carry immense weight either way if he told of her true identity in High Haven. Could he? Should he? There was much to think about but the journey back would luckily be long so he had time. "}, "post-89848": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1556521085000", "message": "Not a poor decision but an unwise one to attempt to calm her current state of mind for her shoulders trembled but not for tears or fear but anger at the words that came out of the unsettling Drows mouth. The female elf without an ounce of sarcasm would even reassure Vithkun stating, \u201cNo, your highness.\u201d Her level of respect was far from what Myra could muster in that moment and she wished so surely to have her mace in her hand the defense of its spikes and the cool metal beneath her fingers a rigid reminder of what pure physical rage could do. Thankfully it wasn\u2019t, and with Vith present, with him smiling at her, and agreeing with them he was quite lucky as well for she could not see why his belief was so easily found, \u201cIt matters not for it is a lie.\u201d What child born of royalty would be cast from the palace, if it was truly such a crime as to be lowered from such a position why not just murder the babe. Handle things then and there, or had someone smuggled her elsewhere. Before Annonai she\u2019d never heard of who or what she was but while she believed him, this she did not. Kacien cared not for her denial for in time she might find the truth of her lineage, learn to control her reaction that had been so blatantly been shown upon her face. \u201cYou speak what you believe but within the realm of the elven cities there are those who still remember the old tales. They will know who you are.\u201d A warning, and one even Elena continued in earnest, \u201cAnd you your highness risk everything by asking of her to return with you. It will not be seen so kindly by those even closest to you.\u201d ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Not a poor decision but an unwise one to attempt to calm her current state of mind for her shoulders trembled but not for tears or fear but anger at the words that came out of the unsettling Drows mouth. The female elf without an ounce of sarcasm would even reassure Vithkun stating, \u201cNo, your highness.\u201d Her level of respect was far from what Myra could muster in that moment and she wished so surely to have her mace in her hand the defense of its spikes and the cool metal beneath her fingers a rigid reminder of what pure physical rage could do. Thankfully it wasn\u2019t, and with Vith present, with him smiling at her, and agreeing with them he was quite lucky as well for she could not see why his belief was so easily found, \u201cIt matters not for it is a lie.\u201d "}, "post-89849": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1556557444000", "message": "It was not the understanding reply he had expected, that he got, and Vithkun sighed and let his arms drop.\"Very well.\" Vithkun said as he observed Myra as she stood there. \"You're right, it matters not right now.\" he finally said and listened to what Kacien and Elena spoke. He looked at Elena with a smirk. \"It matters not either, she's just a drow from Host - they won't bother for very long.\" he said feeling as if he needed to get back at them a little on both of their behalves - for the trials but also for this. \"You're spewing blunt 'truths' so nonchalantly - have you forgotten about charm and elegance in word and action?\" Vithkun said looking at them both. \"Lies are comforting and truths are hard like the hammer against the anvil - and truths turning out to be lies are just treacherous poison. I hope you both understand what consequences both bear and why words cannot confirm nor deny your statements.\" Vithkun said with a certain firmness of voice that for a second lifted him in authority. \"And you, Kacien, are not the first ashborn I have met on this trip - the other managed to blend lies with truths seemingly so naturally that even I struggled seeing the difference. I believe the soul of you ashborn is inherently pure as witnessed by Myra, but can also be stained far easier and to a higher degree than many others.\" he said and narrowed his eyes a little. \"I will reserve judgment on your part.\" he said before turning to Elena. \"I will go back to High Haven with Myra because our path is clear to us in ways your may not see in spite of your seniority. Perhaps you might assist us in doing so be leading us to the exit?\" he asked kindly but sincerely. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "It was not the understanding reply he had expected, that he got, and Vithkun sighed and let his arms drop."}, "post-89852": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1556598894000", "message": "When Vith spoke with conviction it elevated him to the position of his birthright. Myra felt as strongly about this that she was convinced to travel with him to High Haven and his speech carried with it such a belief and certainty that she wished she had accepted the comfort he\u2019d offered but a moment ago. Her hand slipped around his squeezing his palm lightly as he asked for an exit.Kacien was pleased with the onslaught of his words as well but his expression was blank but Elena looked as proud as a mother could in a sense as he spoke. \u201cIt is a common affliction of an absence from the courts,\u201d she spoke of Kacien but it did not seem to apply only to him, \u201cOr a family trait,\u201d Annonai had been much more well spoken but never having met him she could not vouch for the way he spoke, \u201cbut you make fair points, your highness. Words can be empty and misleading, without true proof it is difficult to believe but you return to the palace. Records have been destroyed and altered but with true preserverance you can uncover much which has been hidden.\u201d Myra finally found her voice, \u201cHistory is written by the victor.\u201d\u201cNeither won that war,\u201d Kacien commented dryly upon it. Elena frowned at the mention of it, both had said but a few words and managed to return to the darkness that Vith said was not within their souls originally by lack of caring about how their words came across, \u201cReopening old wounds will not make the scars lessen, nor will it heal those which never began to close. Trust brought you here and it is what you will need in order to preservere In the times to come. Removing the jewel from the pedestal you broke a seal strengthened by its own magic. It rests within your hands now but be weary of using it alone. It was created by many and to be wielded without would destroy the user.\u201d Elena raised her right hand towards the entrance they had come through, twisting her palm the distance mattered not for within the opening she cast a portal of her own. A talent of her lineage their time around the jewel had changed both of them and having practiced the art for her time here it appeared almost simple. Within the opening was a pearlescent sheen as if there was a flat soap bubble existing within it. \u201cYour belongings will appear where you are deposited but where you go is up to you,\u201d allowing them the freedom of choice their choice would have to be unanimous or else they would be separated. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "When Vith spoke with conviction it elevated him to the position of his birthright. Myra felt as strongly about this that she was convinced to travel with him to High Haven and his speech carried with it such a belief and certainty that she wished she had accepted the comfort he\u2019d offered but a moment ago. Her hand slipped around his squeezing his palm lightly as he asked for an exit."}, "post-89857": {"user": "Vithkun Almear", "user_num": 3144, "timestamp": "1556616975000", "message": "\"We will return to High Haven - much is on my mind but genealogy, but I'm sure we will eventually find the truth.\" he said and nodded to Elena, although he found it odd that Kacien was mentioning that neither won the war - that was quite evidently not true. Parting his lips slightly he wanted to ask her about it but he also knew that he would rather find out for himself through other channels than just what they said. Apparently the jewel was not some personal artifact of power as he had thought to start with but rather something a whole group had wielded. This was good to know but also meant that giving it as a gift to his fiancee would not be the right way - and that most likely meant that Vithkun could not be king. Slightly saddened by the prospect he sighed and squeezed Myra's hand back. \"We'll be in for more trials when we get to High Haven I'm sure. Are you ready?\" he asked sincerely as he looked at Elena and Kacien. \"Thank you for now, you've been most helpful.\" he said and if Myra was ready he would accompany her towards the portal that Elana had so impressively created from thin air. ", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "\"We will return to High Haven - much is on my mind but genealogy, but I'm sure we will eventually find the truth.\" he said and nodded to Elena, although he found it odd that Kacien was mentioning that neither won the war - that was quite evidently not true. Parting his lips slightly he wanted to ask her about it but he also knew that he would rather find out for himself through other channels than just what they said. "}, "post-89858": {"user": "Myralthrine Host", "user_num": 3143, "timestamp": "1556629749000", "message": "Myra could not quite respond in a manner that might please Vithkun for her willingness to travel to such a place was not allowed to come from her lips. Determination was there but the want was not so she simply nodded in order to confirm that it was time to leave this place. Wonderous or not, she was certainly not tempted to stay with the couple who spoke with such authority when they were blinded to the world outside of their home. Elena would bow to her Prince as they readied and Kacien would do no such thing. The family traits it seemed were prevelant in the two Drows. Him and Myra were more alike than either might like to admit even in how they barely said what was necessary as he did now, \u201cBe weary of what I have told you. Your belief matters not for some will remember and in such there is much danger. Your position is one of power and strength, with the jewel you could unite all that has been lost.\u2019Unwilling to admit deep down that perhaps he was right she managed only a nod. The same thing she gave to Vith as he asked her if she was ready to leave. It appeared they were not the only ones ready for the Stag accompanied them towards the portal. It\u2019s time here at an end if it remained it would remain without the pair for the stone had unnaturally prolonged their lives and he did not wish to face eternity even in such a place alone. Besides he was truly interested in the outcome of the jewel in the hands of the two.Myra stood before the portal but one thing still bothered her and she would turn slightly the jewel now cradled against her as she spoke, \u201cWhat will happen to all those who came before us?\u201d\u201cThey will be freed,\u201d Elena gave her some hope in this, \u201cEvery attempt made after the first they have been made aware of. They are not unfeeling or unseeing even if their eyes are lost to them. They will know of your journey here, of your success, and once they accept how it was accomplished they will be revived, one by one. However long it takes is of their own accord.\u201dPleased by the answer Myra uttered a simple, \u201cThank you,\u201d for goodbye had such a finality to it and as she looked to Kacien she almost wished to stay. Annonai had been irrevocably ignorant towards Vith, saying he would betray her, but Kacien was kind and had found a way to make what he wanted most work. Even if it had been to abandon everything. What secrets could he teach her about her power that she might never know? Vith beside her reassured her with his hand in hers that whatever was left she would uncover in time for he still had much to learn as well. \u201cTogether,\u201d as before and once again this journey was theirs to take and the portal now opened and a deep breath settled in her chest they would cross the threshold into a new chapter.", "link_list": [], "image_list": [], "html": "Myra could not quite respond in a manner that might please Vithkun for her willingness to travel to such a place was not allowed to come from her lips. Determination was there but the want was not so she simply nodded in order to confirm that it was time to leave this place. Wonderous or not, she was certainly not tempted to stay with the couple who spoke with such authority when they were blinded to the world outside of their home. "}}